If Dylan had stuck to its prefix syntax, we would've had that.
Common Lisp, C++
Considering all the generals commenting on Rumsfeld were retired, what is seriously wrong?
Java, Javascript, C#, have used Scheme and Postscript in the past
Looks like they made a few initial mistakes in that study that made their results ridiculous.  Instead of using readily available poll data to gauge the numbers on how the population felt about various issues, they took the strange and circuitous route of taking initial numbers based on what the Americans for Democratic Action decided was liberal votes by congressmen, and then having those numbers correlated to populations that voted for that Congressman to decide what the average American thought about a given issue.  This was a flawed start.  First the ADA's no authoritative source on what is and is not liberal.  Second Congressional reps. often make votes for reasons besides ideology.  Third, many people vote for congressional representation that does not reflect their views, due to the fact that few campaigns actually focus on issues. So after a completely flawed approach to getting numbers, they wound up with meaningless results.  The study put the Wall Street Journal as the #1 most liberal paper.  If that's not enough to figure out the study must have had some serious problems somewhere along the line, then you are not paying attention to the media.  The WSJ's news pages are not completely tainted like their editorials (which mostly appear to be press releases for the RNC), but they are certainly not some bastion of leftist propaganda. Here's the money quote for how ludicrous the results of that study were:  &gt;Only Fox News' "Special Report With Brit Hume" and The Washington Times scored right of the average U.S. voter. Yep, that's the only conservative media there is... Here's a study using a somewhat more rational approach (though still imperfect) that illustrates growing conservative media bias on Sunday shows: http://mediamatters.org/items/200602140002 
I think we need to define "liberal" then too, because the Democrats aren't it.
Workplace productivity. ;-)
like
I can make a guess, but what exactly does this do?
How many of the Common Lisp implementations implement the *whole* Common Lisp spec?
Python, 4GL &amp; SQL (Informix), Javascript, C++.
Again, wait until middle America, moderate/America sees things like this. The reaction's going to be backlash against the hate America leftist wing of the Democratic party. Yes, the GOP is vunerable in the upcoming elections, but the looney left keep giving the GOP opportunities to regroup. Reality: 70-75 of Americans dismiss people like this as moonbats to dangerous anarchists - even if many no longer hold a favorable view of Bush.
やっちゃいけん
A little known corollary to Godwin's law is that any Internet discussion is over the minute someone invokes Jar Jar Binks.   
Hell yeah.  That term ought to be nuked from our vocabulary, fallout be damned.
No International Herald Tribune in Sweden?
so Iran is attacking Iraq.  Does this make them a member of the coalition of the willing?
Gesundheit.
C#, T-SQL, some python (and elisp for personal Emacs customization)
I've read several parts of the Fountainhead.  Have an MBA.  The evil of Ayn Rand is that she aims to glorify aristocracy.  To make this point, of course she leverages some truths such as capital has value, and is harder to find than labor.  But her work exists to excuse evil of industrialists, and to elevate all aristocrats to industrialists.   Its the same republican bs of justifying dividend tax cuts by finding one poor pensioner that has some such income, or handpicking a posterchild for the harm of estate taxes.  Its agenda driven exagerations meant to take advantage of the audience's stupidity and incapacity of classifying concepts other than black or white.
It is insane that this person used _his own data_. Somewhere out there there is a guy who, for the past 26 years, has been tracking all of his fill-ups.
Aw, be nice. Point [ver](http://www.urticator.net/essay/0/30.html) to [the guidelines on reddiquette](http://programming.reddit.com/help/reddiquette), especially the point on linking to specific articles rather than a homepage.
Mostly perl, one large C# project, some shell scripting and ruby.
oldie but goodie
Well, I'm probably not the only person here who does this for a living, but: 1) This article contains a lot of factual errors. Some are inflated to the point of outright lies. 2) This person clearly has an axe to grind.  3) Yes, the system needs to evolve. However, having 'everyone gets a vote' won't work either. Just look at how Walmart has managed to subvert Wikipedia's commentary about... Walmart. As for the outright lies. The article says that people who referee papers are amateurs with no accountability. Horseshit. I've been a professional academic for (depending on whether you count grad work or not) between a decade and 20 years. I am a referree, quite regularly, and on grants committee's. The whole process is very involved but essentially at every point you have to point out conflict of interest and leave the room for decisions that are either of benefit to you or relate to direct competitors (within reason).  Yes, there are biases. The process is biased towards the status quo. But zero accountability? No way. If you give off-the-cuff reviews then the metareviewers remove you from the pool. Sure, you can find exceptions to this- superpowerful big name researchers for example - but for the most part the process is watchers-who-watch and quite fair. I have been the 'metareviewer' (usually called a third opinion, because most papers are reviewed by two people) a number of times and it is not fun, because you are both reviewing the paper and implicitly reviewing the reviewers (the editor wouldn't call you in if there wasn't a big discrepancy between reviews). In my experience most papers are crap in some way. Badly written, shoddy background research / literature review, crappy experimental method, over the top 'consequences' and so on. Many are essentially undergraduate or MSc research projects that taught the student a lot but shouldn't inflate the already crazy amount of published material. And of course, people who get rejections get annoyed. There is a clear hierarchy of journals - in the sciences, 'Science' and 'Nature' are at the top. Some people will fire a paper higher than it deserves and resubmit down the chain until it ends up in some mediocre journal somewhere. Some people flame the reviewers and have a tantrum. Some people improve their writing and research and stop submitting half-assed stuff and eventually start getting published. IMHO the big problem is that academics are expected to publish an 'above-average' number of papers. Can you say runaway inflation? I'd say the average academic can manage one credible first-authored paper a year (yes, there are exceptions in fields where you can, for example, name a new mineral, but those are rarely full papers). Some years you can manage two. Beyond that either quality goes down or it was really written by a grad student, who SHOULD have been given first authorship. Journals would be better if referees were MORE critical. I spend HOURS wading through shit papers looking for the 1% that are worth reading. I'd rather editors and reviewers and authors reduced the fluff and crap to say 50%. Wow, that would be great. Not bloody likely though since 'number of papers' is easy to evaluate and 'quality' is bloody hard.  The day we go to a 'reddit' or 'slashdot' style science publishing system is the day that groups like the churches or large corporations can subvert the system. Yes, the system is somewhat broken. Yes, there are abuses of power. No, it isn't just amateurs... it is people who've spent years 'in the trade.' And YES, that means there is a certain circularity to how decisions are made, and that  means many REALLY REVOLUTIONARY papers are rejected because they are outside the scope of what reviewers will consider.   
That was the AP's headline, which is why it showed on CNN and Drudge and hundreds of other sources.  The AP story barely mentions Colbert.
Honestly, that's what made me wonder how accurate this is.  I mean, who the hell would actually do that?
C#, PL/SQL, C++, Python in about that order.  Python just for quick prototyping/scripting - nothing that the customer would see. 
..or generals causing unnecessary deaths in search of personal glory. History is littered with those. +1.
yeah, yeah, google is great, ho hum
Java (mostly JSP), and some Python for quick little time-saving scripts
Java, Ruby, C++, Perl
Are the mp3s of the talks online anywhere? I'd love to hear them.
Someone who always paid with a credit card and kept his data in spreadsheets to keep track of his expenditures?
From this data, it seems that what the USA needs is gas at $4 a gallon. Cheap gas has been a crutch that prevented us from taking the actions we needed to become energy independent.
No one mentioned HTML/CSS because it is not a programming language, although Javascript is.
Where the fuck is McDonalds on that list? -1, subjective bullshit.
matlab, python, C
I have a spreadsheet with about 90% of my gas purchases for the past 4 years. Along with that I kept track of milage. I really find the informatin useful. I can tell when my car needs some work way before any symptoms occur (other than a drop in a couple miles per gallon).
And for that very reason, karma down.
Currently getting paid for using Progress. Starting a new business with Erlang. Backup project in Python (was Java, then Common Lisp). 
There's a reason for the question mark in the title.
Awesome video. Who knew so much creativity could come out of business school nerds?
Sort of the textbook example of "the plural of anecdote is not data".
You're quite welcome.
I love it for the not-so-subtle poke at more serious, but false, causal relationships that the thinking heads come up with.
Java mainly. Occasionally: Ruby, C, C++, PHP, Scheme, Perl, Jelly Script( yuck! ), XSL, Javascript, Shell( bash, ksh ), Python.
Great article! The first lesson is an invaluable one. By releasing early, you get your app out there sooner and build users early on. This way, as you add features they will be based on what users want.
Agreed.  Both parties want cheap gas and no gas usage.  They need to decide one way or the other.
Yeah Republicans. You'd better vote this down. Don't want pesky "reality" cramping your style.
Perl and ksh.
Cool.  Thanks.
&gt; it would barely be enough to power the US for a year That's still a shitload of oil.
this is very important that everybody sees this... please vote for this....
C#, Javascript (not with HTML/CSS though), J#/Java (together), VBS, and a in-house VBS variant
What's the standard deviation on that?
I watched the video, and to be fair, the reason they left after the performance is because Colbert was the final speaker and the event was over.
Exactly. If "Ali G" is a comedian, why isn't he funny? How is incoherence even vaguely amusing?
Java, Ruby, C# (in that order)
The first radio show features rants on crippleware and skinned apps, users first experiences with computers, and a look at the groklaw website.
Truly great. As someone who only recently came to live in the US, I cannot but appreciate the greatness of a nation and the vibrancy of a democracy that allows such savage mockery of its powerful leaders. At the same time, it is sad that most mainstream media would gloss over his powerful social commentary and slobber over the silliness of Bush's bland comic routine. Those among us who blog should consider linking here (http://thankyoustephencolbert.org/) and get it to surface to the top of Technorati. Or perhaps even googlebomb it with something appropriate.
&gt; The AP's first stab at it and pieces from Reuters and the Chicago Tribune tell us everything we need to know: Colbert's performance is sidestepped and marginalized while Bush is treated as light-hearted, humble, and funny. Expect nothing less from the cowardly American media. What the heck is the guy talking about? From the very first article he linked: &gt; The featured entertainer was Stephen Colbert, whose Comedy Central show "The Colbert Report" often lampoons the Washington establishment. &gt; "I believe that the government that governs best is a government that governs least, and by these standards we have set up a fabulous government in Iraq," Colbert said in a typical zinger. &gt; He also paid mock tribute to Bush as a man who "believes Wednesday what he believed Monday, despite what happened Tuesday." And in the Reuter's article: &gt; Stephen Colbert, of Comedy Central's "The Colbert Report," wrapped up the evening delivering a routine as the bombastic pundit character of his satiric talk show. &gt; No one was safe from his sarcastic barbs. &gt; "Fox News gives you both sides of the story -- the president's side and the vice president's side," he said to muted laughs. Sorry that they didn't focus on Colbert for the entire article, but that wasn't the point. They were covering the event, not Colbert's skit by itself. And hey, I know its hard to believe, but perhaps Colbert's skit wouldn't have been terribly interesting to many people anyway? He just reiterated many of the points we've heard over and over - points that these same media outlets have covered. A guy from Comedy Central doing satire on the president isn't news. You might agree with his points, but its just not news to most people. As I said, the event itself was, but I'm not sure why anyone expects that Colbert's piece is going to get some kind of special coverage.
To your #1, primarily: a recent flap involving one of your "top" journals, 'Nature', leads me to believe otherwise. http://www.theregister.co.uk/2006/03/25/britannica_wikipedia_nature/ http://corporate.britannica.com/britannica_nature_response.pdf  http://www.nature.com/press_releases/Britannica_response.pdf Nature doesn't disclose the identity of the reviewers (hence, no accountability as the author of this article describes) and they don't fact-check their reviewers' work. How does this, then, translate into horse***t (unless you're referring to Nature...)?
But what was significant about what Colbert did wasn't what he did, but where and how. The Daily Show and Colbert Report offer caustic sendups of politicians all the time... but to say it to the face of arguably the world's most powerful man, that's really something.  Additionally, he did something the press certainly has not done: criticize the press. Any amount of self-flagellation on their part has been timid, at best.  So while I fully expected the President to offer some warm-hearted capering at the correspondent's dinner, I certainly didn't expect someone to absolutely roast him just feet away from his table.
When 40 out of the 50 restaurants are in Euroup, it is quite clearn these guys have no idea what they are talking about.
Ruby is just a blip on the radar screen.  Perl is hanging in there.  .Net and Java dominate.
c++ (with COM, shudder), c#, and a some work with Fortran, VB and ASP.
&gt; For more on Ali G (aka Sascha Baron Cohen), check out his interview with Robert Siegel on NPR: And this is just going to make getting interviews that much harder...  wait, this was on NPR.  Nevermind. 
You should direct your energy into making your point. Cursing just makes you look dumb.
Lua, C# (Mono and Microsoft), C++ and a little assembly.
Why did you put the words *one* and *secret* in quotes? Priest **did** win the Pulitzer Prize.  The prisons in Europe **were** a secret.
One question. If it isn't news, how come three different posts on it have been the top stories here at Reddit all day?   
A person should not be modded down for stating something that is really quite easy to defend. Just for one instance: http://www.newsroom.ucla.edu/page.asp?RelNum=6664   
At first I thought the phrase "Milli Vanilli" funeral was really funny, but after reading your comment I really hope that phrase does _not_ catch on. Those people deserve the utmost respect, as you say.
Yeah, I think this is a bit simplistic.  For example, I've read 4 books on Warren Buffett so far.  None of them compare to reading his [shareholder letters](http://berkshirehathaway.com/letters/letters.html) straight off the web. There are also many areas where books are the *starting* point, not the ending point.  For example, [SICP](http://mitpress.mit.edu/sicp/full-text/book/book.html) is a great book (and available online!).  However, if you really want to learn Scheme, you've got to start looking through the [original lambda papers](http://library.readscheme.org/page1.html) and several journal publications that are available only online (well...a university library would probably have them, but many of us don't have access to that).  And most importantly, to grab an actual implementation, read the online documentation, and start playing with it. I find the best way to "keep up" is to pick an interesting, challenging, and fun project; read all you need (either online or on books) to complete that project; and then actually do the work necessary to finish it.  There's nothing quite like learning by doing.
The liberal bias of the media is something that is a plain as day. Indeed Fox is not especially conservative - it is merely conservative relative to what we're used to. You want conservative, go read National Review. That's conservative.
That's the problem with suicide bombers - not very effective after their first efforts and generally only useful against soft targets. Can't win a war if you can't hold territory.  "Judean People's Front Crack Suicide Squad - ATTACK!!"
This is Restaurant magazine's list and last year they were heavily criticised for being too London-centric. Three of the top five, iirc, were in or around London. This year they spread it out a bit but it is still pretty Europe-centric. If you don't live in Europe, I suppose the best thing you can take away from the list is dining suggestions for the next time you're in the area of one of these places. Otherwise, stick to a Zagat's guide in the US (in my experience they are good for NYC). (Don't waste your time with Zagat's in Europe -their ratings are a complete farce).
He called the 32% of the people that support Bush "Backwash". Blows my mind.
Amazing.  Thank you bugbear.
just test
heartily is a word...
Ummmm... is anyone else not at all soothed by this information?  By that graph, inflation has SHOT up in the last couple of years.  And neither minimum nor I think average wages have gone up to compensate.  That's right fellow Americans!  Gas is basically the same now as it was 20 years ago when adjusted for inflation, but your salary is WAY less.
Here's a link to a high-resolution video of the whole speech: http://www.mininova.org/get/296239 Downloading it requires BitTorrent.
The singular of data is datum. :-)
I've not been doing it for 26 years but I've been doing it for a number of years.  I also track the odometer, destination, date, and arrival/departure time of every trip.  My uncle keeps a logbook for each vehicle he owns in which he tracks all the expenses related to that vehicle.
total crap reactionary comment. Guy probably believes all the 9/11 propoganda.
Perl, Java, PHP, ObjC, SQL, JavaScript, XML/XSLT, sh, occasional Python, Ruby.  Dear God, how I hate PHP.
Can we PLEASE fire him now?
I think the meaning of adjusting for inflation is fairly obvious. The rate of inflation is known, and it defines a transformation from the value of dollars at a fixed time t_0 to the value of dollars at any other time x. Thus, you record the price of gas at a series of timesteps, 1979 to the present, apply the transformation to them, and graph the results.    As for your demand for a thesis, I don't think it needs one. It's interesting data, from which we can draw our own conclusions. My conclusion is that I sometimes wonder how much inflation accounts for "record-breaking" gas prices; now I have some idea of how much of each there is. That is, they aren't record-breaking yet, but they're pretty close.
Except that he probably didn't have a computer to put the spreadsheets on in 1979...
Here's a better one: http://www.indeed.com/jobtrends?q=ruby%2C+python%2C+perl%2C+java%2C+C%23%2C+VB.NET indeed seems to lump non-programming jobs in with the .net line; this removes that and substitutes C# and VB.NET.
His intro reminded me of the old joke about [numbering jokes in prison](http://www.tass-survey.org/tass/mailarchive/1999-01/msg00126.html). But I bet the prisoners didn't know they were using entropy encoding.
Look at the demographics of Reddit. Mostly liberal, mostly 20-ish, mostly male. What Reddit finds newsworthy isn't what America as a whole finds newsworthy. Am I incorrect in this statement? Go out on the streets and gather up 100 random people. How many would find Reddit's frontpage of interest? I don't know if its a good arguement to say, "it must be news because its been a top story at Reddit." I'd also argue that while much of America might not even support Bush, that doesn't mean that they necessarily would appreciate Colbert's approach. Comedy Central itself has somewhat similar demographics to Reddit.
Just FYI, the HSQL binding for SQLite is pretty crude.  Only supports text right now.  Will need to further investigate HDBC.
yep - you really don't get it.
While I'm eagerly looking forward to the Wii and I like their approach, we should be realistic: Nintendo is not doing the Wii like this because they love games. They are doing this because they've realized over the course of the past two consoles that they cannot compete head to head with MS and Sony and expect to win. They've finally understood that they have to do something different - and if it is producing a cheaper console with unique aspects focused entirely on games, then that's what they are doing. It'll be interesting, that's for sure. EDIT: And there's something to keep in mind - once upon a time, Nintendo was innovative and the company everyone loved. Then they controlled the market and became stagnant until they were humbled by Sony and the PS1. Nintendo is making all the right moves and saying all the right things now - but will it last if they take any sizable chunk of the market? 
I'm sorry, could you point me to those "demographics?"  I'd appreciate it.
Spend any reasonable time on this site and it becomes fairly obvious where different people stand.
&gt; But what was significant about what Colbert did wasn't what he did, but **where** and how. The Daily Show and Colbert Report offer caustic sendups of politicians all the time... but to say it to the face of arguably the world's most powerful man, that's really something. Wasn't everyone else there doing the same thing? I'm just not sure why its such an amazing thing that someone stood up to Bush. He's a man like everyone else. It'd actually be more respectful and have more of an impact to sit down with him and discuss with him problems with his policies or views vs getting funnies out of it. You can get excited about this all you want, but will it change how Bush works? The way to get to people's hearts and to change their opinions is not by offending them.
&gt;Destiny Shugrue, 11, of Bowie, in her first year at the school, said: "I hang out, draw, go on the computer, play a few games. Just be myself. **I actually read a lot. Every morning I get up saying, 'Yay, I'm going to school!' "** Does anything more need to be said?
Give me some numbers. You say you have "demographics." Where are they? Without anything to back up your claims, you have nothing.  Shocker.
Answer, no. In my experience, nothing like this has ever happened before at the correspondent's dinner. Never. And I actually challenge you to find anything similar at that event.  And the reason why it's amazing is: (1) he's George Bush, and he doesn't do non-scripted events often and (2) he's the President, and people don't ordinarily mock the President to his face.  Sadly, no, it won't change anything about how "Bush works." Nothing will change him, unfortunately. 
C#, a little Python, Perl, and Lua
python
[off-topic]  That's a great cs joke, so it's worth noting a more accurate version: It was Bill's first day in the prison lunchroom. A guy at the next table stood up and shouted "Number 39!" Everyone burst into laughter.  A guy at the table behind him stood up and shouted "Number 324!" Again they cheered and clapped.  A guy on Bill's table stood up and called "Number 91!" and everyone giggled and clapped again. "Whats going on here?" Bill enquired of one of the inmates.  "It's joke-telling time on Tuesdays," he said, "but we've only got one joke book in the prison library and we've all read it, so rather that making us hear the jokes over and over we just call out the numbers.  If everyone likes the number they clap or laugh." Another prisoner stood up and called "Number 184!" but no-one laughed. "Number 474!" he yelled, but still no-one laughed.  "Number 628!" he mumbled.  The prisoners began to shout at him to sit down. "What happened to him?" asked Bill.  "Well" said the fellow inmate "some people can tell 'em and some people can't." [via](http://www.gumnut.com/pub/viewmessages.cfm?forum=16&amp;topic=10479) [google cache](http://72.14.203.104/search?q=cache:aYExOeuBl9oJ:www.gumnut.com/pub/viewmessages.cfm%3Fforum%3D16%26topic%3D10479)
That ending's good! In the version my dad used to tell, the new guy tries calling out his own number. Everyone cracks up majorly, and he asks why they're laughing so hard. "We hadn't heard that one before!"
Excellent article. Definitely one of PG's better (and more useful) pieces.  Should be required reading for all software startup founders. I have to (grudgingly) admit.  When he's on, he's on. 
Stephen Colbert has balls of steel. 
What, exactly, is so great about mocking the President face-to-face. Any retaliation would hurt the President more than it would Colbert; it's not like Bush can talk back or threaten or anything else. In fact, there really aren't many people it's easier to criticize than President Bush. So it was (really, brilliantly) funny, but it defeinitely wasn't brave.
Well, yeah, actually, it might. Parents, unfortunately, make choices for their children. One of these choices is where to send them to school. So parents have to choose whether a) they care more about the kids' long-term or short-term happiness, and if they care more about long-term, b) will this kind of non-education help that? I submit that it won't, as evidenced by the failure of most to attend college, and the reasonably widely held (including by me) belief that succeeding in college is a good measure of success in life. The public school system is crap, yes, but is it as bad as no school at all?
So oil profits are up. Because supply is down and demand is up. That's free market economics 101, right? Kimberly Strassel tried to [tell Jon Stewart this](http://www.comedycentral.com/sitewide/media_player/play.jhtml?itemId=63001) (video), even if he seemed reluctant to understand her. Why the outrage? People profit during war, what is wrong with this? Or are people concerned that big oil now has an incentive to continue the war?
I'm not buying it. I enjoy the Colbert Report (and C-SPAN!) but I can hardly say its gutsy to roast the President at a dinner designed to do just that. Indeed, this was actually his least impressive performance I've seen and didn't get a very positive endorsement from the audience which was composed of people who consider Bush to be evil incarnate. Helen Thomas is case in point. I don't see how anyone can even pretend she's a journalist any more. The video he presented, while designed to mock the president's views and the press secretary, actually demonstrated the viciousness and unprofessionalism of our press by showing cuts of leading "journalists" acting like condesending spoiled brats with clear agendas and making demands they have no right to be making. Perhaps that's why they didn't laugh so much?
A startup is like walking on your hands.  A startup is like a pass/fail course.  A startup is like a small boat in the open sea.  A startup is like a mosquito.  A startup is like a hang-glider launch. No. A startup is like being a mosquito trying to fly a hanglider-boat while waking on your hands and not failing school. 
i'll be in auckland in about 10 days .. gotta be sure to drop by the hospital and pay old keithy a visit.  in fiji after that actually - might find the legendary palm tree that caused his demise.
&gt; The singular of data is datum. Not in English: "..given the variety and irregularity of English plural constructions, there seem to be no grounds for arguing that data is incorrect as a singular mass noun in English." http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Data#Usage_in_English
&gt; It'd actually be more respectful and have more of an impact to sit down with him and discuss with him problems with his policies or views vs getting funnies out of it. Hmm. Yes. So many people who disagree with him have this opportunity.
Fascinating. Would be interesting if a car's dashboard would track that and alert you to when it's using consuming more fuel than normal.
Why not? Visicalc came out in 1979 and was a huge hit: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Visicalc
&gt; [He] didn't get a very positive endorsement from the audience which was composed of people who consider Bush to be evil incarnate. Yes, but this was because he spent equal time digging into the press. This might be the least funny thing Colbert will ever do. That's because he went so far over the line with everyone in the audience. Absolutely gutsy. He could have attempted to get the audience excited about him dissing Bush, but he chose not to by harassing them brutally as well.
Yes, but it is my impression that personal computers were not at all widespread at that time. They were used by hobbyists and some businesses, but the vast majority of people didn't own one themselves.
I wonder how much the average salary has increased in the last 20 years compared with inflation?
By 1979 computers like the Apple II and Commodore PET where quite widespread in homes and businesses. Certainly nothing like today, but they were far from rare. For instance 78,000 Apple IIs where sold by September 1980: http://oldcomputers.net/appleii.html
Data is also an acceptable singular for data.  As is datum... http://dictionary.reference.com/search?q=datum
Thank you for a good link, Nearfar~ I just got out of school last year and wasn't at all confident in myself being a young grad, and was caught off guard by my employer neogotiating a salary with me.  I told him how much money I would need to live, and he then based on that hourly wage calcuated a yearly figure for me, and then when I was hired i was put on a probationary salary  below what I told him I will need.  I got a raise later but it's still about 15 cents short of what I originally told him. Lesson well learned... If only I'd read this before. thanks again tho =)
Curious, what do you think is "anti-semitic" about the linked article?
I had a long, drawn-out argument typed out before I realized: Nintendo is in a different market than Sony and Microsoft, even though it doesn't look like that. Sony and Microsoft make consoles that appeal to everyone who cares how the same "updated" football game will look on the big expensive TV they just bought and how clean the animation of that Nazi guard was as he fell to the ground in a remake of the same old World War II game. Nintendo makes consoles and handhelds that appeal to people who want to have fun in a relaxed manner. I live on a technology-based campus and I see groups of people sitting in the Student Union playing DS games against each other, and yet I haven't seen anyone on campus with a PSP in the two years I've been here. Does Nintendo really need to take a chunk out of the other market? Not at all.
Media's power to choose the news : that is the real topic here.  "This is the power of the media to choose the news, to decide when and how to shield Bush from negative publicity. Sins of omission can be just as bad as sins of commission."  IMHO nobody can beat the Chinese at that. Just try [Radio china international](http://en.chinabroadcast.cn/) - nothing is ever wrong in China !
&gt; There's also the question of competition. With the likes of Ruby on Rails in the neighborhood, I too would be concerned about delivering a competitive web-developing product. Even at that, Y-combinator is funding would-be Arc-competitors like Infogami. Huh? Since when would Arc (a programming language) be directly competing against Ruby on Rails (a web development framework) or Infogami (a web site)?
*sigh* Alt+0153 (on num pad) Both Google and Yahoo return the same first result for "character alt code" (w/o quotes).
Oooh. That was great too.
I'd like to hazard a guess on PG's reasons for not releasing Arc. A programming language is not software. You don't want to 'keep pumping out features'.  The collaboration architecture you choose will depend on your goals. Open source collaboration isn't good for everything. When designing a language, it reduces to [design by committee](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Design_by_committee). Designing a language by committee won't yield a parsimonious language, which is one of Arc's major goals. And at least in the beginning any language designer must worry about energy-dissipative forks. Focussing on the implementation with questions like, "Will it be open source?" misses this point. Arc isn't an implementation, it's a design. Arc is not being developed for profit. Instead, [it's an intellectual exercise](http://paulgraham.com/hundred.html).  These statements sound more certain than they are. For example, I don't truly understand all the ways in which programming languages are not software.  But the fact that the name 'Arc' doesn't contain 'lisp' suggests that PG is concerned with issues of image and language culture, and wants to start afresh.
To paraphrase our esteemed Secretary of Defense - You go to a funeral with the buglers you have, not the buglers you wish you had. Ok, I'm just mocking Don, but seriously, there simply aren't enough musicians in the military anymore. Army musicians were tasked with guarding POW's in the first Iraq war. I don't imagine many of them clamoring for more of that action...
If you've been running your own business and claiming gas and mileage for tax purposes, I imagine you would probably keep pretty good records. There are a lot of pack rats out there.
Delphi
It wasn't that funny. It was rather heavyhanded, and humor does need a delicate touch. And the film at the end just dragged on and on long after it had made its point.
I see where you are coming from and yes most everyone will eventually care whether you have a degree from a college or not. This school is the far end of the non-structured school, and like one of the parents in the article mentioned, it'll be good for some kids and not so good for others.  Thomas Edison would've loved this school.  
Boy, this page is a mess. How about a voting system? Mod up the languages you use; if one isn't in the list, add it. (Please don't mod down a language you don't use, but you can mod down this comment if you want.) Here we go: *Edit: Sorry for taking up so much space on the page...*
C
C++
Java
Perl
PHP
Python
Ruby
XML
C#
SQL
I don't think there's enough statistics to make a meaningful generalization for a small school that started in 1998 with 33 students.  The original Sudbuy School in Massachusettes sends about 80% of its graduates to college on average [(see FAQ)](http://www.sudval.org/01_abou_09.html  ), with a claimed corrrelation between number of years spent there and likelyhood of going to college. Short-term vs. long-term happiness is often a false dichotomy.  I'm not sure how much later "success" (which it sounds like you define by income) is required to make up for having your love of learning eroded in one of America's education factories.
I don't think that will help. His point makes him look dumb too.
haha indeed - i am bemused by other peoples' demands for detailed and specific information yet positing no opinions of their own (thus aleviating any need for them to provide supporting documentation of their own). I will, however, attempt to ask for a little extra explanation in a more intellectually honest manner. my understanding is that the price of energy (mainly oil) is a major contributor to the cost of goods (and thus the rate of inflation) and is hard to factor out since its rather invasive in the cost of both manufacturing and delivering most goods. therefore, unless some sort of mechanism for eliminating its impact from the generated inflation rate has been performed, you should see its application damper the resulting prices in a manner that is artifically significant. its a bit like saying that gas prices aren't so high if you factor in the cost of gas. :) obviously that doesn't account for everything but it needs to be accounted for in order for this chart to be meaningful. also, the timeline selected is intersting when you consider that the period up to the early 80s had some of the highest inflation and gas prices in our history so we clearly appear to be approaching historic highs under any system of measurement.  that said - i think its the velocity of gas price increases that's more disconcerting than anything else. wonder how long it will last...
The article mentions Friedrich von Hayek as a major influence on the US.  Trust me (or don't, just think about it), the "crony capitalism" in the US is a direct result of *ignoring* Hayek and Austrian economics in general. Austrians simply make a point of holding government (politicians) to the same standards as the free market (private citizens).  When you model politicians economically as normal, self-interested beings, the whole problem with government becomes clear -- when you give a person power, they will use it to help themselves.  In the case of politicians, this almost always involves helping or pretending to help their constituents/special interests at the expense of other citizens.  When you add this all up, the net result is far worse than if no politicians were "helping", because each interference in the economy destroys wealth as wealth is shifted around.  Not to mention that the government will always benefit the rich, since they can essentially buy coercive force from legislators. If people paid attention to Hayek, the government would be far smaller than it is today, or even non-existent.  But people who benefit from the current system will continue to blame "market failure" for society's ills, while ignoring far more damaging and ubiquitous "government failure".
ksh
Python, with some shell and perl thrown in. I'll be doing a lot more C soon though.
THANK you!  I would add that Galbraith is not alone in treating government agents as somehow angelically immune to everything we know about how people act in a free market.  Many people, including economists, have it drilled into them that the government can be relied upon to fix the free market when it's not perfect.  They never question what happens when you try to model the political economy, and realize that society is always in a state of anarchy, it's just that only politicans get to enjoy it.
Not even all 40-ish conservatives like Bush -- and at least one of us reads reddit...
a little research would reveal the answers to your questions. generally inflation is determined based on fairly objective measurements of (admittably subjective) data that has been agreed upon and is publically available.
I normally disagree with jesusphreak on policy issues, but I would definately agree with him here. Colbert resonated with me with this humor, but I do not expect the whole of America to vibe with it. Just the few million that like Southpark, the Daily Show and of course the Colbert Report
Keyword Tool
This is yet another annoying thing about Rand fanboys. They think if you don't agree with her you either 1) haven't read her in all her glory or 2) are stupid/evil/immoral/commie (which all are roughly synonymous in Rand fanboy minds). 
&gt; This is the power of the media to choose the news, to decide when and how to ...  &gt; Sins of omission can be just as bad as sins of commission.  &gt; ... sycophantic media establishment bending over backwards to accommodate ... regurgitate pro-[Them] and anti-[Us] spin &gt; I urge readers to pick up a copy of [Unknown Author]'s new book ... *[Buzzword: The Real Title Is The Subtitle]*. This is really striking.  You hear exactly the same commentary from conservative bloggers when their talking points don't get reiterated.  The MSM was a week late in covering the Swift Boat Ads.  Not enough Good News gets reported from Iraq, where we're actually winning on the ground.  Hurricane Katrina was sensationally over-reported  by a liberal press corps that was out for blood. You're helping the terrorists if you can't rise above reflexive Manichaeism.
Got 3 points 2 weeks ago here: http://reddit.com/info/4hm7/comments
Wow, that bit of inspiration was just what I needed.  Now if someone could just inspire me to study for finals..
Why is this coming in the rss feed?
The reddit guys regretted moving to Python? Interesting...
And?  Is it not possible to live a fulfulling, happy, and financially successful life without going to college? _Edit:  And you're forgetting (well, I did, too), that "several" others (besides the three) went on to community colleges -- the 3 out of 16 count was just for 4-year colleges.  Also, Sudbury students have a habit of not going directly to college, so several of those who have not yet gone may still go at some point, though that's hard to say._ Some other stats: in a study of the original Sudbury school, something like 70% of students attended a 4 year college after leaving Sudbury (I believe the relevant figure for traditional high schools is around 60%), so don't be assuming that only a few go to college with this sort of upbringing. _Edit: karcass says that 80% go on to college -- I think the stat he quotes includes 2 year colleges and such_
In as much as in a 'fun house' kids don't forget how to learn on their own and direct their own lives -- and traditional schools are very good at helping students learn how to be a part of a system -- I think I'd be better off now if I'd been left at a fun house instead of a normal school.
You can get some of those cheaper at ebay or engconcepts. I have a few. Wrap them in something if you're going to mess with them together. To separate them if they come together, put one on a strong table edge and push the other down. The thing is, there's not all that much to do with them once you get over the "huh huh cool" - like Tesla coils, but more so.
Either that or proof that Google is wrong in 2006.  My money's on the latter.
Oh, and when you're pulling large ones apart, you can pull them apart and then figure they've stopped attracting, but they haven't, and you can't compensate fast enough. So pull them far apart when you're separating them. I have a bunch of 1 inch cube ones, smaller ones are probably less trouble. One use I did find for my one inch ones is as studfinders. =)
Good point. While the GGP had no clue, it seems I had only slightly more clue. I thought the rate of inflation was more easily measurable, without giving it enough thought.
Java, PHP, SQL, XML, Javascript and XHTML
Well, OK, they were relatively popular. However, given how many millions of people occupied the US in 1980, compared to the 78,000 Apple IIs, it seems reasonable to say that it is improbable that any one particular person owned a computer with spreadsheet capability in 1979. No?
Primarily C++ with some Ruby
Have you ever gone up and said things to make an audience angry at you?  I know I never have, but for me even confronting one person, looking at them, and telling them their flaws can be difficult.  To do what he did was indeed ballsy.
It is.  There's a good reason, though.  If I owned a '79 Corvette, I hope I'd be smart enough to take great care of it too. "1979 Chevrolet Corvette Gasoline Usage History When I got my 'vette, the gas gauge wasn't working so I kept close tabs on the gas I was putting in the car. This turned into a habit so I ended up recording the date, odometer reading, gallons and cost every time I put gas in the car. Some of that data is given below. A complete history of local gas prices in Texas from 1979 to now is also available.  Usage Summary  * Total miles: 143,377.3   * Number of times gas added: 742   * Total gallons: 10,865.663   * Total cost: $13,275.31   * Avg. price: $1.22/gallon   * Avg. MPG: 13.209   * Avg. speed: 0.952 mph " http://www.randomuseless.info/corvette/gas/default.html
Obviously, the definition of long-term success is up for philosophical and probably unproductive debate. Parents probably won't have any way of knowing what will make their kids happy in the long term. However, it seems that this non-school takes away more long-term possibilities than public school. Public school combined with an undirected student produces a reasonable probability of finding direction in late high school or college and producing a high-income/high-prestige life, if the student so desires. Non-school combined with an undirected student produces a much lower probability of same, I think you would agree. On the other hand, going in the other direction, non-school to public school removes fewer possiblities than it adds. I can't think of anything that's possible at age 35 given non-school that isn't possible given public school.    Short-term vs. long-term may sometimes be a false dichotomy, but here it seems to be a meaningful dichotomy.
wow!
&gt;Non-school combined with an undirected student produces a much lower probability of same, I think you would agree. No, I don't.  Fairfield is pretty new (hey, they only have 16 graduates so far), so it's hard to get meaningful statistics from them.  But plenty of kids from Sudbury (which Fairfield is based on) go to college, including ivy league schools, so I really don't see how their long-term options are being limited in any way.
You're right about the HTTP cache - it sucks. The trouble is that the reason the HTTP cache sucks applies to the Flash storage system too.  What sucks is hidden state that the average user cannot manage and hence cannot rely on.  Sure, a smart user can figure it out - but not all your users are going to be smart.
Answers in order: (a) no, (b) some random bureaucrat, (c) to make the current administration look better, and (d) yes.
Key point was the undirected student part. As in, student who doesn't know what he's interested in yet, and therefore is not all that motivated to study any particular subject. The students from Sudbury who went to nice colleges probably were quite directed, which meant that they studied hard and so on despite not being forced to. What I'm saying is that mandatory study of certain subjects provides a useful safety net for those who don't figure out what they want until later. I can easily imagine a situation where I went to one of these schools, did nothing in particular, and then when I was 21 working somewhere, I discovered a passion for mathematics; I would rather regret my earlier choices, but further, I would be somewhat annoyed at my parents for forcing these choices on me when I was so young.    Edit: It may seem that I am actively in favor of the current public schooling system. I'm not; I'm just in favor of some sort of mandatory study of standard subjects not including literary analysis until some age between 13 and 18.
That's only because Python wasn't invented yet...
Have absolutely nothing against Americans at all, we are all God's people. In a recent Times article one nice American lady told how she had to say she was Canadian because of the hostility she received in London.  The writer of this article obviously lives in a different world isolated from the real Britain. Has he been 'up north' in amongst the savages or does he think that London is at the centre of all English Culture? :-)
Of course, Netscape didn't have the high-profile complement sites like GMail and Google Local to help integrate things into its calendar (or if they did they certainly didn't have as large of a userbase).  Right now if someone sends me a note with something that looks like an invitation to something at a specific time (it's even clever enough to have figured out "6pm tomorrow" in my email), it puts an "Add to Calendar" link off to the side so I can add that event to my calendar.  Then, I can have it send me a reminder via email or even SMS to my cell phone.  Whereas Google's Calendar is another component in a larger suite of already-established products, I think Netscape tried to introduce their calendar without quite the supporting cast.
No, jesusfreak is right. It wasn't ignored, and think of the demographics of traditional news sources. They are businesses, remember. Frankly, while I do NOT like Bush and do like Colbert, it was uncomfortable to watch. Colbert took quite a few cheap shots that really weren't very clever and were flat out mean-spirited. For instance, the hindenburg comment. ...And I am a comp sci 20 something libertarian atheist. But... Yah. Very important speach. Go Colbert!
He's not trying to change Bush's opinion, he's trying to sway the audience.  Just like like flamewars here, or on Slashdot, or Usenet. Like most people, I've never changed my opinion as the result of getting a good flaming, but I have when lurking.
I hope you won't waste your beer this way.
Yeah .net doesnt count, as its so common in website and email addresses. I put in COM, to see how many jobs are looking for experience with the Component Object Model and it hit the roof (i.e. makes about as much sense as .net). Putting in c and c++ shows that people are still looking for real programmers rather than script kiddies.
"Sure, the neighbors concede, they didn't actually see any nudity or obscene activity, but the mere idea that it was going on next door bothered them." Oh no! That sounds simply terible. Those poor people having to be bothered with what people do legally in the privacy of their home. "what was happening on their street at holiday time just didn't seem right." Oh... Well, I guess I was wrong to be sarcastic. Something not seeming right is a totally legitimate excuse to superceed the freedoms of expression and freedoms of belief.
i hate the sun
could more economists die? please?
&gt; Netscape didn't have the high-profile complement sites like GMail and Google Local to help integrate things into its calendar Are you nuts? From 1995-1998 most the world's browsers went straight to netscape.com upon opening. netscape.com also maintained a pretty healthy ranking right through to 2002 (with a comeback in 2005 for some reason): http://www.alexa.com/data/details/traffic_details?&amp;compare_sites=&amp;y=t&amp;q=&amp;size=medium&amp;range=max&amp;url=netscape.com Very good point about the lack of integration with other Netscape products though.
you know, this article is critical of god here. i'm surprised it has any up votes at all
huh? flaming? get it right, it is called hating. i have no idea what happened. maybe you should stop doing drugs.
Yeah, Microsoft has the habit of choosing non-searchable names for their products. Windows, .net, com, C# (usually tokenized as C), everything.
Uh, it seems incredibly likely that 78,000 people owned a computer with spreadsheet capability.  The odds of this guy being one of them, based on totally random chance, is about 1 in 3000.  And that's only counting Apple IIs.  Add in the other popular hobbyist computers and it doesn't seem all that improbable at all.
Bingo mate! (et a toi aussi jesusphreak!)
Wrong century buddy. Almost all regimes that removed their aristocracy and/or industrialists then went on to create regimes orders of magnitude worse than before, such as: - Russia  - China  - France under Napoleon  - Cuba  - North Korea  - Vietnam  - Iran  - Afghanistan After witnessing those regimes no wonder no one really cares about anti-capitalist ideas anymore. I don't particularly like aristocracy - but I like them a hell of a lot more than Stalin, Kim Jong Il and so on.
If this gets popular enough, he'll probably tell you himself, but just in case, how about the simple explanation? He's not working on it; he's working on Y Combinator. 
1. I disagree with some of the things that are allowed by American law.  2. I live in America.  3. Therefore, American laws should change in order to accomodate me. Seriously, if they don't think free speech, free worship, and gun and property rights are good things, what the hell are they doing in the USA?
That's deep, man.
Yeah and a guy who is interested in keeping meticulous records is much more likely to have a computer in 1979 than the average person.
Hold your horses, cowboy! You should wait a bit to see how is the rest of guy's career going to come out. Don't be surprised to see im perform in cheap roadside bar in few years or something like that. If I'm wrong then, your enthusiasm now is OK. Somehow I feel different. 
&gt;First, Arc probably won't be open source. If it were open source, then it could be assumed that Paul's massive following of hackers would jump on it, fix up the rough spots within the first week or two, and proclaim it to be the next best thing since Common Lisp. But he'd still have to work hard. Worse, he'd have to work fast. Design decisions shouldn't be rushed. But if the spec (which in this case means the source as well) is the least bit incomplete when it's released, that's what he'll have to do in order to satisfy the hoarde. Given what PG's written on the subject, I think it's pretty safe to say that he won't make Arc closed-source. I'd go so far as to say that if he does, it'll probably just be a sign of advanced dementia.
it's kind of a boring photo.
He addresses this: &gt;But to me the most telling aspect of Americanisation is anti-Americanism itself. Anti-Americanism, after all, is as American as its opposite. You will find few foreign countries as hostile to Bush as California. The most successful anti-Americans, like Michael Moore, are home-grown. Asked recently whether Americans were “greedy”, 64% of Brits agreed. But 70% of Americans chimed in agreement. Some 26% of Brits believe that Americans are “immoral”; 39% of Americans agreed!
I call bullsh*t. [Bush Pokes Fun at Himself at Correspondents' Dinner](http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,193709,00.html) The media didn't "choose" the news...how is this not the "truth"? Looks like Colbert was right, reality does have a liberal-bias. 
I understand what Ali G is doing, but he just isn't that funny and it doesn't offer much value.  So he's lampooning the rapper-wannabe.  Big deal. The Daily Show, and The Colbert Report are much better at this style of comedy.  Their satirical interviews actually reveal something about the positions of their interviewees.  Ali G just investigates how people respond when faced with a jackass. When faced with a jackass, its a perfectly viable and respectable to say "hey, you're a jackass, screw off" which is, essentially, what Rooney did.  A lot of people are too tolerant of fools.  I wish more of Ali G's interviewees responded like Rooney.
If I understand things write, Arc is going to be implemented on top of CL. Considering there are quite a few CL implementations, it's not too clear to me if it is possible to produce a cross-platform Arc that would be usable under several CLs under several incarnations, and making binaries every time the image formats change does not seem an intelligent way to use one's time. 
This is becoming a cultural phenomenon. Check out http://thankyoustephencolbert.org/wordpress/
Free Domain. Claim your domain today.
Exactly.  Languages need benevolent dictators, lest they turn into a designed-by-committee muddle.
I think the fact, that the President was visibly shaken, is what makes this news. You could also see from the reactions from the audience that there was something unusual going on. Either Colbert went too far or he hit the sweet point. Either way, it's news.
Certainly it can include those cases, as a side effect.
I prefer that ending. But they're both good.
Three reasons why it's not coming out anytime soon: 1. Making a programming language is hard 2. Paul is busy doing other stuff (Y Combinator) that he finds more meaningful 3. The main person helping him implement it (in the past) is working at a startup and is plenty busy right now Now, the 14 reasons why it doesn't matter if Arc comes out...
As I understand it, they've developed a prototype of arc in CL, in order to get the language right, but are now (in the broadest sense of 'now') working on an interpreter which will be what actually gets released. I'm guessing the interpreter will be in c, so that it will be easier to make it cross platform, fast (gasp!) and have access to a wealth of libraries. Also, imagine the ffi nightmares if it was written in cl.
&gt;In my experience, nothing like this has ever happened  &gt;before at the correspondent's dinner. Never. And I  &gt;actually challenge you to find anything similar  &gt;at that event. [Don Imus](http://tinyurl.com/etaj2) The correspondent's dinner is meant to be a roast of the President and other politicians the press has to cover so seriously the rest of the year. It would have been shocking if Colbert *hadn't* "mocked the President to his face". Maybe his routine just tanked.
What really frustrates me is that he's not taking his own advice (and ignoring Eric Raymond) about the release of arc. &gt;this is why I haven't released Arc. The moment I do, I'll have people nagging me for features. Yes arc is not a startup, but I think the advice still holds true. The whole point of oss is that anyone can add features, and with arc there will be a swarm of people eager to get hacking.  If the reason he's not released arc is really "people nagging me for features" this implies he has a minimal working version (otherwise the reason would be "it doesn;t work yet"). So why not just put it out there? Let us play with it.
Here's a perfect response for the porn shooters:  "Today we are asking the Court for an injunction prohibiting sexual activity in the marital beds of these wrinkled, proper, middle-aged neighbors of ours.  The mere thought of what is going on next door bothers us." :-)
Ok, I guess I shouldn't start typing so early in the morning.  If you wish to mock my careless spelling, please do so here.
A link to a blog that copied from another blog that links to the REAL site:  http://officelive.microsoft.com/
Don't fret; the sun hates you back.
Where on earth did they get a copy of OS 9 with which to make those screen shots?
Perhaps he hasn't released it because he has a strong perfectionistic streak.  At this point, though, most of the available evidence points to PG liking to write and talk more than hack.
Just one question: Do you have kids yet?
I disagree. I think that we are more then the sum of our molecules/atoms/quarks/... The mere fact that I think proves my point... I think...
I loved the joke. I apologize if my hyperbole gave you the wrong impression. I liked the joke so much I forwarded it to friends. for those of you who missed it:  ------------------------------------------------------  On his trip to Great Britain, George Bush had a meeting with Queen Elizabeth. He asked her, "How does one manage to run a country so smoothly?" "That`s easy," she replied, "You surround yourself with intelligent ministers and advisors." "But how can I tell whether they are intelligent or not?" he inquired. "You ask them a riddle," she replied, and with that she pressed a button and said, "Would you please send Tony Blair in." When Blair arrived, the Queen said, "I have a riddle for you to answer for me. Your parents had a child and it was not your sister and it was not your brother. Who was this child?" Blair replied, "That`s easy. The child was me." "Very good," said the Queen, "You may go now." So President Bush went back to Washington and called in his chief of staff, Karl Rove. He said to him, "I have a riddle for you, and the answer is very important. Your parents had a child and it was not your sister and it was not your brother. Who was this child?" Rove replied, "Yes, it is clearly very important that we determine the answer, as no child must be left behind. Can I deliberate on this for a while?" "Yes," said Bush, "I'll give you four hours to come up with the answer." So Rove went and called a meeting of the White House Staff, and asked them the riddle. But after much discussion and many suggestions, none of them had a satisfactory answer. So he was quite upset, not knowing what he would tell the President. As Rove was walking back to the Oval Office he saw former Secretary of State Colin Powell approaching him. So he said, "Mr. Secretary, can you answer this riddle for me. Your parents had a child and  it was not your sister and it was not your brother. Who was the child? " "That's easy," said Powell, "The child was me." "Oh thank you," said Rove, "You may just have saved me my job!" So Rove went in to the Oval Office and said to President Bush, "I think I know the answer to your riddle. "The child was Colin Powell!" "No, you idiot!" shouted Bush, "The child was Tony Blair! You're fired!" 
I especially like [Roger, Gary and Bob](http://www.povray.org/community/hof/3b.php)!
starry!
this should be called "the top 50 restaurants you probably never heard of and will never eat at". I'll file this one under "who cares".
"Nothing worse could happen." - I thought there was a serious risk of the whole reactor exploding?
I was really interested in Arc at one point, but... you've got to move on. Arc is clearly not the center of PG's world anymore, and I don't think it has much of a shot as a secondary hobby.
When I clicked the link, I only saw one short paragraph about whet sugarnews is, that's it. The rest of the page was blank. Is that the joke? that there is no happy news?
How were any of his shots 'cheap' exactly? Methinks that all his biting commentary had substance.
8 minutes late.
I get the impression the porn producers are much more friendly people than those neighbours...
Looks like a [white blood cell](http://www.fi.edu/biosci/blood/white.html).  I have about 50 billion.
Well-written, good looking and regularly updated mobile and handheld gaming site
It's not insane, but it does make this very poor reporting.  Especially since it is not controlled for location, and the locations that are mentioned are all in one area of the country.  This is majorly bogus science.  Why not look at [actual numbers](http://zfacts.com/p/35.html)?
You're falling victim to the black or white classification yourself. The sacks of shit that don't deserve to live are those that advocate the glorification and worship of aristocracy.  Those that would excuse their right to enslave and steal on the grounds that capital is useful.  I in no way deny that Rich people are useful, and should be allowed to help society in whatever way they can. This article is saying that rich people have no motivation for evil.  There is plenty of evil that can be committed without violating criminal codes.  Murdering 100s of thousands included.  Halliburton will never face consequences for you murdering innocent Iraqis, and the more you bomb, the more business it gets.  Sacks of shit that deny this, or excuse the sacks of shit that deny this don't deserve to live.  The invasion of Iraq was primarily motivated by the profit opportunities of those who control the deciders. Sacks of shit that offer the false choice between rule by enron and halliburton or communist tyranny don't deserve to live either.
"Nintendo is not doing the Wii like this because they love games." Says you. How can you presume to know such information? Do you somehow have an insider's connection into Nintendo and you know the *real* reason why they're producing the Wii? Obviously, Nintendo is a for-profit company, that much is clear. Perhaps they're not even interested in rivaling with companies that have a different outlook on videogames? Who knows. I just find it midly humorous to see clamor grand claims about their intentions.
An Interesting look at the Death Penalty and the Iraq War
it's kind of a boring comment.
I forwarded the link to some science teacher friends. good find!
I posted the same article 7hrs earlier http://reddit.com/info/57i0/comments
Any mirror? ip?
That sun looks so raw in that photo.  Very different from the well-formed circle in the sky that I see every day.
I think the American Propaganda system is much better than the chinese...it works even without direct government intervention.
Currently, 31/150 identified, rose from 24 over the weekend.
''"We have to accept spelling is not fixed and can change over the years," said Catherine Soanes, of Oxford Dictionaries.'' Duh. English has always been defined by usage. The OED, at its start, was a compendium of usage.  We don't have language committees like the French.
Enough on Colbert.
Start of the Preamble:  "The Constitution Party gratefully acknowledges the blessing of our Lord and Savior Jesus Christ as Creator, Preserver and Ruler of the Universe and of these United States. We hereby appeal to Him for mercy, aid, comfort, guidance and the protection of His Providence as we work to restore and preserve these United States." I don't think I will like a party who thinks this is a good first sentence (even if they just put it in there to get the religious voters).
Because it changes your perspective on risks. I wouldn't be very comfortable with a porn shoot on my block either.
I too always marvel that things like this can be done in America w/o fear of gov. retaliation.  As for Colbert having "big balls", colour me unimpressed.  If he, on national TV, drew cartoons insulting Islam, and dressed up like Mohammed, that would be ballsy...
Yeah, obviously much worse. Russia: before the revolution everyone was happy, literacy was high and the czar maintained a constitutional government under the rule of law (NOT). China: not sure about this one, but I doubt people were having a particularly fun time there either. France under Napoleon: first there's a bit of a misconception here since the revolution preceeded Napoleon and if we'd have to characterize his rule we could say he recreated an aristocracy rather than the opposite. Insignificant things such as reality aside, obviously the bulk of the French people were better off without due process, a stratified legal system that made it OK to kill peasants for fun, and a tax structure which relied on the poor to sustain the state which benefited the wealthy (nobles and the Church). That must be why the French, a few hundred years later and with time to judge the merits of the thing dispassionately hate their revolution so much. (NOT) I don't know enough of the other cases you present to judge one way or the other. 
Just curious -- is that because of the content, or are you worried about some of the people your kids might run in to? I think it might be reasonable to worry about your pretty 18 year old daughter, but otherwise -- these aren't peadophiles.
I'll let you in on a secret.  People on your block are already having sex.
prerequisite might not be totally true, but yes, failure does help
Ever notice how similar Norwegian sounds to Middle English? Sound clip of Middle English here: http://www.brainshrub.com/english-only (The article the clip is in is pretty good as well.)
Which risks are you speaking of?
JBolton -- "This atmosphere is like a bubble. It is like a twilight zone. Things that happen here don't reflect the reality in the rest of the world." This is why the left-wing trippers love the place.
It seems like the focus of art is either to imitate nature or, when depicting man-made stuff, eliminate nature.
Why did they mention the Bay Bridge, but not the Golden Gate ... ?
At least the title is accurate.
Not [always](http://pruned.blogspot.com/2005/06/rosemary-laing-and-marvelous.html).
The war on drugs is a lot older then the war on terror.
yes but these are generally just spelling mistakes of ignorance. they show the writer repeating what he thought he heard and not understanding its meaning or source. of course, i would have missed about three quarters of these myself!
No, but anecdotally a lot of them _are_ drug users, for example. Like it or not, part of what people are picking when they buy a home is the neighborhood. Having a porn shoot across the street changes your neighbors pretty drastically, albeit for a short time.
But when the man does something completely wonderful like this, you are still too small minded to acknowledge the good.  Dick Cheney is not some evil cartoon villain incapable of doing good in the world.  Once again the left shows their arrogance, disrespect, and dishonesty.
&gt; Professor Donald Broom, of the University of Cambridge's School of Veterinary Medicine, said: "The more we look at the cognitive abilities of animals, the more advanced they appear, and the biggest leap of all has been with parrots." Parrots' vocal abilities allow them to talk to us in a way that we can understand. Any creature that we can understand  appears smarter than those that we can't. It doesn't mean parrots are the smartest. The day we can decipher dolphin calls we may be in for a surprise. That said, this is very neat!
The video lecture really blew my mind. It is really amazing that a lot of things we are struggeling with today (such as collaborative information management) have been done years ago.
Do you really think that you know your neighbors well enough to think that you are justified to think that the film crew changes your neighborhood ethical and moral perspective qualitatively? Happy dreams.
Personally I don't think we can stop ourselves from wiping out humanity long enough to worry about the sun "running out".
Nintendo is in a different market to sony and microsoft: they make fun innovative games and they make profits.    
beautiful!
No, there's a lot more that needs to be said about marketing. On the other hand, plenty has been said that bears repeating.  Do you want to sit back for endless enlightenment, or do you want to start putting the principles into practice to see how they work?  Maybe a motivational speech is what you need.
being ignorant is a good reason to not provide an opinion, yes. however, its an even better reason to not not only demonstrate your ignorance, but also how truly conceited one is by demanding people "define their terms" and then give them open ended assignments that would require a full thesis to address which the assigner clearly wouldn't understand anyway. you'll see a lot of this on sites like reddit where people emotionally want to disagree while appearing intellectual when in fact they demonstrate how truly vapid they are.
OK - so I'm sensitive - but with good reason! :)
You may have more drug-using neighbours than you might think. If they're harmless, they're also invisible. Also, I wonder whether porn-crews are any more drug-using than movie crews in general. Those people work insane hours. In the end, you can't really rationally convince a parent not to worry. :)
List of very useful tips for nokia mobile users...
My LPs of Middle English are unbearably scratched... Alvin Kernan writes that graduate students used to refer to some Swedish prof's version of Chaucer as the "By Yumpin Yimini" Chaucer, and that their confidence in his understanding of the ME sound system was undermined by equally well-argued but quite opposite writings by somebody else.   
&gt; N'kisi's remarkable abilities, which are said to include telepathy, Ummmmm
Right. It rocked America to about 1 on the Richter scale. Pop quiz for 5 attaboys: Where was the last college lacrosse-team scandal? No fair googling the answer. The last high school lacrosse scandal?   
Which languages do you speak of? Java was designed by a marketing campaign, the rest of the languages in widespread use (C, C++, Perl, PHP, Python, Ruby) all had an iron-fisted Asshole In Charge while they were germinating. Almost invariably, once a committee touches a language, it goes stale and starts to suck... 
tihs article is teh hawtness
From the article: "The best way to handle the search box, Google asserts, would be to give users a choice when they first start up Internet Explorer 7." Seriously - people who want choices don't chose Microsoft in the first place! I don't see how Google can complain that Microsoft's browser has a search control that defaults to Microsoft's search engine.
oh noes!  well-off college kids arrested for graffiti! Would the reaction be the same if they were non-white kids from a high school in some shitty part of the city, chalking their tags using a magic marker?
[Product page](http://www.ceremonialbugle.com/)
Cool!!!!!
This selection is not that good actually. In fact, if you take out the coloured lighting most of these bridges would look quite dull.
of course microsoft should use their own search engine in their browser.  It would be moronic not to, unless they were to decide to get out of the search engine business altogether, which seems unlikely. That said, I'll stick with google myself.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
It is not going to be fast. PG has this idea that Arc is like LISP 1.5. Small number of primitives and everything is build on top of that. Strings are cons lists. It is going to be many times slower than Ruby and Python and CL's.
Doesn't show any patterns in their blogs - shows a misunderstanding of the meaningful use of graphs. I think these graphs all simply reveal and increase in the number of blog postings over time. Would be meaningful to produce the charts as a percentage of all blogs having the chosen key word. Then, I think you'll find, significantly different patterns emerge.
The current best practices for rolling out a new language are currently being deployed by the Perl 6 community. Then again, not many people can summon intelligence, work ethics and casual humor at the level of Audrey Tang.
Amazingly there is another [similar site](http://www.democracy.wiki-law.org/index.php?title=United_States).  Will these two become the Gnome and KDE of future legislation?
Uh, no. Your post assumes that all contributions from everybody will be incorporated by PG into the 'official' version. Almost certainly they won't. Probably, if he releases it, people will hack on it, produce different versions with different features that are varyingly well-designed, and some people will use some versions etc. Thus, having the code out in the open won't endanger any deep design qualities of his code, since they don't have write access to his server.
Perfect timing for a Canadian going to Cuba (like me on Friday!)  Bless those Cubans for pegging it to the free-falling US dollar!
I found the last paragraph especially interesting, in the ligth of th recent comments that a culture where a hacker-startup would thrive is not found in Europe. &gt;We also chose our geography very carefully. We knew that placing product development in Estonia would stimulate innovation. Estonia is among the most technologically advanced Eastern European countries, and there is a spirit there that fosters change and advancement. Estonians delight in the openness of the Internet; they don't know borders or boundaries. This is the kind of progressive mind-set that shapes the development of disruptive technologies. This is the mind-set of innovation.
An article that proposes a new taxation law.
Here is a link to the paper regarding N'kisi's alleged telepathic abilities: http://www.scientificexploration.org/jse/articles/pdf/17.4_sheldrake_morgana.pdf
As a Spaniard i can tell you: That's most Spanish politicians for you: a bunch of shortsighted, self-interested, ignorant individuals more interested in turning a quick buck and scoring electoral votes than anything else. Especially when it comes to urbanism. It's sickening.
Yeah, but even if he doesn't work on it, he can release it and let us work on it.
This basically means that my adsense earning converted to euros will suck even more.
Vote up for yes, down for no.
"According to analysts"???   A major decline in the dollar (which would make the US more competitive) has been predicted for years--still hasn't happened.  It might, but this story makes it sound like it's reporting anything more than speculation.  It's not.
Vote up for yes, down for no.
Vote up for yes, down for no. edit:  Vote the ARTICLE up or down, not this comment, so I can see the details.  Or, tell me how to see the details of a comment.
It wasn't brave? Are you bloody kidding me? He got in front of a room with the most awarded and celebrated journalists in the country, was three feet away from the most powerful man in the world, that man's immediate advisors... and he openly mocked and ridiculed that man.  I've gotten up in a courtroom and argued before judges, I've seen friends of mine argue before circuit courts. And I taught speech 101 to college freshmen.  The average person would have keeled over in stagefright, saying what Colbert said. Colbert didn't, and that takes guts.
Let's make them.  Still no polling subreddit, but there is a workaround. [Are you in your 20's?](http://request.reddit.com/info/58en/comments#c58eo) [Are you male?](http://request.reddit.com/info/58el/comments#c58er) [Are you liberal](http://request.reddit.com/info/58ek/comments#c58es) Use score to see how balanced reddit is, and details to see how meaningful the statistics are. Four hours in, here's my super-scientific results (thanks for participating):  16 out of 16 voters are male,  10 out of 15 voters are in their twenties, and  6 out of 10 voters are self-described "liberals" (fewer votes because of the fuzzy definition of liberal?) [Help this poll hit the front page](http://reddit.com/info/594k/comments)
Tcl
Larry Wall is many things, Iron Fisted Asshole is not one of them.  "Guiding development"...I could live with that.
If  you think that the statistical profile of drug use by folks in such neighborhoods is indistinguishable from folks working in the adult film industry... well. We will have to agree to disagree.
Not to mention that is friggin' CHALK... How can it be graffiti if the rain washes it away? How stupid is this 'law' if it expressly includes CHALK?  So are they gonna start arresting 5-year-olds drawing smiley faces on the asphalt of cul-de-sacs???  Seriously, WTF?
I actually saw that televised. It was tame compared to this. Imus didn't go after the President like Colbert did.  Sorry, nice try. :-)
Well, duh. Everyone knows talking animals are so rare because they all just use telepathy.
Look, here's the thing. He can't possibly back up this claim, and your unscientific, _voluntary_ poll won't work, either.  Even if it were true that each and every comment were "liberal," and there's certainly no evidence for that, it would be meaningless without a random poll. After all, maybe just ten people make up the bulk of the comments. Maybe most people don't ever submit comments. Or, take the submissions. Maybe 90% of all submissions come from just 10% of those who submit things. And on and on. How could you possibly have thought this would prove his point? Odd.
.. and if \*each\* white blood cell did, that would be about 2.85 trillion votes.  Not only would the reddit servers be obliterated, so would our entire solar system.   However with all that karma, johnmudd would almost certainly be reborn as a god in the next universe.  I would expect him to reincarnate those that modded his comment up first.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
Here you can buy the Love/Hate T-shirt! &lt;a href="http://www.tagville.com/?id=4546"&gt;Love T-shirt&lt;/a&gt; &lt;a href="http://www.tagville.com/?id=4547"&gt;Hate T-shirt&lt;/a&gt; (Click "Change Print" for more options)
That didn't work very well =/ Let's try it this way: Love - http://www.tagville.com/?id=4546 Hate - http://www.tagville.com/?id=4547
Oh, Sheldrake again. Move along, nothing to see here.
He didn't just mock a sitting President to his face where he directly made fun of most of Bush's worst failures in a way that made it clear what a failure Bush has been.  That takes hefty balls by itself.  He also mocked the Washington press establishment to their faces.  Remember: &gt;Write that novel you got kicking around in your head – you know, the one about the intrepid Washington reporter with the courage to stand up to the administration? You know: fiction. Saying what he said where he said it took some serious cojones.
What a lot of management-speak PR-fluffery! It seems empty of real thought and merely generated automatically.
Any man who stands in front of the President of the United States and insults him to his face is going to shock and amuse a certain part of the audience, particularly the one at the age where we find mere transgression of boundaries endlessly fascinating. An older and more experienced and therefore jaded audience, such as the actual audience Colbert faced, may need something more. And that, I think, is why the humor did not do so well in front of that audience.
I was wondering about this too... is this correct?
The point about the titanic/hindenburg joke is well taken. It just wasn't that clever, it was not a clever joke. I don't really know how to explain it, but there are better ways of getting the same point across.
The last paragraph sums it up:  5) This was the worst possible catastrophe of a badly constructed nuclear reactor, with a complete meltdown of the reactor core, followed by the ten-days long completely free emission of radionuclides into the atmosphere. Nothing worse could happen. It resulted in a comparatively small occupational death toll, amounting to about half of that of each weekend's traffic in Poland, and tens or hundreds of times lower than that of many other industrial catastrophes, and it is unlikely that any fatalities were caused by radiation among the public. In the centuries to come, the Chernobyl catastrophe will be seen as a proof that nuclear power is a safe means of energy production.
Want to know why the Democrats are out of power and are not likely to regain it? Stuff like this. They delight in protesters with clever signs, reporters or activists that mouth off to the President, West Wing episodes, etc. All their energy and resources flow into sharing junk like this with each other like a bunch of school kids with a new Nintendo game. If that energy went into actually developing an agenda then they might be a threat, but the sad fact is that by this time next year they'll be saying to themselves "well, we lost another election, but at least Colbert got Bush real good!"
I guess it's a good time to buy goods and services from the US  rather than be paid in dollars for good/services created abroad.
Sounds like sour grapes to me.  Google is the default search engine on Firefox and they paid $1 billion for a 5% stake in AOL to remain their default search engine so why shouldn't MS use their own search engine as the default?  Google is certainly capable of going toe-to-toe with MS to buy customers.
fucking redneck, republican, powertrippin' cops!
"I'm the decider!"
Uh, stuff like this happens every year.  Like 2 years ago, when Bush was involved in a taped parody on finding WMD's which sent him searching the oval office.  Or Laura Bush talking about going to Chippendales last year ( http://politicalhumor.about.com/od/laurabush/a/laurabushcomedy.htm ).  I agree that Colbert was different and definitely edgier, but let's not get too melodramatic, shall we?
Fair call, I should have added "according to analysts" or some such to the title.  Plus they only quote one (very senior, but not without a vested interest) analyst, the "global head of currency strategy at ABN Amro". [Chart: USD trending downward against Euro](http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?s=USDEUR=X&amp;t=1y) [Dollar Falls to 7-Month Low Vs Yen](http://biz.yahoo.com/ap/060501/asia_dollar.html?.v=1)   
Maybe all this shows is some small resistance by the media to joining in with pointless liberal activist orgies.
All he did was repeat the truisms we can find in the media every day, dressed up a little bit as jokes but not really all that well. For example, the truism that Iraq has been a massive failure, that the government in Iraq can't protect its own people and will collapse the moment the US leaves. Colbert has nothing genuinely new to say, he just repeats what is being said loudly and repeatedly every day. He's on very safe ground because he is not challenging his audience's worldview at all - and by "his audience" I mean his TV audience. A lot of the reddit contributors think he was "brilliant" but how many of them were even the slightest bit challenged by anything he said? Which of these reddit posters who called him "brilliant" actually disagree with him on some major point? No, there are genuinely insightful humorists who have genuinely new things to say - H. L. Mencken comes to mind (a commentator who was quite funny), or if you want something nonpolitical Dorothy Parker or Oscar Wilde. These people have genuinely new "I never thought of that" insights. But Colbert merely repeats what everyone has heard a thousand times before, dressed up a little bit via his signature transformation. Iraq is a failure? Check. Cheney shot his friend in the face? Check. The press isn't hard enough on Bush? Check. Etc. It's nothing new.   
I haven't seen any MSM coverage of Colbert's jabs at the (lack of) quality of Whitehouse journalism. The comment on Fox's slant is missing the point.
When you have to say that, like that, then it really isn't.
they're not too different from the taliban who shot down the bamian buddha's for whimsical reasons.
I followed your Don Imus link and couldn't find a single policy criticism.  Sex jokes from Don Imus are totally unlike the scathing, relevant sarcasm of Colbert.
In #scheme, &lt;forcer&gt; "Types - yes, we do like late-binding. Macros - yes, R6RS will standardize a more powerful macro system than either SYNTAX-RULES or CL's defmacro. Modules - what module system? Er, yes, R6RS will have a module system, but I don't understand the criticism there. Objects - Yup, Scheme is for beauty, not industry. Errors - Yes, R6RS will standardize on a condition system. Threads - Yep, CML preferably. Multiple Values - That's the position &lt;forcer&gt; someone has who prefers (car '()) to return '() as well, Scheme doesn't do that for good reason. Lack of Compiler Hinting - bad idea, improve the compiler, don't limit the language. Too Minimalist - Yes, that's a feature."
I could come up with a better list than this in about 20 minutes. This is more like "easiest bridgest to find pictures of on google." EDIT: It helps that I can think of about 5 that I've personally been to that are at least as beautiful as any on that list.
The Chinese Yuan is pegged to the dollar. Looks like a good time to buy more goods from China.
He directly made fun of what *some* people consider to be Bush's worst failures. I would be somewhat more convinced of the assessment if the people making the assessment struck me as being disappointed ex-supporters of Bush, but instead they strike me as merely his detractors saying the things one always expect his detractors to say. What Colbert did does take hefty balls, but that's not necessarily a good thing. It would take hefty balls for me to walk into my boss's office and take my clothes off. But it wouldn't be especially clever. And neither was Colbert especially clever. What he did was to criticize Bush to his face, and that's what has everyone congratulating him, but it doesn't take much cleverness to do that.
"Unlike in the United States, where immigrants are considered Americans when they set foot on our soil, indigenous Europeans put great stock in bloodlines." Yes, that is so true. Thank goodness that there isn't any bias against blacks or hispanics in the United States.
I don't think this article had much insight. It basically said  that you need to hide the workings of technology from the user (duh?) The one interesting part was:  &gt;In the early 20th century, writes Nick Carr, the author of a book entitled “Does IT Matter?”, most companies had a senior management position called “vice-president of electricity”, a rough equivalent of today's “chief information officer” (CIO) and “chief technology officer” (CTO). I didn't know that before, and I wonder if IT will become like electricity, where the service is external. IT does have other issues since you are dealing with a companies' information. The one messed up thing was a history professor saying the Thomas Edison was a bad businessman, wtf? The guy had over 1000 patents and boy did he use them. Read up on the early days of sound recording. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thomas_edison
I always thought that the judgements of demographic were more based on article submissions+votes and comments+votes. Look, you are not going to get a true, unbiased sampling. Hell we would have to know how big the reddit community is before we could even determine a good number for a representative sample. What you can do, however, is *infer* a concept of the reddit demographic from the active participation of reddit memebers. From general trends it could be said that the following attributes are predominant on reddit: 1. Male  2. Liberal  3. In the 20-30 age group  4. Interested in technology I doubt that anyone cares enough to conduct a more scientific measurement. I am sorry that the rest of us disagree with your opinion of who we really are. Yes, there are maybes, exclusions, and other chances that this take on the reddit demographic is wrong. When it actually stops working in practice as well as theory I will change it.
or as a certain billionaire-hotel-heiress would say: "That's hot"
Heh.  By definition, reality can't have a liberal bias.  Reality just is.  And it is center.  Liberals and conservatives line up on either side to try to influence reality and perceptions of it. The joke is that Bush often dismisses legitimate criticisms as the product of liberal bias, as though that diminished the credibility of the claims or removed that truth of the concern.   The joke is that if you can claim liberal bias on truth, you can never be held accountable.  The joke is trying to take the piss out of the wordplay that MSM journalists fall for.  "Oh, well, he said it was liberal, and he's conservative, so end of discussion."
As always. If you keep repeating a prophecy, eventually it will be true. This has been going on for some years now and just show how clueless all "experts" are.  I hereby say that we real estate prices will crash, the stock market will crash. Humanity will disappear. The earth will be engulfed by the sun etc...
&gt; Would the reaction be the same if they were non-white kids from a high school in some shitty part of the city, chalking their tags using a magic marker? Uhhhh.... yes, same reaction.  Graffiti usually costs a lot to cleanup, but if spraying water on it was all it took, I don't think most people would give a shit.  It's the time and expense that are so damn annoying.  I know, I've had property tagged with spray paint. [edit: clarify answer] 
Yeah, "A Modest Proposal" and "Alice in Wonderland" were effective because they were so subtle.
But articles critical of God *always* get upvotes here!
So your point is that it wasn't especially clever and not everyone agrees with him?
From what I've read recently, they pegged it to a basket of currencies, including the Euro and some others from Asia.
It should be no surprise that people (and institutions and nations) are losing more and more confidence in the dollar -- look at the recent run ups in metals and oil.
Should we want to be? Imagine the USA wasn't rich and powerful -- no more than a European nation. Would there be any reason to like it particularly? I could probably think of something. But it is difficult to see the USA without the veiling glare of money.
&gt; THE dollar has embarked on a big decline that will see it fall against all leading currencies, according to analysts. Wow, I didn't know they could see into the future.  Seriously, though, the way these things work: when enough people say it will happen, then it will happen.  It's group think.  The 2000 stock market "correction" had been talked about for many, many months.  It finally happened when a critical mass of people believed it and started a sell off. The same thing will happen in the currency market.  When that critical mass of people that buy and sell currency believe this, it will happen.
&gt; Analysis showed the parrot had used appropriate keywords three times more often than would be likely by chance. Of course the experiment was repeated many times to see if the first occurance was an annomoly.
&gt; Want to know why the Democrats are out of power and are not likely to regain it? Stuff like this. They delight in protesters with clever signs, reporters or activists that mouth off to the President, West Wing episodes, etc. All their energy and resources flow into sharing junk like this with each other like a bunch of school kids with a new Nintendo game. If that energy went into actually developing an agenda then they might be a threat, but the sad fact is that by this time next year they'll be saying to themselves "well, we lost another election, but at least Colbert got Bush real good!" I would love to see how you manage to extrapolate from minor cases that all seem to involve a predominantly early-to-mid 20's demographic to the entire Democratic party.
All the bad grammar in the world will not convince me that is man-made.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
The recent runups in metals and oil are due to China's continued growth, and thus demand for raw materials...
That's why I put the title 'Beautiful World Bridges' rather than something along the line 'Top 10 World Bridges'. The focus is just on the scenic view of the bridges. :)
Apparently [syntax-case macros will be standard in R6RS](http://www.cs.indiana.edu/~dyb/r6rs/status.html#progress:macros).
After reading the first couple of paragraphs, I started trying to think how I could apply this to my life. I'm currently unemployed by choice, trying to figure out what the "next thing" is. So, if I consider myself as a startup company, what should I release today? What features should I add tomorrow? And, especially, how do I commit myself to something and stay committed?
&gt;Wow, that bit of inspiration was just what I needed. Me too.  I didn't even read the whole article.  I got to 5 and read this: &gt;Running a startup is like walking on your hands: it's possible, but it requires extraordinary effort. If an ordinary employee were asked to do the things a startup founder has to, he'd be very indignant. Imagine if you were hired at some big company, and in addition to writing software ten times faster than you'd ever had to before, they expected you to answer support calls, administer the servers, design the web site, cold-call customers, find the company office space, and go out and get everyone lunch. &gt;And to do all this not in the calm, womb-like atmosphere of a big company, but against a backdrop of constant disasters. That's the part that really demands determination. In a startup, there's always some disaster happening. So if you're the least bit inclined to find an excuse to quit, there's always one right there. And I realized that I needed to get back to work on my startup.  I started today discouraged (I hate Mondays) but this made me feel better.
I'd get a little upset with a bunch of trucks doing any commercial activity on my block. Its a residential area after all...
Nope. I'm pretty sure I wouldn't sign such a petition if I had some, though ...
Loony brit Junkie shoots self in foot.  LOL
While I subscribe to the notion of self-fulfilling prophecies in terms of markets, with the benefit of hindsight who can really doubt that the 'dotcom bubble' that burst in 2000 was a foregone conclusion?   The [first reported incidence of an economic bubble](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tulip_mania) was in the 17th century. Whenever the fundamentals (ie. reality) dont support the pricing a correction will occur.  Is this the time for the almighty USD?  I dont know, but its just a matter of time.
First the reporter goes "Q It's come to my attention that there's been requests -- this is a serious question -- to turn these TVs onto a station other than Fox, and that those have been denied. My question would be, is there a White House policy that all government TVs have to be tuned to Fox?" Then we discover, "Q I was the Fox victim, and I was told -- the quote was, "No," when I asked for CNN." Now there's some unbiased reporting! Reporter complains about something then reports that it has come to his attention that people have been complaining!! I think this is where the press gets the basis for most of their attacks and inuendos - other press members. Then pressed for details he finally admits, "Q I've never been told, no. They're such nice guys up there." Oops! Didn't quite get the story straight. Perhaps his source was mistaken (himself!) - you know that, as a reporter, he takes seriously issues of fairness and accuracy. Wah wah wah - they should make those dumbasses sit there and watch C-SPAN so there can't be any complaints about bias. Take a few pointers from Brian Lamb and his staff on how to actually get multiple sides of an issue from actual mutilple sides and not interject your own biases. None of these reporters could ever take the kind of abuse they dish out on others, deserved or otherwise. Liars and hypocrits.
simpler tax = get poor(er) people to pay more
If there's one thing this administration has taught us, is that an agenda is pointless in the face of inferior public relations.  And this is good public relations.  And as for the Democrats not returning to power...have you looked at any recent polls?   
You don't have to do anything but stagnate the way you are, never learning, never trying to improve.  Sure, we can't all learn everything, but that's no excuse for not learning at all.
still, even his own family wants him locked up...look at this story! vhttp://femalefirst.co.uk/celebrity/Pete+Doherty+s+Family++Jail+Him++Plea-9638.html 
Actually, I don't expect this to be scientific, I just really want them to implement a [polling subreddit](http://request.reddit.com/info/4rem/comments#c4xri), and this is a good advertisement.
Damnit, so this isn't the place to hang around and pick up scores of hot chicks? Incidentally, if you can't argue a substantiative point, why not through out a red herring, e.g., the demographics of reddit?  Seems to me the real point the story tried to make was that Colbert was ignored, -- and the reality seems to be that he wasn't ignored, he just may not have been given as much attention as you might like.
"dont hate, participate!"
yes, a blatant self-post. but I didn't write it!
yeah right. so when she gets the implants she put it all down to this.
I dunno about other people, buy MY recent runup in metal is due to my losing confidence in the dollar :)
Yeah Keith! Rock on!!!
I thought the most valuable thing we learned was "always build a containment structure" and "commies can't run a reactor."  :) 
I walked by an anti-war protest the other day and didn't see one person who didn't have white hair. Everyone had to be at least 50 years old and most were going on 65. Statistically these people have to have access to a certain amount of personal wealth and should have wide and influential circles of friends, and yet the most effective thing they can do with their afternoon is wave signs to passing traffic. Their kids are at work emailing Colbert videos to each other and cackling hysterically. But what all these people are not doing is winning elections. They don’t have an agenda (other than “we wouldn’t have given tax cuts to the rich and invaded Iraq”). They don’t have effective leaders. All the republicans need to do is try not to look insane through November and they win.
I'd say that's because they have their own ideas of what to create and don't want to blindly copy Paul's design.
Enjoying seeing an isolated and arrogant president directly confronted with his failures for the first time has nothing to  do with enjoyment of transgression for its own sake.  That the audience wasn't laughing is understandable given that their professional performance was being harshly criticized. 
Why do you need the draft of the small part that he's actually coded? You already have the design principles from him, that should do just fine.
Smalltalk
I guess we are just ignoring or missing the part about this all being done in the town center? Its okay to go in your driveway and chalk up a storm - its not okay to go into the middle of the city (generally the part that the city's public image is based on), and draw whatever you want. You guys can make this a political issue all you want, but there's no indication that is the case. Hell, ttriche's opinion that this is racially motivated is no less correct. For all we know this could be religiously motivated because they used quotes from Gandhi. Really, its probably safe to assume that it has to do with none of the above (otherwise you are just grabbing at straws), and to assume that perhaps a city doesn't want chalk drawings in the parts of town it prides itself on. It seems harmless, and it will wash away, but if the city doesn't give you permission to do such things, it is indeed defacement of public property. It means that either the city has to pay someone to go wash it up or that the chalk will remain there until the next time it rains. We don't even know what this looked like - for all we know it could be pretty damn ugly and cities don't exactly gloat over having sidewalk chalk drawings. You'd get arrested in any city for walking up in front of city hall and doing that.
Prolog
Low and behold, the internet is accelerating the effect. Make it possible for nearly anyone to put something up on the web, and wahla!, the bad spellers' writing reinforces others' mistakes. What do you think: yay or nay?
Reminds me a lot of Google.  The interface is a just a text box, but a lot goes on under the hood.
True, Bush’s public relations have been horrible. A series of “gotcha” media blitzes haven’t helped. Still, Democrats haven’t been much better. They also have to win a lot of individual elections to regain control of congress and I suspect it won’t happen. Even with Bush’s approval below 50% through November I wouldn’t expect it to happen.
To the taliban, the statues were from a false religion. They thought that God would be angry at the statues.
What I find most disturbing here is that the police refused to explain why the students were being penalized. There is no constutitional right for the police to say "sorry, you've lost your chance" to find out why.
Reminds me of the [wood quay](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wood_Quay) incident in Ireland. A huge collection of viking remains were destroyed.
it's kind of a repetitive day.
should be recommended
That's true, but they're only allowing it to fluctuate by a small amount. It's down from 8.27 to about 8.02 right now. It's still best to consider it as pegged within  a range to USD.
Parrots are obviously the smartest. They speak **English**
&gt; A series of “gotcha” media blitzes haven’t helped. Giggle. Did you come up with that yourself?
And maybe you can tell me at what point the article mentions the race of anyone.  It doesn't.
For a while this thread was gone, now it's back... but other conversations are missing. Is reddit experiencing growing pains?
No, actually I’m reading from leaked talking points made public my incompetent-boob-turned-wise-anti-Bush-sage Mike Brown.
No, this is a common misconception.  Reactors cannot explode the way a nuclear bomb explodes.  Reactor fuel is not sufficiently enriched to produce a nuclear explosion. A nuclear reactor *can* produce e.g. a steam explosion, but that's a minor event compared to a nuclear explosion. 
The girls say they didn't have it explained. The police say they did. Why do you assume it's the police who are lying? The girls have more to gain - they could extract compensation and revenge, whereas the police would just avoid having to discipline a few officers. They also have less to lose from being caught.
just wait and you'll see... and then you'll get convineced, just like big number of people...
Oh my. I began writing that article some time ago and had never gotten around to finishing it. Unfortunately, I forgot to set the publish date sufficiently into the future and the article was posted. My apologies for its unfinished state. I am currently going through it now and fixing any errors I find/any incomplete thoughts that weren't explained well. Please check back again in the future to see the version I _meant_ to post! UPDATE: The article has been updated (11:00 AM PST) to a suitable quality. Thank you for your patience.
As noted in the comments on the site, it was only $500 (the rest was paper), and a security guard prevented people from doing more than kicking the glass (albiet with as much of a running start as they wanted).  Still, it's impressive-looking.
Growth in China and India are part of the reason for rising commodities.  But the falling dollar is also due to the lack of any discernable savings rate in the US as well as the huge private and public debt that we've managed to run up. ...now if OPEC were to decide that they wanted payment in some other currency besides the $USD then we'd really see the dollar slide.
Absolutely. However, how much code is there in the world that don't use these? How much code is currently being written that do not? My thesis is this: integers have multiple (I consider 3) general uses. Understanding the pros/cons of these uses will allow you to write better code.
&gt; Reality just is. And it is center. Liberals and conservatives line up on either side to try to influence reality and perceptions of it. If that were so, then the way to find reality would be to split the difference between left and right.  However, it so happens that sometimes one side is actually correct.  Take the case of evolution vs. intelligent design.  The truth-is-in-the-middle approach leads to the conclusion that we should teach both.   The real problem with this approach is that it can be subverted by adopting more extreme positions, as we've seen with the right in this country in recent times.  People like Ann Coulter and Rush Limbaugh push the limits of the discourse so far to the right that people end up referring to centerists like Kerry as left-wing. 
A good joke doesn't have to be clever, it just has to be funny.  I think the fact that you didn't find it funny says more about your political leanings than the relative humor of the joke.  Not that that wasn't already obvious, since you have previously defended Rush Limbaugh.
Fwiw, Paul Graham's Arc has been renamed Paul Graham's Breakfast.
It is shockingly hypocritical for Google to make a fuss about this, when Google gets so much revenue off of having their own search box as the default in FireFox and Opera.
I recall being on a plane in  mid 2000 reading an article in some magazine (don't recall which, but it was business oriented) where the author pretty much predicted the bubble's burst (there's a couple of months of lead time for magazine articles) and then went on to say that the tech sector would be in decline for about 4 or 5 years. After the decline there would be renewed (and more sustainable) growth in tech...  Well, that's pretty much what happened, though the jury is still out on how sustainable the current growth will be.
Spreadsheets pre-date computers. Ask any old accountants.
Sometimes I actually wonder if that's the plan.  If he plants the idea in our minds, someone might actually do it, and of course, they would claim PG as their inspiration, while PG would say "THAT is Arc". When someone doesn't know what "can't" be done, he/she can do impressive things (barring laws of physics). PG makes it sound like this definitely can be done.
Information plumbers like myself will always be around.
That's like looking at two fields of grass, one twice the size of the other, and saying: "You say that there's more blades of grass in this field than there is in the one half it's size?!  Show me the numbers.  Prove it!" Some claims can be made without numbers.  To anyone who reads comments on this site, the demographic is clear.
no rank order? PAH!
I'm pretty sure ignorance drives language change to some degree.  Ignorance biases toward simplicity.  As an American, I prefer my language less colourful. ;-)
&gt;The main person helping him implement it (in the past) is working at a startup and is plenty busy right now Who would this be... ?
That doesn't really surprise me. The BBC's science reporting is notoriously bad. I'm not even going to bother reading the article. 
Right... in other words, they are two separate issues.  The US' problems are due to mismanagement, not the rise of China.
&gt;If people are so interested in it, why isn't anybody stealing the ideas and beating PG to it by making their own Arc? As a matter of fact, I (sort of) am and I expect a few other people are. But most of the people who are actually good enough to do this kind of thing (I know I'm not, yet) are the kind of people who have lots of other things they're working on.
The liberal thing is especially hard to substantiate based on comments.  Given the axiom that Republicans tend to label all critics of Bush as "liberals," with Bush's approval rating at 33%, that makes for a lot of liberals.   Just because someone criticizes the current party in power, doesn't mean that the other party won't be taking it too by the same people when they have power.
Never underestimate the ability of media to change people's perceptions.  For instance, I dare you to think about a cowboy today without wondering whether he's gay. :-)
Presumably there'd be an option to compile, though, which would optimise to a fair degree...
Safari does not even have the option to use anything but Google in its search box.
sh
&gt;-2 points 11 hours ago So I guess some people not only don't use ksh, but they do anti-Korn shell scripting?
Stupid comments and for that, I don't like it!
Objective C
This reminds me of a woman who got a ticket from a policeman because of a bumper sticker she had on her car. The sticker said "Stop The Bushit". Here's the [article](http://www.commondreams.org/views06/0328-22.htm).
We've yet to see if Colbert, though intrepid in action, will recant.
Be careful. If you look directly at it you'll go blind.
I'm being sarcastic.  You would've known that if you'd bothered to look up "Manichaeism" in the dictionary before you responded.
What is the relevance of the sex of the perpetrators here?  Does the fact that they are females make the arrest seem more unfair?
Good point. At least as they present themselves to the media the Democrats seem to more and more define themselves as "not Republican". Too bad "not Republican" is not really an effective message, as there are a lot of topics where I agree with it.
i hate cops so much. please kill them, wellesley girls.
You could probably get pretty far by treating your life as if it were a startup, but you'd have to have something that plays the role of users.   How to commit to something is harder.  In a startup you have a lot of external forces to help you stay committed: users, co-founders, investors, the need to make a living.  Most great projects probably have at least some such outside force, even if it's only colleagues.  It's very hard to "commit yourself."
ie7 doesn't  matter.
Well you've led me into a debate which, due to my position I cannot win, but I must say I disagree with your implication that school is the end-all formula for success.
You should probably define Liberal.
Well I guess that makes it ok then..
I saw an article about this somewhere that claimed the archaelogist running this excavation thinks an ancient civilization built pyramids to make the earth resonate with the sun or something.  Sounded a bit like a sun worshiper if you can imagine that. It also claimed they'd found nothing but dirt.  Big discrepancy here, I wonder which is correct? Edit:  here's the link.  What you guys think?
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
&gt;Not even all 40-ish conservatives like Bush -- and at least one of us reads reddit... This is a good point.  Rather than saying that Reddit's users are liberal, perhaps Reddit's users appreciate truth spoken to power.  Or have a good sense of humour.  Or are inclined to boost stories that are ignored by traditional media outlets. Also, surely many of the people who dislike Bush are conservatives who dislike him on the grounds of incompetence or because he has made decisions they disagree with.  I think history shows that good presidents were popular in spite of their ideologies, not because of them. I have many views that some would label "liberal", yet I would take a competent, thoughtful and pragmatic conservative leader over an incompetent, rigidly ideological liberal any day.
Your first question should be: "what do my users want so much that they will trip each other to be the first one to throw money at me for giving it to them?" Your second question should probably be: "who are my users anyways?"
Amusing
needs more double blind
[non-linkjacked/ad-jacked/content-jacked story here](http://www.newtechspy.com/articles06/oildiscovery.html) [reddit submission here](http://reddit.com/info/58ry/comments)
Do you know that Colbert is a Democrat or are you just assuming? If the latter, why do you assume someone who comically points out flaws in the Bush administration must be a Democrat?
dupe http://reddit.com/info/57mq/comments
I can understand laws against graffiti. But those laws shouldn't apply to *chalk*. It washes right off; anything these women wrote would be gone with the next rain. The law needs changing. Of course, that doesn't excuse the police for their stupidity in arresting people for such an extremely minor offense - and one that has definite First Amendment overtones. 
Does the fact that the student is female really belong in the headline?
Thank you Stephen Colbert   
1- You can’t really have it both ways, either the language was too minimalist and thus these various omissions are problems, or the language isn’t too minimalist and thus these omissions are not in fact problems. 2- nowhere have I said that I prefer return (...) to (...), although I definitely do not like (car '()), because it is gaurenteed to throw an error. 3- If Scheme isn't supposed to be practical why are you celebrating the proposed additions for threads and errors, those are practical, and not "for beauty". 4- These are criticims of R5RS, since R6RS isn't actually out yet I can't say either way if it fixes these problems or leaves them unchanged.  As I did mention it is nice that Scheme has an official change mechanism. 
*"Johnson, who works at home as an advertising consultant..."* I wonder if anyone has thought of the irony of an advertising consultant objecting to an industry that uses sex to sell its products.
I don't think ttriche's point is that the "Asshole In Charge" actually has to be personally unpleasant. I believe that at least two or three of the "Assholes" on the list are known as gentlemen. But they do have to be able and willing to enforce their vision of the language when the clay is still wet. That involves things like saying 'no' to popular and apparently reasonable suggestions. ("[If you want PL/I, you know where to find it.](http://www.catb.org/~esr/jargon/html/I/If-you-want-X--you-know-where-to-find-it-.html)")
Some nice pictures, even if as other people stated, they're not what I'd call the worlds MOST beautiful. One grip though:  SURELY you gotta be able to find a better picture of the brooklyn bridge than one from directly underneath it... sheesh.
That comment was a joke.
It's spelled *voil&amp;agrave;*. But kudos for getting the apostrophe right! And I agree with your assessment. 
See the discussion here: http://itre.cis.upenn.edu/~myl/languagelog/archives/000400.html
&gt; If [Arc is released] to help Paul Graham make more money, then it may never see the light of day. Doesn't a lot of the guy's mystique come from the fact that he's trying to explain how he became independently wealthy? This whole article seems to proceed from the assumption that Graham is either lazy or greedy, and that doesn't make sense.  Have I misread it somehow?
You're quite welcome. FWIW, here's my personal take on the day (over and above what's in the collaborative notes): http://blog.krugle.com/?p=101
Wow. Posting before my morning caffeine, so I didn't (at first) notice that the first three words in your comment should be "Lo and behold".  Low = not high  lo = Look! Oh my! 
&gt; Growth in China and India _are part of the reason_ for rising commodities. But the falling dollar _is also due to_ ... Both of these issues (amongst many others) are intertwined.  There is no singular cause for any market/economic outcome.
roflcopter
Face it. The arrest was obviously politically/racially/religiously and gender motivated. Oh, and don't forget their ages.
Anecdote is the singular of datum [edited - han] .  There might be a trend, but there are plenty of stories you would see as left-leaning that are scored in the negatvies.   Honestly, I expect if you ran the numbers you would see a lot of stories critical of the Bush admin and the Republican Congress, but that still wouldn't be especially meaningful since in a free society people tend to criticize their leaders in power more than those out of power.   And FYI a story about some idiot Democrat kids slashing some Republican's tires is less interesting than one with data showing irregularities in voting machine results. [edit - I kan't spel.]
There's an old saying "if a donkey bray at you, don't bray back." Bad advice for internet flame wars but sound for all else. And if Rooney really thought his intelligence was being insulted, he should just laugh it off and have fun with it. The only people who react adversely to insults are people who secretly fear the insulter is right.
&gt; Damnit, so this isn't the place to hang around and pick up  &gt; scores of hot chicks? Try fanfiction.
That one makes me wonder too. Maybe they don't want me getting lots of points just for posting a poll, unaware that comments don't affect karma?
&gt; Anecdote is the singular of data Coulda sworn that was "datum" ;-)
Fake NEC had contracts with 50 chinese factories.
How do you see inflation shooting up on this graph? (none of those lines represent inflation) Anyway, if inflation had gone up significatly in the last couple years, then this inflation adjusted graph would not show a spike in gas prices in the last couple years. I think you're confused of what this graph actually is. I dont like this graph because its in 1979 dollars. Why do that? It should be in todays dollars. http://zfacts.com/p/35.html
I think there is one important difference here: Google doesn't make Firefox. And the Mozilla Foundation doesn't run Google. However, that objection is weakened by the financial agreements in place between the two organizations. If I could have said "And the Mozilla Foundation doesn't get money from Google", then I'd have called it a pretty important difference *vis-a-vis* the IE7/MSN situation. As it is, though, I *can't* say that, because I understand the Mozilla Foundation *does* get some money from Google for this search placement. As a confirmed Microsoft-hater and open-source supporter, I can totally understand why Google is annoyed by this. But I have trouble seeing why their annoyance somehow trumps the annoyance Microsoft must have felt for the past few years about the Google search box in Safari, Firefox, Netscape, *et al.* [edit was to fix a typo]
Yep, yep, yep
You can vote this guy down if it makes you feel better, but there's a reason why the Democrats aren't in power, and it would behoove people to reflect on that, if we'd like to see the current Republican crowd turfed out. I think the lack of an agenda is a valid point, by the way.  "Out of Iraq" (when? dunno, exactly), "not Bush", "not Republican", etc... can only carry you so far.
Madonna "rocks out" with her guitar at Coachella. Heh! Just doesnt look right with her disco leotard. http://people.aol.com/people/galleries/0,19884,1187374,00.html
So, we find our first bully. The kind of person who likes to torture animals and kick people when they're down. If you had half a brain and read the entire article, you would have known that although I do have my little pity parties from time to time, I was trying to get my readers to know that I have been there and I understand what it feels like. If you were a secure person in who they are, you wouldn't have felt the need to be cruel. You sound like you are crying out for help. Poor thing you are. Drop me a line when you find that little spark of humanity that still must be in you, and please do not misunderstand, it's fine if you don't like my article, but the dig was uncalled for.
Intertwined?  Sure.  But I don't see the big link between rising commodities and the falling dollar. Perhaps someone would care to spell it out?
A favorite pastime of kids of all ages is drawing on the sidewalk with chalk.  I find it very interesting that it's a crime... anywhere.
All of the "spelling" mistakes were mistakes of picking the wrong homophone (or near-homophone).  The homophone was, in each case, spelled correctly, and in some cases, could even mean the same thing, as in fount/font and cord/chord.  Sometimes the new analysis just makes more sense: "butt naked" instead of "buck naked".  I don't believe "buck" is ever used in another context to mean "completely". Thus the article isn't really about bad spelling, but about how people guess at the meanings of things, which is what every person on this planet does all the time.  The fact that you have to spell on the internet, and not just to speak, means that there are more opportunities for demonstrating your ability to guess at (and miss) the full meaning of a phrase. Sometimes what is demonstrated is the writer's thoughtlessness, and other people will be able to spot it.  Other times a change will seem reasonable to nearly everyone, and so the language might change.  I could really do without the apocalyptic sounding headline.
Umm...my family has done that for almost 20 years (since the late 80s, I think).  It just becomes part of your habits - when you go to gas station, you write down how much gas it took, what the price was, and what the total bill was.  Takes 20 seconds. You *don't* do this?
You know, this guy probably would have a lot more authority if he actually *asked* Paul why he won't release Arc, then just published Paul's answer. Sheesh, *I* could write a wanky blog article 1600 words long and postulate without going to the source, and I wouldn't be any more or less right.
Reminds me of [Einstein the Parrot](http://www.devilducky.com/media/25535/)[quicktime].
Do you like polls like this?  Vote up the [polling subreddit](http://request.reddit.com/info/4rem/comments#c4xri).
Do you like polls like this?  Vote up the [polling subreddit](http://request.reddit.com/info/4rem/comments#c4xri).
Do you like polls like this?  Vote up the [polling subreddit](http://request.reddit.com/info/4rem/comments#c4xri).
From http://dev.perl.org/perl6/status.html :  &gt; The community brainstorming process finished August 1, 2000 Do current "best practices" include not delivering a product for six years after requirements gathering supposedly finishes? And, as nice as PUGS is (and as smart as Audrey is), it's not Perl 6. Arc (announced in, what, 2003?) is a few years off from achieving that level of best practice.
Sorry, but that's rather insulting to people who've had to study statistics... demographics being a subset of that field. Anecdotes and self-selection are the antithesis of scientific polling. I mean, that's why statistics exists, to begin with--to create measurements with as little error as possible.  I did enjoy your comment, however, that "some claims can be made without numbers." That's a hoot. Your claim is that casually counting the comments (counting, mind you) will prove your point. But my entire argument is that this will likely produce erroneous results. So, it's not really counting, itself, that you're against, but rather _accurate_ counting and estimation.
Hanging head in shame.  I was a Classics major...  Double head hang, double shame.  I will make myself translate at least ten pages of the Eclogues tonight in punishment.
It seems to me that this is how Apple sees technology. Consider the iPod, before the iPod mp3 players were too tricky for the average joe to use and understand. Now my mom has one and so does everyone one else because they took away the complicated parts of the process.
Exactly, to both of your comments. Don't forget "yea," instead of "yay." :)
Hmm. This poll was made in response to [jesusphreak's comment about reddit demographics](http://reddit.com/info/57mm/comments#c57qr). In that context, anyone who calls themself a liberal should definitely vote this up, and if you're unsure, consider whether jesusphreak would call you a liberal.
That was Bush making fun of himself (and crudely). It's not like he got up and said, "oh, by the way, I'm a fucking idiot who is destroying the country." The latter is more what Colbert did.  If I'm being melodramatic, consider Bush's reaction to Colbert's schtick compared to Bush's own. Let's just say Bush was smiling for only one of them.
"The best way to handle the search box, Google asserts, would be to irritate users when they first start up Internet Explorer 7."
Well, except that according to one resident, "they don't wave" at other people in the neighborhood. Then again, the Vivid co-founder points out that they try to be "cognizant that the neighbors are around when we shoot," he said. "We are quiet, and we don't bring a lot of equipment." Reading between the lines here: they know that if they *did* wave at the neighbors, they'd just get accused of being "cheeky" and "in people's faces". So, since they instead opt to keep things as low-key as possible, they get accused of unfriendliness and the heinous crime of not waving. Whether they're friendlier than the neighbors or not, I bet they're less hypocritical. 
You have a better place for them?
visit this site for more review for amplifier, cd player, speaker and etc
Girl? Fire your stylist NOW!!!!
&gt;The liberal bias of the media is something that is a plain as day. Funny, all I saw whenever I watched the T.V. news was conservative bias.  I notice that you had no response to the study I linked to.  Why is that?
Can anyone comment on how this Scheme implementation compares to others like Chicken, MzScheme, Bigloo, etc?
He underestimated the resources and sacrifice needed to maintain a project of that magnitude. Only very few projects become successful overnight. I like to believe those projects were lucky. It comforts me. For a programming language, the stakes are even higher. To make matters worse, programming languages don't matter anymore. Today developers want bigger, better and "bader" libraries, APIs and frameworks. The LISP community has had a hard time grasping this, and sometimes I fear Arc might end up just trying to be a better LISP. If that's all it achieves, I don't think it will have much impact or mindshare. Perhaps only the LISP community will get excited.
Well, the marker bit rather changes things, don't you think? I mean, few would question that this was graffiti if something more permanent were used. Additionally, the use of "tags" makes the scenario different, as well. Political speech, like the chalkings here,  is offered the highest level of Constitutional protection. That's a little different, I'd say.
I wonder where they got ideas from
I can see how YouOS could be considered a competitor to Arc. Arc's intended niche is supposed to be server-side web apps, and YouOS envisions server-side javascript filling that role.
It's not clear which of "buck" or "butt" naked came first: http://itre.cis.upenn.edu/%7Emyl/languagelog/archives/001351.html That said, I agree with your analysis.
Norway did not even have a revolution at the time the rest of Europe was busy figuring out human rights and stuff, because we were busy fighting over how to spell it.  -- Erik Naggum (norwegian)
But other animals may be able to speak english too if they could produce the sound. Dolphins cannot produce normal sounds, so they are obviously unable to speak english. This doesn't mean that their cognitive abilities aren't sufficient.
Voted down due to plagiarism, as always.
I'd love to know who followed them back to campus and wrote down their license plate number. Get a life.
The difference between the "actual price paid" and the "adjusted for inflation" price IS a measure of inflation.
Well, that and stay out of jail.
Agreed.  I could only find this [June 2003 report](http://www.agiweb.org/geotimes/june03/NN_gulf.html) that mentions Larry Cathles from Cornell and oil exploration in the gulf.
I doubt if there is much to Arc beyond a quick prototype.  He recently indicated that he had been going about it the wrong way, which suggests that he's going to switch gears and start over.  There's probably just nothing to release at this point, if there ever is. From his recent interview:  &gt;I haven't spent much time on it lately. Part of the problem is that I decided on an overambitious way of doing it. I'm going back to McCarthy's original axiomatic approach. The defining feature of Lisp, in his 1960 paper, was that it could be written in itself. The language spec wasn't a bunch of words. It was code.
No, I don't really think so, and the consensus agrees that the sarcasm isn't obvious. Nothing wrong with adding a [Sarcasm][/Sarcasm]
You should see what they've done to the coasts for a bunch of friggin' apartment blocks that remain empty 6 months during the year. Nothing surprises me about this lot.
I agree.
There are some misleading/incorrect blurbs on this site that I have recognized, which makes me doubt the truth of the others. &gt;While it is true that light from *each tiny point* on the sun's surface is just about perfectly parallel by the time it reaches our eyes, light from the sun as a whole is not. This is because the sun, though very distant, is very large. The apparent size of the sun is 32 minutes of arc, only slightly more than 1/2 a degree. That's pretty damn close to parallel.
Beware: A diletant's question: Are the *auto_ptr* in C++ the same as *alloca* in plain C? Old, boring, (useful) stack allocation?
I had a good sports link bombed too... I would love a sports reddit.
PL/SQL
Visual Basic
I think this is Paul's best ever - and I have read them all. I made a blog post on this at http://blogs.adventnet.com/perma/11781/paul-graham-lessons-for-new-start-ups-and-products.html My main question: now that Paul finds determination and not intelligence is the most important attribute in a start-up founder, perhaps it is time to revise his opinion on Lisp? I say Lisp is IQ-worship distilled into language form!  Sridhar 
Because the police, sadly, have proven to be liars all too often, especially when politics are involved. Lying seems police SOP whenever there are protests or demonstrations. 
I did a red arrow (ironic, now that I think of it...shouldn't up votes be conservative, down be liberal, to stick to the 'red state / blue state' scheme?), but I'm not sure if that's what I should have voted.  Would libertarian be liberal or conservative?
And in the case of "font of wisdom" it isn't even an error.  "Font" and "fount" are not merely synonymous, they're variant spellings of the same word. 
Disturbing!
Another issue here is that Wellesley is not really a city. It's an upscale suburb of Boston that probably wrestles with having to balance the behavior of local college students with the complaints of nearby townspeople. edit: Actually, I take that back. Wellesley is an all girls school, how bad could their behavior be? More likely, the issue is that Wellesley is such a small, quiet town that little things that would be overlooked in most college cities/towns get more attention by the police. 
As a spaniard I am ashamed that we have destroyed part of the heritage that belongs to the world in this manner. So it goes. 
aliens DUH
As a matter of fact, legal precedent says the police have 48 hours to inform you of your crime, so the police had every right to say "nope, you lost your chance."  Not that I think it is right that they did so, just saying they were ok legally.
I'm not surprised after seeing what it does to [spiders](http://www.cannabis.net/weblife.html)
&gt;People like Ann Coulter and Rush Limbaugh push the limits of the discourse so far to the right That's true.  Then people call right-wing outlets like CNN "liberal media".  People who aren't paying much attention and just want to take a middle-of-the road position will place themselves to the left of Rush Limbaugh and to the right of Wolf Blitzer.
UniVerse Basic
Hells yeah!  This means I can trade in my godforsaken Ford Focus for a Lincoln Continental.  I want one of the ones from the 70's or 80's, tho...a real boat.  With a 460.  Booyah.
This was absolutely incredible! Tracking how language changes can only help how we communicate with one another. Should we seek to stem the tide of incorrect/improper language usage or just look at the changes born (borne?) of mistakes as the evolution of language? The "shoe-in vs. shoo-in" section of the article shows that colloquialisms and mistakes can easily become the norm.
Why do people keep coming to this conclusion from that graph?  To me it looks like the 2005 spike shows gas prices, even adjusted for inflation, to be as bad as they've been since the energy crisis in the early 80s.  Just because adjusting for inflation makes it look like less of an upward trend, doesn't mean it's not a freaking upward trend. It's especially scary considering that all the data is from Texas, where gas prices are a lot less likely to go up during a shortage.  Look at a chart for California and the ups and downs would be even more pronounced.
What does "linkjacked" mean?
umm, aren't gasoline (and oil) prices a good portion of what determines the rate of inflation?  I mean, pretty much everything in the CPI has to be shipped, or relies on energy cost to some degree.
I love the graph in the lower right corner that tries to make "80" look like it's more than half of "260".  Riiiight.
(turn your sarcasm detector up)
Also see [this wikipedia article](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scandinavian_language) about how the different Scandinavian languages are related to each other.
well, people that are more interested in ancient civilizations (incs, mayas, and all way to atlantis and lemurya, mu... ) know that, somehow it is logical that pyramids are at this location (balcan, middle/south part of europe) Me for example... Few years ago, i was confused, how no remainings(like big stone buildings) of atlantis (if atlantis had existed) were left on europe after "big flood".... and here is my answer... :D.. i will talk a lot about these theories, just i need time to write it all down.
What a great, funny interview.  Must see NetTV.
Firefox 1.5 finally does MathML - but only Presentation MathML, not Content MathML. AFAIK (I'm no expert) none of the other popular browsers support MathML out of the box yet. MathML is also quite unpleasant to write, but that's a secondary consideration at present. XHTML and MathML are distinct, but they bolt together using XML Namespaces.
Nynorsk is a very synthetic language though, noone (generally speaking) has it as a native language, although they may speak a dialect closer to nynorsk than to bokmal. It seems to me that when you're trying to establish a standardized form of the language you have to start from a core that people are using in actuality. 
Libertarian is different... As http://politicalcompass.org points out, Libertarian is more opposed to Authoritarian.
I don't get the subtile hatin' on PG that goes on sometimes.  Sure he's got a little cult, but so do Eric Raymond, the GNU folks, Linus, etc.  You get that if you do stuff for people. It seems that he's trying to do things to actually help tech entrepreneurs. I don't agree with absolutely everything he says, but a lot of it is pretty good. 
True :-) This is the year for all the Republicans to go to jail. I'll bet they'll been some good prison reform bills come next January.
See also http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alex_(parrot) .  Alex is a parrot that has lived in a science lab his whole life and has been part of many expirments with linguists and such. [Edit: Fixed the link]
Wouldn't C be designed by at least two arseholes, K&amp;R? 
Yes, they had the right, but why do you have to be an asshole and do that? Besides, I don't see how chalking is a terrible crime that can lead to an arrest. Instead of fighting real crime cops do this kind of bullshit. But when it gets to real crimes, cops are nowhere to be seen.
At least 2 of these are BS. - The one about the breast shape (ever see one shaped like a champagne flute?  Didn't think so).  Check Snopes.com  - The mushroom cork starts out as a flat cork; pressure pushes it out of the bottle into a mushroom shape.
See this piece on [reddiquette](http://reddit.com/help/reddiquette). Mesoanarchy is well known on reddit for simply copying the entire contents of an article from a news outlet and then posting it (with a view to driving traffic) to his website where he sells advertising.
This post is currently at -2; Tough Crowd!
Commodities--especially gold, traditionally--are hedges against the decline of the dollar.  If value of the dollar declines, then the number of dollars it takes to buy a bar of gold increases (because the dollar isn't worth as much anymore).  Therefore, if you think the dollar is going to decline you might buy gold (or silver/copper/whatever) so that your wealth maintains its value as the dollar declines.   The fact that commodity prices have gone up is definitely driven in large part by demand factors, such as growth in China and India.  Generally demand-driven price increases aren't a concern for the overall health of the economy.  But another factor might be that people are stockpiling commodities because they are betting that the dollar will decline, which would have more painful effects.   Also to clarify my OP--a falling dollar would make US exports more competitive.  That doesn't mean it would make the economy boom or that your brokerage account would do great necessarily.
new-age feel-good crap
Oh, and it's worth noting that a steam explosion actually happened at Chernobyl.  It really was the worst-case scenario.
&gt;Just one question: Do you have kids yet? I do, and this wouldn't bother me at all.
No.  C was designed and implemented by Dennis Ritchie.  Brian Kernighan had nothing to do with it.   
&gt; No, but anecdotally a lot of them are drug users, for example. So are truck drivers. How would you feel about one of them moving in across the street?
Ten paranoid photography geeks would do it. Maybe a few thousand, if it were a filter in photoshop.  It's not worth the time in general, especially if in any way hard. I don't postprocess any of my picures until I want them for something. Sure, if I had a shiny camera with a raw mode, I probably would. (After spending a few days figuring out which way works best and needs the fewest clicks. (Which seems to be Adobe Bridge, actually))
Didn't Warren Buffet lose pretty big a few years back betting against the dollar?
It's not like you'll be stopped at the corner by a cop and be asked to show your family pictures.  This is a forensic technique at best, and like the other bajillion thing people know about through CSI, Due South and whatnot, but can't be all that bothered about in practice even if they're criminals. Never mind normal people with nothing much to gain or lose either way, even assuming the whole world is told of this, er, evil?
Remove the trailing period for the [proper link](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alex_(parrot\)). Perhaps a better example of avian intelligence [can be found in crows](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/science/nature/2178920.stm). Recall being the last to leave from datacenter where I worked.  After swiping myself through the 'airlock' I reached the carpark where I discovered a flock of crows had decended on the adjacent trees and nearby lawns.  There must have have been close to a hundred of them. Maybe it was childhood recollections of Hitchcock's 'The Birds' or more likely 'The Omen', but it the the most creeped out I had been in a long while.  Caffeine and CRT's will do that to you..
And yet Colbert bombed. Those people, those journalists, I can assure you, are not more than a small fraction Limbaugh fans.
Also even if true, 60B barrels is only about 10 years worth of US consumption.
Well over 3 years ago is more like it. Notice the 03 in the URL :)
geekland spam. As for scientific merit - the paper actually claims sensitivity is less than *worst-case* published estimates - which describes, by definition, every estimate ever made except for the worst case, including the scientific consensus from the IPCC. Mod down. Read the press release at http://www.dukenews.duke.edu/2006/04/climsensitiv.html
Hence my note that they try to influence perceptions of reality.  You can't split the difference because you're really splitting your perceptions.
mmm ... pizza.
That's another thing. From the looks of it, monad will be better than bash. Bash is annoying, in that I want to avoid the useful stuff since it's so annoying to figure out the syntax. Don't even *start* about escaping. I'm almost scared not to use use find . -print0 | xargs -0 these days. You can't even do a for loop on files without that. Not safely, anyway. But of course, the system itself won't hook into Monad like unix has them, because nothing is designed that way. So it'll be good, but not useful.
In the congo parrots can speak fluent french. If you walk through the jungle you might hear them discussing a multitude of subjects in perfectly fluent french. The only thing they don't talk about is politics. Because everyone knows its rude to discuss politics.  -Big Fish
Great article about dealing with the loss of pet, and also a cool book for kids or adults who have lost one recently.
"Enjoying seeing an isolated and arrogant president directly confronted with his failures for the first time" That still doesn't make it funny. (even if it were true, which it isn't)   
Manichaeism:    2.  A dualistic philosophy dividing the world between good and evil principles or regarding matter as intrinsically evil and mind as intrinsically good. So, ha ha, the joke is that the sentence contradicts itself by creating a false dichotomy while encouraging you not to impose strict dichotomies.
Atlantis too! I love this term from the story:  "pyramidiot"
With an accent, no less. I applaud you. Oh, and I just learned that [kudos](http://www.bartleby.com/61/27/K0112700.html) is singular and ideally pronounced with *s* not *z*, like *pathos*.
I wish some asshole wasn't sitting on http://colbertkilledapanda.com/.
&gt; President Bush has quietly claimed the authority to disobey more than 750 laws enacted since he took office, asserting that he has the power to set aside any statute passed by Congress when it conflicts with his interpretation of the Constitution. I've seen this repeated several times in the last couple of months.  Anyone have a link that explains why Bush thinks he's above the law?
That doesn't look like it's "on" Venus (as in the planet). That's Venus, FL (and it looks like Disney World) Venus the planet is extremely hot and has sulfuric acid rain.
Because, as much as anyone might like a realizations of Arc's ideas, they aren't really worth the trouble of implementing. It's much more interesting/satisfying to tackle other problems using the "good enough" tools that are already available.
If you think demographic data is good, vote this article up so that others see it.  If you want to share your data, please vote on the following: [I am male](http://request.reddit.com/info/58el/comments) [I am in my twenties](http://request.reddit.com/info/58en/comments) [I consider myself "liberal"](http://request.reddit.com/info/58ek/comments) Submit any other questions as articles, then link to them in the comments.  Now that we can see details of votes, we can count "yes" and "no," not just "yes - no."
Checks and balances are for pussies.  Why wouldn't you trust the President with absolute power?
Eeeeveryone eeeelse thinks so. Well, it was amusing for a bit, mocking self and oddities. Some of the things he does are pretty neat, like drawing out racism and prejudice merely by being a consistent actor. But that's his other roles, really.  The Ali G thing is a little childish, and things like that get old and jump sharks. It's interesting that he can  actually still manage it, though.  It's a little silly that it got this big, but hey, people have massively gone for shows a lot stupider.
I still live in Wellesley. They repave their sidewalks every other year. Someone's obsessed with clean sidewalks.
Well, I AM surprised. There are a lot of places where to build a car park. A tourist attraction brings money. People can protest and blockade. What is the matter with Ecija ?  Is the Sunday Times reliable ? I think something is missing here.
Having graduated from college, I have to say that my degree (and about 90% of my college experience) has no bearing on my current life.
Even the conspiracy theorists at AboveTopSecret think it's a hoax. http://www.abovetopsecret.com/forum/thread204351/pg1
FIGHT THE POWER!!!   
I read that "OpenBSD 3.9 'is greater than' Security"
I guess both redneck republicans in Wellesley MA must be cops, huh?
If Jesus Christ's arms were 3' long, and his legs were 3', 4" long, what was the distance between his hands and feet when nailed to the cross?
More excuses in the British Sun. He sez he uses blood to make paintings. RIIIIIIIIGGGHHTTT!  http://www.thesun.co.uk/article/0,,2-2006200080,00.html
Interesting how her shirt makes the underlying pants transparent, but the pants alone are untouched.  *smirk* 
This is ridiculous. There is no way he'll make Arc closed source. What's to be gained? (There's obviously a huge amount to be lost by doing so.)
Well, I was working for a govt. contractor during the great Furlough Winter of 1995, when Congress (read Gingrich) &amp; Clinton could not agree. My employer paid us, and eventually was paid by the feds, but it was a bit unnerving.
&gt; To make matters worse, programming languages don't matter anymore. Today developers want bigger, better and "bader" libraries, APIs and frameworks. I agree completely. Why else would people put up with languages such as Java? Its not as efficient as other languages, its not faster than other languages, and it can actually hinder progress. But why do people use it? It has a ton of libraries and frameworks which make companies a bit more comfortable when they use it. Personally I'd love to see in the programming world what frameworks like RoR have done for the web dev world. Before such frameworks, what you mainly had was CMSs. And don't get me wrong, there were some great CMSs, and the reason you used them is because it was easier to modify what was already in place than to roll-your own. But now that good frameworks have come out that allow you to produce web applications exactly as you want them, CMSs aren't as valuable because you can try and fit a CMS to your needs or you can create something that meets your exact needs in the same (or a shorter period of time). I want to see a language that is so productive to develop in that rolling your own libraries is just as good or a better choice than using pre-existing ones (of course you wouldn't want to create every library from scratch (such as basic maths)). Let every programmer be his programmer. The only language that I can see that happening with is a Lisp dialect.
It seems you have a pretty poor view of art. &gt;When you painted on earth-- at least in your earlier days-- it was because you caught a glimpse of Heaven in the earthly landscape. The success of your painting was that it enabled others to see the glimpses too. -C.S. Lewis *The Great Divorce*
yeah well i wouldn't want a big ugly mall right next to my gated hollywood hills home either...
The written form isn't that synthetic, since it's almost Danish. As to the spoken form I was given to believe by my Norwegian friends that bokmal was spoken by Oslo people, upper class, intellectuals, etc, for quite a while, so that's a reasonable core, more than a fusion of dialectal variants. 
OK, I can see why it would be elegant to do that. But beyond elegance, what is the point? Surely you can specify the behaviour of a string just as well if you define it in terms of cons as a linked list or whatever other means you choose to use. 
Excuse me, this is mesoanarchy. Perhaps all of you need to read the dont's of reddiquette... from reddiquette: "Linkjack stories: linking to stories ***via blog posts that add nothing extra.***" I **do not** link to blog posts, or through (via) blogposts. this "don't" is meant to dissuade bloggers from posting a link, having you click on the link to their blog which then links you to the original story without the blogger commenting on the story ("add nothing extra" - from "judgmentalist" on the reddiquette page: **Linkjacking has referred to a few things. I've heard it referring to plain wholesale duplication of content from another source like that Forbes article, but usually it's a link to a tiny blog description and a link to the website of interest. This inserts an only mildly irritating page apparently designed to generate adsense revenue.**.... "with a view to driving traffic" - now you are a mind reader. perhaps you and all like you need to abide by this reddiquette "don't": "Use reddiquette as a means of harrassment or criticism. It's just a guideline - it's not a contract."... and this "do" from reddiquette: **"Actually read an article before you mod it! This sounds trivial but it seems that it is becoming more and more common to mod articles based just on the titles. This behaviour considerably harms the system."**
Interesting.  I tend to see the decline as a social phenomena - fewer people start smoking, partly because of better edication about the dangers; but mostly because, well, it's not cool to smoke anymore (and hopefully never will be...) 
&gt; They thought that God would be angry at the statues. Then let *Him* destroy them.
another business voip company
I've just informed the men in black that you've been muttering about Bush and buying up all the fertilizer in the local shops.   You had a life.
Lisp
This is an interesting article on how Google is seeding the internet with cheesy salespeople using the parked domain system.
This makes no mention of performance. Why do you need a dual-core chip if you don't need performance?  The second question is power. The Intel chips use much more. That means they also need much more coolin). Which uses even more power and possibly creates more noise. You might really consider these, depending on where you live.
My point is this: Noone really speaks Bokmål either, but certain dialects and sociolects may be closer to bokmål than to nynorsk. Following how you described synthetic, both forms fit in your definition.
If it's many times slower than Ruby it may not matter whether Arc is ever released. Ruby has performance problems of its own. Speed isn't everything, but it isn't nothing, either.
Hmm, kind of a non-story.
Cause the LOWAR'DUH is above the law! 
Google probably knows that users who aren't bright enough to switch to firefox/opera etc., aren't bright enough to figure out how to change the default setting. Even though I don't care for Microsoft, I can't see any reason why they should have to be "fair" to Google.  By allowing users to change the default, I'd say IE7 is being fair enough.
I don't see how the fact that netscape.com was the default start page has anything to do with how many people *actually* used it.  My mother-in-law gets msn.com as soon as she opens IE, it doesn't mean she uses it to check for local movie times (or anything else).
parked domain sites suck!
It's not fair that Microsoft can't use their company as the default in their browser.  MS is a business, not a government agency.  They should be able to make MSN the ONLY option in the browser if they want to, it's THEIR product. Then shouldn't the Google calendar show links to other calendars on the web?  After-all, if Google has enough money to offer their products for free to undercut all the smaller companies that HAVE to charge, then they should be "fair" too.
I was itching to point Saddam out to the "Oh this is so siiimple" naysayers too. It can be a cheap brand of head-in-the-sand. But besides that, the bad decisions, bad excuses, a bad precedent, and numerous choices that should have been much later resorts are probably a good cause of this case of the cure not being much better than the disease. And Ottoman empire? Evils like that won't be able to build unless you either have rather a lot of conquering or a lot of "oh, that won't happen"-style apathy, both of which sound either unlikely (consider America spends more on its military than most of the rest of the world combined) or, well, isn't really an argument either way. America is probably the only one who could become an empire at this point, which is some people get nervous when America swings its power around. Which is one thing. Deciding about other countries should be very, very *very* carefully and delicately done, only if absolutely necessary, which is why international law exists and why violating it was an unsettling precedent, even if various cases of the UN's morally questionable on-its-ass-sitting weren't so hot at all either. Maybe, just maybe, if US policy sounded solid, it perhaps it were more substantial and delicate and in another ballpark than threatening to use one of its 11000 nuclear warheads. If it were somewhere between that and more decisive than the UN, things wouldn't be so bad. Thing is, not much has given the impression that  grand-scheme consideration is a factor in much of this. And that's one thing we need.
First, while I am sure you disagree, in my view those journalists in the audience are the biggest bunch of Bush suckups I have seen this side of FreeRepublic, so their reactions were unsurprising.  Second, Colbert was making fun of them.  Based on anecdotes from a speech writer friend who used to spend time with the press corps, they are some of the most humorless pompous seriously self-important egotists on the planet.  Those types don't like to be made to look foolish.  Finally, we're arguing about what's funny.  That's a seriously thankless task.
the major reason for why crackers target microsoft is becuase is popular...is no so much for poor designed but becuase 99% of the world uses it. mac as always brag about the fact that is untochable to viruses and that if they get a treat the will respond better than microsoft...lets see what they do now and how they respond.
Yes, Popularity/Top should be rated by total votes, not net up-votes. If you vote in a poll, up or down, it counts as an "up vote" for the poll.
"This annoyance was brought to you by Google, would you like to use their services?" Don't worry Google, I'm sure they'll make IE7 annoying enough on their own.
Chalk in our town centers! Sullying our cities with expressions of peace! These monsters must be stopped!
"First, while I am sure you disagree, in my view those journalists in the audience are the biggest bunch of Bush suckups I have seen this side of FreeRepublic" You are right, I disagree.
So is this obligatory for evry EU sitizen?
See http://eggcorns.lascribe.net (the Eggcorn Database) for more of these variations. (Also see http://itre.cis.upenn.edu/~myl/languagelog/ (Language Log) for discussion of the eggcorn concept and particular eggcorns.)
I didn't say it was tired, I said it wasn't particularly new or especially insightful. The comedians I like are the ones that give me new eyes, not the ones that flatter me by repeating my opinions back to me.
yes because women are so much more helpless than big strong men. And obviously if it were men then their intentions were totally subversive, while the women were just trying to beautify their neighborhood.
yes, because as is clear as day all kkkop$ are pigs and get their marching orders straight from the GOP. Sheesh. How about we stick with Occam and rely on the old "asshole cop with nothing better to do in a wealthy suburb" until the facts say otherwise, eh?
I'm sorry, that's scary!
Sure you're not curious?  ;^P
"did you hear there was a blackout in Wellesley a little while back?"  "really?"  "yeah, someone called the cops but then they realized it was Dee Brown."
I love that lens.
I don't know, "Out of Iraq" is what we want but do you know how?  Not having a articulable plan about how to do it doesn't strike me as a point against a candidate.  The situation is so screwed up, I have yet to hear a good answer from anyone.  But, I do know I don't want any more of Bush's ideas on the subject, nor any Republican sycophant of his.
I want to introduce them to my invisible telepathic flying fish.  It has remarkable abilities, which are said to include alchemy and light-speed travel.
Good quote; one of my favourite books. The script-based nature of POV-Ray makes it that much more difficult to create really natural-looking scenes. On the other hand, it also makes it superbly well-suited to fractals and geometric designs.
_"[Signing statements] are most often created after the law has been signed by the president and are not seen/known by the press or members of congress."_ Are they genuinely classified or just kept in a basement behind a locked door saying, "Beware of the leopard"?
The women arrested may not have been white. The article didn't say. Note that Wellesley does admit black women. And a better comparison would be to just change one variable: the people, and keep the action and the pigment medium the same. Then we have: Would Reddit readers react the same if we heard of poor, inner-city women (or high school students) arrested for &lt;b&gt;chalking&lt;/b&gt; Gandhi quotes on a sidewalk. I'd be pretty bothered about that.
Toronto is a clean city. I'm shocked at how clean it is every time I go there. (I live in New York.) See the big mailbox-like things on the street corners? They're huge garbage cans with slots for recycling (bottles and paper) as well as garbage.
&gt; The media's ignoring Colbert's effect at the White House Correspondents Dinner is a very clear example of what others have called the media's penchant for buying into the conservative/rightwing "narrative." According to the liberals, the media is biased towards the conservatives, according to the conservatives; the media is biased towards the liberals. I suspect the truth is somewhere in between and it makes people feel better to have illusions of enemies.
I bet that people arrested are more often to be liars than the police.
Some places don't get much rain.
S'funny that so many legitimate scientsits don't agree with this concept. But then, we all know that Al Gore invented the internet.
The map is awesome.
Are you insinuating that I should get on my knees and start swallowing, dr2tom?
That is old news and the Iraqis, themselves, have proposed such a setup, much like American states. Biden acts like this is an original idea; I doubt he ever had one.
I'm not a Catholic, but I know manure when I smell it.
Hah, yeah.  There are many states with equally ridiculous licensing laws, though.  In some places you need a full cosmetology license to braid hair (and charge for it), or to give someone a manicure. If the main reason you trust your barber or floral arranger is that the government certified them, you've got problems. 
A great site for sports fans.
Fascinating! Death by masturbation! 
no, why would I?
This would also appear to prohibit a number of experiments that we did in 7th grade science and high school chemistry.
But if we read the article first, we'd be helping out a notorious spammer by sending traffic to his site.  If the previous 132 articles have been spam, it's a fair bet that number 133 is probably spam as well. People are giving you a hard time because it seems reddit was meant to be people sharing news and websites with people.  Self-promotion just messes with that. And you also didn't adderss the anthesis' claim that you're copying articles to your website - remember the last time you felt you had to defend yourself, when you copied from Alternet in violation of their copyright?
But the lack of coffee makes me a woozy irritable dickhead...decisions decisions...
when spain does this: it's bad  when the USA does this: it's great
This article is conjecture of the same kind which predicted budget surplusses through 2050 in 2002 and dow 100K in 1999.   What is up with the anti-US bias here?  The headline smacks of wishful thinking.  It might as well have read, Dollar starts the big slide against major currencies we have all been waiting for  or  Dollar starts the big slide against major currencies (keep your fingers crossed!)  
Good article.
It's not "fake" news.  It's very much real, that's the funny part.   
&gt; I wonder if within the first couple of years 93% of all that needs to be said about the 'y-combinator idea', has been said. That seems unlikely, since we're still discovering new surprises ourselves. I think you're mistaking the tone of pep talks with their content.  The stuff I write often sounds like pep talks because it's infused with optimism, but the advice is quite specific, and often novel.  At least, a lot of it is stuff I only figured out myself recently-- like the initial release acting as a shakedown cruise.  I only realized that in the process of writing this talk, a couple days ago.
I didn't find it too useful myself.  If you're just starting out, I'd recommend DrScheme (MzScheme is a part of that).
Not too different from the Christians after Justinian who destroyed the Pagan temples, statuary, and in some cases tried to destroy all evidence of the ancient world prior to Christ.
Dear God we can't have little terrorists making nitrogen tri-iodide!
this is a copycat site.  check out helpwinmybet.com
Is XML a programming language?
SLWYLFWTG?   State Licensed Would You Life Fries With That Guy/Gal - can it be far off?
Depressing, but it needs to be reported.
I'm sure someone smarter than me has come up with this idea before, but: maybe there's something that is relatively obvious at some point to research, that in the course of researching and experimenting, destroys the entire planet?  It doesn't even have to be a weapon. Maybe it's some type of interstellar travel technology, or just general subatomic experimentation. But maybe there's some easy way to accidently destroy our entire civilization, and any sufficiently advanced species eventually destroys itself before it can spread to other planets or solar systems. In any case, if there truly is something about the nature of complex organisms that makes them destroy themselves, there isn't a whole lot we can do about it, right? Presumably, they would've had just as much time as we did to try to come to the same conclusions about why no one ever contacted them, and it clearly didn't help them any, did it?
This is straight out of Niel Stephenson's [Snow Crash](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Snow_Crash).  The character, Y.T., has an auto-inflating helmet built into the collar of her jacket.  Sweet!
unless you put in 'C' and it crushes all others. And hey, Python is non-zero.
Maybe someone should have pointed at Bath ... and how you can make money from some broken stuff ...
why is your first assumption that it's balanced? Also, why should it be balanced in the first place? I, personally, think it's ridiculous to think of things falling nicely on either side of liberal/conservative.
This title is misleading and the study seems somewhat biased. If "caffeine increases our ability to scrutinise the content of a message", shouldn't you be better able to deal with issues, instead of blindly saying yes? When they say they gave people "a persuasive argument to read after having the caffeine", it sounds as if they gave them arguments in favour of voluntary euthanasia and abortion. If instead you gave them persuasive arguments *against* voluntary euthanasia and abortion, would they be more likely to say no? That's the other half of the study I'd like to see.
Why is this worth posting to Reddit? Should we start posting DrScheme, CLISP, Hugs, MoscowML etc. now?
You mean because people in the porn industry are probably tested far more often than your neighbors, and therefore less likely to be quietly using?  Oh, you didn't mean that?
Modded down. Crap.
They're paid to think about politics, that's their job.  If they can't figure out a good plan and decide on it, they can and will be painted as wishy washy, ala Kerry in 2004.  And then they will lose, or, at best, take just a few seats away from the Republicans. 
Schools probably come under an exempt category I am guessing.  Our science student enrollments are already dwindling every minute while numbers in the East are exponentially increasing.  This is another blow to future American inventors.  This Govt hand-holding has got to stop. I say take off all the safety labels and we will automatically solve the problem of getting rid of idiot-voters, idiot politicians and idiot corporations - AT&amp;T: No one needs more that 1.5Mbps at home.
heh. Apparently "extrapolation doesn't matter" either.
Don't get me wrong, I love reading your (Paul Graham's) stuff. I eat it up, evangelize it, and chew on it for days.  But (there's always a but), I've been hoping to hear from you about the "how-to" of marketing startups. I've seen startups go crazy with funding after 2 months of existence. Other than knowing people with money directly, how does that happen?  Even moreso than that, I'm curious about the best ways for a startup to get the word out about the products/services they are offering.  That is a lesson that I've had a difficult time learning.  I've yet to find people who love startups (read: article, post, discussion, dialogue) talk about it, and at least for me, it's probably one of the most difficult to learn. Mind writing an article on that?
I don't know if jesusphreak meant it, but I come away from the comment not with the idea that the media is balanced but that the media isn't as liberal or as conservative as the people who keep shouting those reductivist statements or the people who buy into that seem to think. For example, nowhere in the comment does it mention that the media is balanced or directly in the middle.
it's probably been said in other posts, but it bears repeating that languages take a long time. perl and python had been under active development for 5-10 years before they caught anyone's attention. ruby reached 1.0 status in 1996 and didn't get attention until 2004-2005. i'm convinced that languages take 10 years, which is likely a special case of joel spolsky's claim that good software takes 10 years.
Or, in the alternative... they were all women.
Give me a break. What has a declining dollar have to do with anti-americanism? "Anti-americanism" is a word I really dont understand, what are you talking about?
Or…maybe…just maybe…earth is special. Gasp! I realize that as largely rock-locked citizens of Earth we are not qualified to judge whether we are special or unique in the galaxy or universe. But it is possible. Even likely. The universe is dangerous, our solar systems even dangerous (although less dangerous than other areas of space). We live on a very wet rock in a very moderate climate and it seems to me to just be unlikely that there are many more locations like it in the Galaxy. A few? Sure. Is there life on them? Statisticlly unlikely.
The whole fake news thing is very convenient.  It makes it impossible to criticize it.   &gt;Stewart: You're on CNN. The show that leads into me is puppets making crank phone calls.   Criticism averted, and then he goes right back to bashing the media.
Check out the decorative lights which make the tree look like an octopus.
Doesn't sound like a good tool.
What a poorly written article. A paragraph explaing the branches of government at an 8th grade level, but no explanation (except implied in context) of what the hell a "signing statement" is. Is it some sort of line item veto (as was implied in the article), or is it (as Wikipedia suggests) just an administrative statement in which the executive office explains how executive policy is shaped by the legislation? In fact, according to Wikipedia, the precedent of using a signing statement to announce that certain portions of a law will not be enforced was established by the Clinton administration, and as for the number of statements, it looks like it's been steadily trending upward. I'm not saying Bush is in the right. In my opinion the wiretapping was illegal and unconstitutional. But that's only one law. I'd like to see some evidence for these claimed 749 violations, and I can do without the sophomoric explanation of our legal system.
Give me argument that background of this page is black, and I'll belive you.  Mr. Sem Osmanagic gave us much proofs to backup his theory about pyramids under the hill of Visocica, and I really belive him. Nature can not form such shape faced toward the cosmic sides of the world, with each side being exactly eqaul.
For them? Apart from hell, no. They'll never be happy as long as people can do things they don't consider "right". Since no two of them agree on what is "right", they'll never be happy. But as long as they're going to be miserable, they might as well go and ostracise themselves or something, so rational people don't have to put up with them.
Speaking 4 languages and after 5 countries the last 18 years I haven't failed to notice patterns.  I suppose that MOST people from big language groups (such as english) do not bother to learn foreign languages. That may not be annoying to you (I suppose you are english speaker) but it sure is to me.  
This guide is a quadrillion times better: http://www.fastseduction.com/guide/
With a pink hotel, a boutique and a swinging hot spot.
I saw tons of them in downtown Stamford today.  Keep your eyes open; they've been gathering in groups. Viva la Revolucion!
Well, identical twins is halfway to a "group" scene already.  I'm more curious to know how you got *to* G.  I can't think of an "E".
Yeah, that's what I was meaning, per "...I suspect the truth is somewhere in between..." Is it perfectly balanced and right in the middle? What in life is? I was just saying (as you suggested) that its not as far-right or far-left as some people think.
Do you have any experience with the police in that precinct? Do you know anything about the culture of the college the girls go to, or (even better), the girls themselves? Do you, in short, have anything other than "he-said-she-said, but some of his relatives are complete dickwads"? Innocent until proven guilty.
kapila, please, do sensible debate a favour. Find a dictionary and look up 'terrorism'. You'll find that it's not a synonym for cruelty.
I'm definitely not talking about counting.  Nobody is taking a tally, and marking off things, and comparing sums.  But you can tell the feel of a place (in this case Reddit). Absolutely nothing "scientific" about it.  That doesn't mean that the conclusion is incorrect, however.
Yeah, but they think there may be *billions* of other planets in our galaxy alone. And a planet doesn't need to be exactly like Earth to support complex life, either.
These out-of-control college students must be stopped.  You can't even have a decent war anymore without these do-gooders raining on your parade.  I say we ban chalk, sidewalks and that pesky free speech part of the constitution.   Freakin' troublemakers.
You might have been more creeped out had you known that "a flock" isn't the correct term for crows: it's "a murder."
According to Jews, Hitler was dangerous. According to Nazis, he was great leader. I guess, the truth was somewhere between. Hitler was just regular guy. Nowadays they just demonize him. You can see the  failure in this logic? Truth is not always somewhere between. Sometimes the truth is almost completely on the other side.  If there is thing that made other part angry and other part happy, it's newsworthy. Silence tells there is something wrong.
Isn't an orthographer a type of bird?
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Manufacturing_Consent  I think it's much more likely that the media falls more towards the extremes than the middle. I think this is much more noticeable if you actively look for the stories the mainstream isn't even looking at. By looking into the case made by Manufacturing Consent I don't think its much of a stretch to say that the mainstream really does swallow what the government feeds it.
Theres a simple reason the liberal media cares not to report colbert; they know that by doing so bush comes across as an even more likeable guy, and as someone that has the more correct perspective. Reporting colbert properly implies giving the edge to the President.
Quick poll: How many months are going to need to pass before articles about the Wii don't feel a need to explain how it's pronounced?
They made one mistake of their own: suggesting that "underway" should properly be written "under way".  Actually, the correct form is "under weigh" and referred to a ship which has lifted anchor.
I don't quite follow your logic. However if your assumption was correct, then wouldn't the conservative media outlets be reporting this?
Elegance *is* the point.
I personally like to think that intelligent life is just not optimally suited for survival. Maybe something extremely stupid will just out evolve us.
No
"Statistically" unlikely? Where are you getting your statistics? If you concede there are more Earth-like planets out there, why do you assert that they're not likely to contain life? By the way, Wikipedia has some good reading on the [Fermi Paradox](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fermi_paradox).
A fascinating article. This makes some points that I honestly had not thought of before. One thing, though. The article begins with a false dichotomy: *"It looks, then, as if we can answer Fermi in two ways. Perhaps our current science over-estimates the likelihood of extra-terrestrial intelligence evolving. Or, perhaps evolved technical intelligence has some deep tendency to be self-limiting, even self-exterminating."* These seem to be the front-runners, but they are not by any means the only two answers possible. There is, for example, the possibility that the galaxy (and the universe) is teeming with intelligent life and they're just not interested in us. Or, alternatively, we could be the subject of study -- in which case the observers would be very careful to keep their presence hidden. More than that, though, I have always been of the opinion that if we ever *do* come across a truly alien intelligence, we may not even be able to recognize it as such. If this is true, then we could have encountered E.T. already, maybe multiple times, and not even known it. Still, this guy makes some very good points.
Life (at least microbial) seems to spring up in the seemingly most inhospitable places on our (young) earth, and with something to the order of 10000000000000000000000 stars in our 'Hubble volume' (the observable universe), given the timescales etc. etc. there's certainly room for a roll of the dice or two. So I think it is statistically _likely_ that there is life all around the universe. It's just chemistry. 
what advantages does openbsd have for someone who isn't a security maniac? i run a vanilla installation of linux on my home computer and do security updates regularly. what does an operating system that doesn't come with networking enabled give me?
An unintended consequence of these laws is they could create a black market for chemicals.  Once there's a black market for hobbyist explosives, its pretty easy to get access to the "good stuff."
the problem here is, that no matter how fallacious your alleged arguements are (see my previous post) you will try to take the arguement elsewhere - in this case to places that do not or have a place within reddit.... spam?...news is not spam, be it from me, or any other website, newspaper, or periodical that reproduces news - or produces news.... copyright whatever is not an arguement for reddit... if you have a problem with the presentation of the articles, find them yourselves....  from reddiquette: "Post links directly to interesting things. Old content and self-promotion are okay, because Reddit is a meritocracy." this means do not linkjack..... and since i don't linkjack -------- well, leave me alone... 
Does this mean May 1st will be another paid holiday?
what the fuck?
Damn, my flying fish are *only* invisible. Looks like I got a dud.
&gt; If there is thing that made other part angry and other part happy, it's newsworthy. Silence tells there is something wrong. How you went from comparing Hitler and his actions against the Jews to modern media, I don't know. Anyway, I'd say that's the problem right there in your last sentence. Not the media but the fact that we break ourselves down into "other parts." Besides, where was the "silence"? They did report on the event - they did report on Colbert - its just the mass majority of readers wouldn't find *every single thing* he did as fascinating as the people on this site do. Having 10 stories about Colbert on the frontpage within a single day seems to speak more about the tilt of Reddit and its audience than it does about some media bias.
Wellesley does.
No, not "some people are wrong", but both sides overemphasize petty issues and things aren't as doom and gloom as many want to believe. Conservatives: there is no liberal media bias out to get you. Liberals: there is no conservative media bias supressing "the truth". The media is what it is and I'm not particularly worried about it.
*sigh* it's a satire of the stupid accusations leveled against Catholicism by fundamentalists.   
I think that to follow this line of reasoning to it's conclusion, Mr. Lazar ought to initiate a class action lawsuit against the estate of Thomas Edison (i.e. GE corp.) for the unsafe conditions to which he subjected the residents of New Jersey and New York during his dangerous experiments with electricity.
Because "Media Matters for America is a Web-based, not-for-profit, 501(c)(3) progressive research and information center dedicated to comprehensively monitoring, analyzing, and correcting conservative misinformation in the U.S. media."
They are. Michelle Malkin is the top conservative blog, or close to. MM was the first place I checked and there it is, proudly displayed: http://michellemalkin.com/archives/005102.htm Another top conservative blog (the second one I checked) also reports it: http://powerlineblog.com/archives/013927.php Another big, popular conservative blog (which is way politically incorrect on the matter of Islam) also mentions Colbert: http://littlegreenfootballs.com/weblog/?entry=20321_White_House_Correspondents_Dinner#comments Have you had enough? What else do you want? You want a regular publication? Maybe National Review Online? Okay, let's take a look. http://media.nationalreview.com/post/?q=NzFjOWQzNGUwYzgzMTZlYmU1M2NmOTA1MWQ2YWJkNTg= Have you had enough yet? Are you ready to crawl back into your little sheltered world of likeminded opinion? Back into your shells. Back! Back! The world is to big for you. 
Yeah, the 'not the most beautiful language' comment on that website shows how much you can trust it.
The plasma jet in the upper right corner of the photo looks pretty cool.  I'm wondering if smaller stars have bigger plasma jets because of their lower gravity, or if most plasma jets are the same size.
Haskell
George Bush is intensely likeable in person. I disagree to varying degrees with most of his policies (though not from the reddit perspective), thought the invasion of Iraq was a mistake, thought the medicare expansion was a mistake, think he's the very definition of a big government republican, but whenever I see him interact with people he comes across really well.
I think the best plan is to do no marketing per se: just make something great, and let word of mouth do it.
And how is this more efficient than the phase-change cooling systems that have been in use since the first mobile Pentium laptops came out back in the late 90's? Hrmmm :-)
Nut or not, the guy's provided a falsifiable hypothesis and is now attempting to disprove it. If these folks disagree, pooh-poohing the idea isn't the solution:  They should be scientists and demonstrate how the idea is false.
Your counter-example would be compelling if, in place of "I suspect the truth" jesusphreak had used the phrase, "I therefore conclude that EVERY SINGLE instance where there are two polar opinions, the truth..." You see, single counter-examples have absolutely no relevance to general statements, which I think it is reasonable to interpret his observation as.
Naah, probably Stamford Connecticut. We Yanks just like to pilfer names from the Brits. Then we give like 5 towns that same name so it seems like we own the name.   Viva la Colonies!
The idea behind reporting this "silence" isn't about this singular issue. The important thing people are trying to emphasize is that he brought up issues people have some stake in caring about. It's not about how funny he was (though the delivery was very important) it's the fact that the people who can reach the biggest audience don't find it important to talk about issues like freedom of the press.  "Conservatives: there is no liberal media bias out to get you. Liberals: there is no conservative media bias supressing "the truth". The media is what it is and I'm not particularly worried about it."  It's this kind of ass-backwards "level-headedness" that is the problem. When there is a problem people need to call it a problem and not dismiss it out of hand. In closing, is Colbert's performance super-important? No, it's not. Does it serve as a great example of larger issues not being addressed by the people that should be addressing them, absolutely.
Yes, exactly. This guy is doing an awful lot of speculating (e.g. Arc will not be open source software) based on a single footnote. Way too much of the blogosphere -- just like the cable news networks -- is dedicated to pointless speculation and baseless conclusioneering that just wastes everyone's time.
I'm not hassling you for linkjacking, just for spamming. As for taking the argument elsewhere, antithesis took you to task for copying content and you went on a rant about linkjacking. Hopefully lawyers will address the copyright issues before too long.  Address the spamming issue.  
The advice on microeconomics is right on the money.
The key is to not destroy your own cultural heritage.
This is so true.
&gt;Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent disinclination to do so.  - Douglas Adams, *Last Chance to See* You could be right, but we have our checks and ballances.
I tackled this in the last diary entry I ever wrote on Kuro5hin.org. However, I started by assuming it was true and then going on to how to make money off the phenomena. http://www.kuro5hin.org/story/2006/1/27/91230/4967
Bah, I don't think jesusphreak is basing his opinion on anything substantial. I actually think he was forming his opinion by saying "According to the liberals, the media is biased towards the conservatives, according to the conservatives; the media is biased towards the liberals." then just taking the middle ground. If there is a better reason to give any credence to his observations he should give it.
What's this got to do with Bush's poll numbers?  Y'all can stop looking at his approval rating, he did a long time ago.  HE'S NOT UP FOR REELECTION.
I'm not buying it. Seems like to many variables relative to sexual behavior were left unnacounted for. Regardless:  *FORWARDED TO GIRLFRIEND*
Colbert is not important, its the issues he represents to people. Colbert was doing satire, meaning there was more meaning to it than whether particular people thought certain jokes were funny. It seems the way the press works is someone says something that other people have an opinion on. So now they have an excuse to talk about it and give their opinion. Colbert said stuff that people want to talk about. Now people get to talk about it.
First, oberon asked what linkjacked means. antithesis gave the answer to oberon's question. i provided an accurate definition of linkjacking. antithesis therefore, incorrectly answered oberon's question...   From *The Spamhaus Project*  Spam: The word "Spam" as applied to Email means Unsolicited Bulk Email ("UBE"). Unsolicited means that the Recipient has not granted verifiable permission for the message to be sent. Bulk means that the message is sent as part of a larger collection of messages, all having substantively identical content.  \t A message is Spam only if it is both Unsolicited and Bulk.  - \t\tUnsolicited Email is normal email  (examples: first contact enquiries, job enquiries, sales enquiries) Bulk Email is normal email  (examples: subscriber newsletters, customer communications, discussion lists)   \t**Technical Definition of Spam** An electronic message is "spam" IF: (1) \t\tthe recipient's personal identity and context are irrelevant because the message is equally applicable to many other potential recipients; AND (2)the recipient has not verifiably granted deliberate, explicit, and still-revocable permission for it to be sent. Spam is an issue about consent, not content. Whether the UBE message is an advert, a scam, porn, a begging letter or an offer of a free lunch, the content is irrelevant - if the message was sent unsolicited and in bulk then the message is spam. Spam is not a sub-set of UBE, it is not "UBE that is also a scam or that doesn't contain an unsubscribe link", all email sent unsolicited and in bulk is Spam. This distinction is important because legislators spend inordinate amounts of time attempting to regulate the content of spam messages, and in doing so come up against free speech issues, without realizing that the spam issue is solely about the delivery method. \t**Important facts relating to this definition:** (1) the sending of Unsolicited Bulk Email ("UBE") is banned by the vast majority of Internet service providers worldwide.  
The world is full of magical creatures. BBC: Iranian woman 'gives birth to frog'  http://web.archive.org/web/20040705022645/http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/3844441.stm
Uh, May 1st is May Day, the International Workers' Day. It's basically a communist holiday. This is unsettling.
&gt; How you went from comparing Hitler and his actions against the Jews to modern media, I don't know. It's called [*Reductio ad absurdum*](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reductio_ad_absurdum), taking an argument to its logical extreme to show where (or whether) it breaks down. It's a perfectly legitimate debating technique, and I think notany used it properly.
"Muslims are not the only ones who are terrorists..." WRONG
Of course blogs are reporting on this. It's the larger media -- TV networks, newspapers, etc. -- that have ignored the story. That's what the stink is all about.
The larger media is not "the conservative media" referred to by stefanrusek (unless he is delusional). That's "the liberal media" that secdell was talking about in the post that stefan was replying to. "The conservative media" is a much smaller entity that exists these days mainly in the blogs. Even major conservative magazines have put a lot of their content in "blog" format - see the National Review link above.
Both the GOP and the Dems, either considered separately or together, are as a corrupt as a third world banana republic.  It is time to get rid of every single one of them on both sides of the aisle.
&gt; Does it serve as a great example of larger issues not being addressed by the people that should be addressing them, absolutely. Sure it might serve as an example, but its no different than the approach being used by liberals and conservatives across the country. Attack attack attack the other side. What good does that do? I'm sure many people don't agree with Bush, but they don't feel like they way to disagree and to fix things it to mock and disrespect the other side. This is why Colbert doesn't represent the people - his ideas might reflect what a lot of people are thinking, but the way he went about expressing them is not. And that's why Colbert and people who chose to attack the other side like that will continue to be ingored by the rest of America.   For whatever reason, those firmly in the liberal and conservative camps just can't come to grips with this and that's why the Democrats haven't won anything in awhile. Yeah, people know the war in Iraq is messed up - but reiterating that over and over is not the solution. Where is the solution? Who has it? People favor progress, they favor positive thinking rather than thinking that just rebukes the other side and then walks off patting itself on the back. People are going around high-fiving today, "Awesome! Look at what Colbert did. Man, the guy sure has balls!" Or from the conservative side, "Colbert bombed. Man he doesn't have any clue what he's talking about." Meanwhile the rest of America does not care. Its just more of the same.
&gt; Russia: before the revolution everyone was happy, literacy was high and the czar maintained a constitutional government under the rule of law (NOT). Russia under the Czar certainly wasn't pleasant, but it was a far cry from Stalin's regime, which was probably the most murderess regime in history. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stalin#Number_of_repressed ---- China: the Communists caused the worst famine in human history: ". In an effort to win favour with their superiors and avoid being purged, each layer in the party hierarchy exaggerated the amount of grain produced under them and based on the fabricated success, party cadres were ordered to requisition a disproportionately high amount of the true harvest for state use primarily in the cities and urban areas but also for export. The net result, which was compounded in some areas by drought and in others by floods, was that the rural peasants were not left enough to eat and many millions starved to death in what is thought to be the largest famine in human history. This famine was a direct cause of the death of tens of millions of Chinese peasants between 1959 and 1962. Further, many children who became emaciated and malnourished during years of hardship and struggle for surivival, died shortly after the Greap Leap Forward came to an end in 1962 (Spence, 553)." http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mao ---- Napoleon was a big imperialist bringing a lot of misery to the rest of Europe - far more misery than France brought before the revolution.
You really like your swears don't you.
Personally I love Myspace.  It is so pratical to be able to log on, say hi to friends, and listen to music.  It is one of my favorite sites.
He lost almost $1 billion last year, but made over $2 billion in the years before on his foreign exchange contracts. E.g. http://www.iht.com/articles/2006/01/02/business/dollar.php
Very good interview.  It's easy to believe that he's just going on air and pretending to be a jackass, but when you see an interview like this you realize how much thought goes into it. It's also always nice to see the real people behind on-air characters.  Jon Stewart's post 9/11 show was another such moment.
If true, this is bizarre.  I know I have a lot of fertilizers in my garage that could be banned by this.  Off the top of my head I have Potassium Nitrate (potash) as fertilizer and Stump Remover, and it is also used heavily by farming.  I have Sulfur in fertilizers too.  Both of those are used in heavy quantities by some people, and are currently sold in 50 pound bags out of gardening/farm supply places.  Potassium Permanganate is used all over the place, including in aquariums (I know I have some).  I expect that there are plenty of other examples of chemicals that would be affected that would impact people all over the place.
Wow, great quote.  Thanks. So, the real goal is beauty/Heaven.  I agree.  And I'm interested in the nature of beauty.  My current understanding is that it is a subtle pattern that emerges out of complexity/chaos.  I think it's worth understanding because the search for beauty just might be the one driving force beyond basic survival.  In the case of the art work I just find it interesting that we seem to find the same thing in two seemingly different directions.
So they are saying Myspace is over in comparison to a site in which you have to pay to send more than 5 messages a day. One article I just read about Myspace was about how they got more hits than google, while this one hasn't nearly that audience.
Wait, read the Wikipedia entry for Loyalty Day: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loyalty_Day It's been around since 1958. Apparently this is not new.
From the department of duh: if your system is compromised you can't trust it and things on are no longer secret
I'm quite certain I never spoke to what he was basing his opinion on, just that I took it as being a general statement.  The fact that he started his sentence with "I suspect" (not to  mention the shear length of his comment) suggests that it wasn't intended to be any sort of deep analysis, but rather just an off-the-cuff observation.
I noticed in of the comments posted there someone said "Isn't it wonderful what today's youth are talking about? Thank goodness this doesn't represent all of todays youth."  However this does represent most of today's youth because according to one statistic there are "about 27 million members" and Myspace has passed google in number of hits.
Great new player in Web 2.0. WikiUpload.com is del.icio.us for files.  Users can upload and tag any files upto a whopping 5 gb file size.  Wikiupload.com even create RSS feeds of files based on any user's account or your favorite tags.  Perfect for webmasters who can't afford to host their own content.
The media isnt reporting it because its a non-event.  His presentation was lackluster and came across not as funny, but just obnoxiously rude.  The president's skit was much more newsworthy as it showed a side of the real president rather than some comedian's lame jokes In short, Colbert is a nobody; the vast majority of americans have never heard of him.   [Now I really like him, think he's great, love his show, but I don't think this presentation was that good]
Have you met him?
"It's not about how funny he was (though the delivery was very important)" Yes, the delivery is very important. And Colbert bombed because of his delivery. He could have made the same points and won his audience over with better jokes based on them, though what would have been even better would have been to express an original perspective. That, however, would have jeopardized his status as left wing icon. He played it safe.   
Not really relevant -- Iraq's military was no match either -- look how that's turning out.
I like my sun a bit pink in the middle.
Jay Richards has done some interesting research on this topic. It seems that Earth is perfectly positioned in the galaxy to allow for maximum scientific development. The basic gist is that for some reason measurability correlates with habilitibility. For instance, moving a few degrees either way on the part of the Milky Way's arm that we inhabit would make it impossible for us to observe other solar systems. The exact composition of the Sun makes possible certain discoveries about the nature of light that are essential to scientific progress. http://www.privilegedplanet.com/synopsis.php
&gt; If you care about it never visit a zoo. So all the zoos that help keep endangered species alive by giving them a home and place to breed because their habitat has been destroyed (and go to great pains to reproduce the proper habitat for them) are run by animal terrorists? Who woulda thunk it.
Oh, no.  The plural is "data".  The singular is "datum".  "Anecdote is the singular of data" is grammatically correct, just factually wrong.  Well, in a narrow, literal sort of way.
They forgot: [Lazy?]--(Y)--&gt;[REALLY LAZY?]--(Y)--&gt;Podiatry
They sure talk a big game, though is there any indication this will really get off the ground?
At this point practically every day of the year is now a sanctioned holiday.
I was in Sarajevo on an (unrelated) holiday, and visited the Visoko dig this Friday (28th April 2006). Osmanagic was on site (complete with Indiana Jones headgear), and I chatted with him for a couple of minutes. He made the 12,000 year claim, and a 250-metre pyramid claim, and talked about 5 pyramids altogether. Caveat: I have no archaeological expertise whatsoever, and haven't followed these developments closely (we actually went there on a whim after seeing a couple of Internet articles, since we were there anyway). The 12,000 year claim sounds patently ridiculous to me, especially since Osmanagic also said that no material had been dated yet (he claimed that they would have to find some biological material connected to the dig first, which sounds reasonable). We only visited the "north side" of the dig, and I can confirm that they were indeed unearthing massive stone blocks with joins between them that looked very regular. But even though the hill was definitely nicely pyramid-shaped (and taller than 250 metres), I couldn't verify with my own eyes that those blocks were part of a pyramid structure for sure. So for me, the jury is still out. I must say, however, that the whole dig looked quite unprofessional. Nothing was cordoned off (we just walked right up), and he was using teenage volunteers with regular picks and shovels that were clanking audibly against the stones. That cannot be sound archaelogical procedure, even to my minimal knowledge. My gut feeling right now is that he has found something valuable (pyramid or not), and will be shouldered aside once the real scientists show up. Then we'll see...   [Edit: Fixed typo]
&gt; the parties take polar issues on everything Another view is that rather than polar opposites, they are in reality two sides of the same coin. They play out a kind of theatre of opposition in order to justify their own existence and this has a side-effect of kidding most citizens that matters of substance are looked at from different angles and navigates them towards a reasonable and balanced 'middle ground'. Back to Nazi Germany, the 'reasonable' middle ground may or may not have favoured genocide but would certainly have encompassed extreme racial persecution. So taking the middle ground doesn't protect you from extremism - in fact it can easily lead you there.
Yes, more and more. Roughly 20% is in foreign assets. Roughly 20% is in commodities.
I invoke [Godwin's law](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Godwin's_law).
Peace Arch Entertainment is preparing to release "Chapter 27" a film that helps a murderer fulfill his dream of fame.
Imagine how we could use Johns help today. Keep his memory and dream for peace alive.
Hmm, my impression has always been that Reductio ad absurdum tends to be fallaciously used outside of logic. Any point will seem ridiculous if you exaggerate it enough. The wikipedia link above points out this tendency. Heh, I just realized that link points to a notion of [Reductio ad Hitlerum](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reductio_ad_Hitlerum) that I think is more valid in this case.
This is an interesting idea althought I have to disagree. We are already more than capable of colonizing the moon. We just don't because, well, I dunno, ask an economist. The way things are going with Branson and Palmer, though, we may soon. That being said, any such catastrophy would have to be larger than planetary in scale to kill off all evolving societies. (It must kill all, only one has to survive past the catastrophy to the point of understanding and avoiding it) It would have to be larger than a solar system too, because frankly we could probably set up camp on Mars too if we really wanted to. Any catastrophy big enough to swallow a solar system is probably going to be obervable... very far away. Everything we've observed of the universe thus far *appears* to be natural, so this seams unlikely. Here's one thought. SOME society within our range of detection has to be the FIRST to make it... maybe we're just it.
Must have deleted my comment right as you were replying to it. Sorry about that. I mostly reiterated points I had already made so I didn't see the use for it being around. Anyway, the middle ground we are talking about is a political party vs a political party - not genocide compared to resistance. Its just isn't a valid comparison. I would not take a middle ground in Nazi Germany because its obvious what Nazi Germany did is wrong. Its not so obvious if either of the political parties have our best interests at heart.
'Out of Iraq' is a non-policy. Whoever is in charge, the US needs to do something to clear up the mess they created, not just vanish and leave the region destabilised.
I fail to understand why parent has been modded down. Anybody care to defend their decision?
&gt; Hmm, my impression has always been that Reductio ad absurdum tends to be fallaciously used outside of logic. That's a common misconception. The technique can certainly be misused, but it is also a very useful logical tool. &gt; Heh, I just realized that link points to a notion of Reductio ad Hitlerum that I think is more valid in this case. Not really. The article states that "The reductio ad Hitlerum fallacy is of the form 'Adolf Hitler or the Nazi party supported X; therefore X must be evil.'". That's not at all what notany said. He was not equating the mainstream media (or even the Bush administration) with Nazis; he was using the Nazis as an extreme example to illustrate the fallacy of saying "here's two extreme positions; the truth must lie somewhere in the middle". I know that [Godwin's Law](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Godwin%27s_law) is a fundamental component of Internet ettiquete, and it should be taken seriously -- I've called a number of people on it myself. But that doesn't mean that any argument that uses Hitler or the Nazis as an example is automatically fallacious.
PG has also suggested that speed *does* matter and that programmers should be making heavy use of profiling. I expect Arc 0.1 to be slow, but I don't expect it to stay that way.
"Birkenau was one of many extermination camps run by the Nazis, at first, but by the period of March 1944 to November 1944, when the use of all the other death camps had ceased, it continued its grisly function and surpassed all previous records set for mass murder. The gas chambers there measured a total of 2,255 square meters, and each delivered to its victims a lethal dose of Zyklon B; a hydrogen cyanide-based gas researched by one Fritz Haber during the closing days of the First World War. If it is indeed the word to use, the horrible irony is that Haber was a German Jew."
&gt; The larger media is not "the conservative media" referred to by stefanrusek (unless he is delusional). That's "the liberal media" that secdell was talking about in the post that stefan was replying to. Well, that seems to be the primary point of contention. But bringing blogs into the argument doesn't prove anything. The left-wing blogs are all over this story too, which clearly wouldn't be the case if secdell's argument was correct.
Oh boo hoo. Some graffiti needs special treatment now.
&gt; he was using the Nazis as an extreme example to illustrate the fallacy of saying "here's two extreme positions; the truth must lie somewhere in the middle". Problem is I never even said that. I said I suspected that the truth in this situation was somewhere in the middle. I never said it was or that it must be so. So he's argueing against a position I never even took.
The point is that we're talking about how likable he is in person, and you started talking about how much you liked him based on his policies, not how he is in person. Thus, I asked whether you had met him, to try to figure out whether you actually had any evidence one way or the other about his personal likability or whether you were just spouting off on a tangent. The latter turned out to be true.
&gt;Well, more than 50 percent of U.S. citizens are bumbling diots so there's no surprise he gets elected. That's a bit harsh, but I have to agree with your basic point. The people who like Bush identify with him. That's really scary to me. It's not the U.S. that I know and love, but apparently it's the U.S. that lots of people want.
"People favor progress, they favor positive thinking rather than thinking that just rebukes the other side and then walks off patting itself on the back."  One very good way to favor progress is to just help promote a more global opinion on things. Did we invade Iraq mostly unilaterally? Yes. Was the UN against this action? Yes. This is pretty simple. Democrats/liberals point out all the mistakes Bush has been making, then advocate not making those same mistakes. For more local things democrats/liberals should be pushing for more "independent media". This is important because it exposes you to people attacking problems from a totally different perspective and/or without the same loyalties to various things.
_"The article states that.."_ But check out [the examples](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reductio_ad_Hitlerum#Examples_of_reductio_ad_Hitlerum). To return to this particular argument itself: [A](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59bx): One group thinks x and one group thinks ~x. The truth is probably somewhere in between. [B](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59in): Jews thought y, Hitler thought ~y, but the truth wasn't somewhere in between. I think that is fallacious. A said 'probably', and his scenario is a lot more probable than B's. In any case, providing a counter-example completely sidesteps the question of how likely each scenario is. This is an example of why I think reductio ad absurdum often doesn't work outside of logic. In logic you don't have to deal with probabilities. You can just point to the extreme pain of bankruptcy to justify never using a credit card, etc. In general when I see two groups of people disagreeing I tend to think the truth is somewhere in between. *Especially* if I'm in one of the groups; to do otherwise risks complacency. I might be just rationalizing my opponents away rather than thinking about their points.
it probably doesn't matter, but i heard a very highly respected senior professor associated with the FairIsaac corporation (they invented credit ratings) and UCSD say something very similar in spirit to this in a guest lecture. he said it in such a way that i was almost stupified. i walked out of the lecture hall in a daze.
Meet the new boss.  Same as the old boss.
The link above points to the leaf of a (pretty interesting IMO) discussion thread. Yes, I was downmodded, but please keep reading. I'm not complaining about being modded down. First a snapshot of the thread and summary of current mod points that I'm talking about: [1](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59bx)(-4) Makes point. [2](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59in)(16) Extrapolates point to Hitler. [3](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59kf)(-1) Asks how extrapolation is justified. [4](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59nq)(11) Claims it is justified because of [Reductio ad absurdum](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reductio_ad_absurdum). [5](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59qq)(-1) Disagrees. [6](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59r9)( 6)  Disagrees. [7](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59sq)(-1)  Disagrees. See the pattern here, the alternating positive and negative mod scores? 5-7 happened in the space of a few minutes, so I could see several people modding up 6 but not 5 or 7, and a smaller group modding 5 and 7 down. Hence my question: Could this be anything but modding by agreement? If y'all come up with a counter-hypothesis we'll talk about that; since I can't think of one let me just run with implications. * Such a thread is interesting. In this thread my personal mod points were up for every single comment. It was just a really interesting flow of conversation. * If I find myself upmodding a comment after downmodding its parent I will go back to check if my downmod vote was lazy, just because I disagreed with it or didn't bother thinking about it. Assuming the thread is interesting enough. * Perhaps the 'controversialness' of a thread (interleaving of up and down votes in comments, length of each comment, frequency and immediacy of replies) should give it a disproportionate boost up a page. In this case the interleaved upmods are quite sufficient to keep the thread at the top, so perhaps this isn't important. In any case, I just thought it was interesting to be able to make hypotheses of people's motivations just by looking at mod scores on reddit. This sort of datamining could get arbitrarily sophisticated. Drat, I should have submitted to [features.reddit](http://features.reddit.com). (update: [done](http://features.reddit.com/info/59v8/comments))
&gt; &gt; Stewart: You're on CNN. The show that leads into me is puppets making crank phone calls.  &gt;   &gt; Criticism averted, and then he goes right back to bashing the media. I don't see where the complaint comes from. Stewart doesn't claim to be anything other than a heckler.  On Crossfire, they are hecklers who *pretend* to be serious analysts.  It's the pot calling the kettle, which is hiding under a tea cozy, black.  Put another way: I think it's perfectly reasonable for the Harlem Globetrotters to point at professional wrestlers and say "That's not a real sport!" It's easy enough to criticize Jon Stewart.  There *are* times when his material falls flat, or his delivery is off.  There aren't **that many** in my opinion, but I have actually seen some segments where it just wasn't working. **Edit**: formatting.
make sure you do the same to this person, too....   \t  [Cheney refuses to comply with President's declassification tally order](http://reddit.com/user/cleanthes/)... and to truthout.org, and alternet, and blogcritics, and smirking chimp, and prison planet, and consortium news, and the raw story, and truthdig, and information clearinghouse, and antiwar, and common dreams, and environmental news network, and ....all the hundreds of posts here from people who cull information from those sites... catch my drift?... and, if it were illegal, do you actually think any of these or the perhaps 10,000,000 sites that do the same thing (10,000,000 at the **very** least, since there are about 46.2 million dot com sites - so figure .org, .net,. info, etc....) would exist?....  an addendum: just a little while ago after posting the article on bolivia, i called a friend who owns a marketing firm - actually they do the marketing for the x-games, and this is what he said: "yeah i know reddit. the thing about some of these people is, if your site said C2ore, sponsored by paul graham, they'd all say 'what a great thing it is for someone to put all the "important" news on one website. but since your last name isn't graham or jobs, or one of their other favorites, they don't see the headline screaming at them that a south american country's decision to to nationalize their oil might have a huge effect on their lives; they see the little letters to the right - in your case, c2ore.com. it's sad, but that's where alot of people are now. it happens everywhere, it's permeating our society. it's not the message that matters, it's the messenger (which is something i've said before here). it's like they think they're cool, but they're just "cool sheep." it's what i fight every day."
PHP, SQL, and JavaScript. Previous positions have included Perl and (ba)sh as well. Posting this as a separate comment because of the disturbing number of entries with negative numbers. (I like someone's comment about "anti-Korn shell scripting".) Can we find a standard reddiquette for polls? And is there any way we could enforce it? 
I realize reddit might not be a place for something like this, but just trying to pass the word on anywhere I can for their family.  If you know where a good place for this sort of thing, let me know.
Hey - you don't need to try and convince me.  You just need to convince the lawyers for sites that you are copying the content wholesale from.
Well   Colbert is ingonerd no longer.  The Washington Post is covering the speech on its frontpage website.  http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/linkset/2005/04/11/LI2005041100879.html
&gt; Anyway, the middle ground we are talking about is a political party vs a political party - not genocide compared to resistance. Its just isn't a valid comparison. Of course it is. The middle ground is what seems like a reasonable moderate position to anyone who reads the newspapers and listens to the politicians of the day. The whole point is that it has been demonstrated that a majority of normal people can be lead to genocide in this way _because they aren't aware of it being wrong_. &gt; I would not take a middle ground in Nazi Germany because its obvious what Nazi Germany did is wrong. You seem confident that you would succeed in maintaining objectivity where millions of Germans failed. Or perhaps you think they were all evil or very easily duped.
Indeed: http://reddit.com/info/3di8/comments
Then ditch cons cells entirely (see [Dave Moon's suggestion](http://www.archub.org/arcsug.txt)) and program to a sequence interface.  Common Lisp and Python do this already it works quite well.  Haskell and Erlang went with the "strings are lists" idiom, with the result that anything remotely performance-critical has to be done with a separate "packed string" type, which *doesn't* conform to the typical sequence interface. If you're using car/cdr/cons, you're working at the wrong level of abstraction anyway.  Most list operations should be [anamorphisms and catamorphisms](http://citeseer.ist.psu.edu/meijer91functional.html), and the only time you should ever have to recurse down a list is to implement fold.
Didn't that Vacuum guy Dyson already do this? ;)
I just checked my inbox and I have eight emails from PG, including three from the past six months, so I don't see why that would be the case.
My favorite line was: Q. Tell me about some of your patients who are addicted to technology. A. The ultimate one is the woman who asked if it's normal  that her husband lays his BlackBerry down on the bed next to them when they make love. It's odd that he would do it, but even odder that she would think it might be normal behavior. I have another woman who calls her husband's computer his ''plastic mistress."
if you're not going to do this to all these other sites and all the myriad posts here from those sites, then it's pretty obvious you and all the ones like you are here to pick at someone or something - in this case, c2ore, and me. now *that* is saddening. i'll repeat this reddiquette  "don't":[Don't] "use reddiquette as a means of harrassment or criticism. It's just a guideline - it's not a contract."
&lt;sarcasm&gt;If you don't like Loyalty Day GO BACK TO RUSSIA!&lt;/sarcasm&gt;   
It's no surprise that the washington press corps and the media institutions they are supposed to represent are trying to cover this one like a cat covers a hairball. That bit about "Decide, Announce, Type." cut quite close to the bone, and shows how big media (now more concentrated than before!) has been completely coopted into the oligarchic power structure. Given that this thread godwinated by the second post, nothing useful can be gleaned from it, except for the fact that there are apparently people who find it worth their while to attempt to convince the rest of us that up is in fact down, the evidence of our senses is in fact in error and that anything that questions the primacy of GWB or the republican party is just plain wrong. Given the energy they devote to the task, it almost seems like they doing this as a full time job. Perhaps they are... (I wonder what IP jesusphreak posts from)
&gt; In general when I see two groups of people disagreeing I tend to think the truth is somewhere in between.  It seems intuitive, but I think it's a common and dangerous fallacy. The Earth was always round despite arguments to the contrary.
You sound worried.  Are you doing something wrong?
How'd he say it?
[Discussion](http://reddit.com/info/59tc/comments#c59tf)
smile and grin at the change all around,  pick up my guitar and play,  just like yesterday.
Quite.  But really, can we not say ENOUGH OF COLBERT already??
It would be interesting to able to compare this number to previous presidents...
no, not at all. but, "the duke" - wasn't that john wayne's nickname?
Yes, I understand that you have to take the relative size of the groups into consideration. I really don't think I'm saying something controversial here.
&gt; Problem is I never even said that. I said I suspected that the truth in this situation was somewhere in the middle. I never said it was or that it must be so. &gt; So he's argueing against a position I never even took. Maybe so. But it sounds to me like you're backpedaling. I know you didn't claim to have ironclad logical proof that the truth *must* lie somewhere in the middle, but you still clearly believed that it did -- without providing any sensible reason why. It came across as a shallow platitude glossing over an important issue. I think the reason he responded the way he did is because "I believe the truth lies somewhere in the middle" has become a bit of a cliche. It's a one-liner representative of the sort of wishy-washy superficiality the media shows when dealing with difficult subjects: just throw up both sides and you've done your job as an objective reporter. In fact, your choice of words is rather ironic, because Colbert himself used the exact same phrase during his Daily Show correspondent days in a bit lampooning the media for exactly this sort of thing. I believe the example he used was "Does Jon Stewart molest children? Some say yes, some say no. The truth probably lies somewhere in between."
Awwwwwww.
Hrm, ... it seems to me that during the [Iran-Iraq war](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Iran-Iraq_War) Iran used a "human wave" tactic... where vast numbers of people would just stamped say a minefield or any agressor.  It caused a tremendous amount of casualties, for sure, -- but if they have over a million people willing to do this, it is a formidable defense, no?
National Venture Capital Association offers a "template" set of public domain model legal documents that are "fair [and] avoid bias toward the VC or the company/entrepreneur" and reflect "current practices and customs".
No, it absolutely *would* be the case if secdell's argument were correct, as it indeed is. Secdell is saying that the liberal media realize that it would be a bad idea for their mixed audience to learn too much about Colbert's performance, because it would make Colbert and by extension themselves look bad. But this restraint obviously does not apply to left wing blogs, since left wing blogs have a mainly left wing audience, not a mixed audience. Moreover leftist bloggers just are a lot more oblivious than liberal journalists, who know their audience quite well because that's what they're paid to know.  
Nature can do more things than humans can. Never underestimate the strangeness of real life.
What we are arguing about is a [heuristic](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Heuristic): when you see reasonable people arguing, assume both are kinda right. Providing extreme counter-examples does not invalidate a heuristic. Thinking in greater depth may cause you to change your mind. That doesn't mean the heuristic is bad. It's just a starting point. _"..a majority of normal people can be led to genocide in this way because they aren't aware of it being wrong."_ So should we stop dealing in heuristics altogether and think about each question as if it could lead to genocide? [curls up into foetal position]
Or possibly... FTL travel is practically impossible, so none of them could visit, even if they wanted to and knew where we are.
That's nonsense. Bush is no idiot. Bush is able to genuinely laugh at himself. He is genuinely humble and self-deprecating (or if not then he puts on one hell of a convincing performance). He's not an insufferable asshole like (for instance) Kerry who is utterly full of himself and quite unable to laugh at his own expense: http://washingtontimes.com/national/20040319-111143-9159r.htm [quoting:] On Thursday, Mr. Kerry snowboarded down the mountain before a Secret Service agent who was supposed to be protecting him accidentally ran into him. Asked about the tumble moments later, an angry Mr. Kerry reportedly used an expletive to describe the agent "who knocked me over" and said: "I don't fall down."   While zig-zagging down the mountain yesterday, Mr. Kerry wiped out six times on his own in view of reporters.   "The snow up there was the worst I've ever seen," he said after a three-hour ski at 9,000 feet. "I've never seen the snow so soft." 
&gt; Maybe so. But it sounds to me like you're backpedaling. I know you didn't claim to have ironclad logical proof that the truth must lie somewhere in the middle, but you still clearly believed that it did -- without providing any sensible reason why. It came across as a shallow platitude glossing over an important issue. That's because I wasn't trying to gloss over an important issue and I wasn't trying to make any definite statement. I was making an observation. Don't look too deeply into it - its just a quick comment I made based on the fact that I always see conservatives whining about the "liberal" media and then I see this guy on his high-horse about the "conservative" media and how its out to silence the truth. &gt; I think the reason he responded the way he did is because "I believe the truth lies somewhere in the middle" has become a bit of a cliche. It's a one-liner representative of the sort of wishy-washy superficiality the media shows when dealing with difficult subjects: just throw up both sides and you've done your job as an objective reporter. At least they are throwing up both sides. They could just be throwing up one side of the story and you wouldn't be able to make your own opinions on it anyway. That was my point - the media today isn't as liberal nor conservative oriented as most people try to make it out to be. It tends to be somewhere in the middle showing both sides of the story. &gt; In fact, your choice of words is rather ironic, because Colbert himself used the exact same phrase during his Daily Show correspondent days in a bit lampooning the media for exactly this sort of thing. I believe the example he used was "Does Jon Stewart molest children? Some say yes, some say no. The truth probably lies somewhere in between." Its not a very good example as you are speaking of two different things. One is a state of being (conservative or liberal) and the other is something you do. Molesting is an action - its something you do. You don't conservative. You don't liberal. They are states that you put yourself in by a sum of actions. Thus its much easier to make a definite statement "yes, so and so does molest children" vs "so and so is liberal." Heck, I can do conservative things and still be liberal. But if someone molests someone else, you can't do things that make that action go away.
Kerry was no more intelligent than Bush. He was one hell of a lot more arrogant.
So we may conclude that the MSM is only part evil; it's partly just slow...
China wasn't the first country to do this... During aparteid, a South African toy store did such a great job at imitating ToysRUs; that ToysRUs got a lot of hate mail asking why they were doing business in the country
What really made this for me was his Interwoven [link](http://www.interwoven.com/company/) and enterprisey excerpt. Let's hope they check their refer(r)er logs and care. Probably neither. (In general, I've enjoyed others more, but whatever, it's personal ..)   
Makes clicking on 'hide' more convenient and mitigates the problem of [people voting on stories without reading them](http://features.reddit.com/help/reddiquette?r=43). (See my comment at the bottom)
"parent" fails to agree with reddit consensus reality.
This is one of the things that's so weird to watch from outside the US. The whole political spectrum is right-shifted.
Throwing up both sides is not always a good thing. Some sides are just pure bullshit, and if the media diligently reported and stuck to the facts, they would definitively show that the bullshit sides are, in fact, bullshit. The molestation thing was funny because it was true-- take the Swift Boat BS as a perfect example. What the Swift Boat people said was flat out false, but they were reported as just another side.  What this does is give an advantage to the side that yells loudest, because, as your quick comment shows, the opinion induced by the media is the average of all positions shown. So, if you want to pull the message in a particular direction, make outlandish, sometimes blatantly false claims in that direction and trumpet them very loudly. The right wing has been rather successful at this in recent years, especially in the run-up to the Iraq war and in the 2004 election (flip-flop Kerry might have, but Bush certainly flopped pretty hard between his statement in 2000 that "I do not support 'nation-building'" to the 2003 "We will build a new nation in Iraq.").  Edit: The difference? The Republicans successfully yelled much louder. And they still almost lost.
&gt;The spirit of resistance to government is so valuable on certain occasions, that I wish it always to be kept alive. —Thomas Jefferson
&gt; That's because I wasn't trying to gloss over an important issue and I wasn't trying to make any definite statement. I was making an observation. Don't look too deeply into it - its just a quick comment I made based on the fact that I always see conservatives whining about the "liberal" media and then I see this guy on his high-horse about the "conservative" media and how its out to silence the truth. Fair enough. For what it's worth, I think it's a fallacy to describe the media as being inherently "liberal" or "conservative". What they are is a business, and as such their primary bias is financial. There's also the problem of laziness, which leads to the "present both sides as if they were equal" problem.
We are slowly but surely finding that the other 'animals' out there are more aware and sentient than we ever realised. We are so arrogant about being at the apex of evolution :-)
My initial response is "Ooo I am so scared."  But there are a lot of stupid people out there that seem to procreate a hell of a lot more than the smart people.  And not everyone is dialed into gaming or fast food.  And who cares if there are aliens, does that some how answer the question of why we are here?  Doubt it.
行きたいなあ。
oh the irony, using water to start a fire
They don't necessarily need to visit for us to know they exist. And we're talking about such massive time scales that slower than light travel ought to be enough to make them visible, presuming such travel is feasible.
&gt; and, if it were illegal, do you actually think any of these or the perhaps 10,000,000 sites that do the same thing (10,000,000 at the very least, since there are about 46.2 million dot com sites - so figure .org, .net,. info, etc....) would exist?.... Ah, the "everyone's doing it, so it can't be illegal" argument. Copying more than a few lines from a copyrighted work, without permission, in addition to not quoting the original source is plagiarism. You're violating copyright, not in some minor technical way, but blatantly. My wife's worked with writers who thought it was perfectly okay to cut and paste text from a competitor's website into their own articles. Duh!  &lt;cranky-old-man-voice&gt;Don't they teach those damn kids anything in high-school anymore?&lt;/cranky-old-man-voice&gt; See: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Plagiarism
[Air India Flight 182](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Air_India_Flight_182)
These words ring true, without a passion for what you do, it's pointless and in the end, unfulfilling
Its very impressive...
downmod story, and comment and you
We could send a generation starship far away with current technology. It might cost the GDP of Earth for a few years, but it isn't impossible.
&gt; Almost invariably, once a committee touches a language, it goes stale and starts to suck... What about Haskell?
If one takes out the risk of hurting oneself on a motorbike the rider will do more dangerous things because he likes the risk of getting hurt and pushing limits without actually getting hurt. The thrill factor.  Therefore this device is unlikely to reduce injury particulary to 3rd parties.  Tell me a biker who has'nt come off his bike especially to impress the young ladies. Come'on you can't find one can you :-)
Remember, loyalty is the highest virtue a dog can exhibit.  Woof! Woof!
Good
ah. the infamous just-so story of the world. No, sorry, we don't put up with this crap regardless if it's called science or religion.
Release songs.
ASM
We're ugly. That's another reason that no one might have found us. Earth life might have some characteristic that makes it somehow undesireable due to uselessness, being extremely common, or being dangerous &amp; not worth whatever value we might provide. FTL travel might be totally impossible, and other methods of interstellar colonization might take way way longer than Fermi figured. It might be impossible to colonize much of the galaxy or the universe in millions of years.
Summary:  "We've now invested in enough companies that I've learned a trick for determining which points are the counterintuitive ones: they're the ones I have to keep repeating."    1. Release Early.  2. Keep Pumping Out Features.  3. Make Users Happy.  4. Fear the Right Things.  5. Commitment Is a Self-Fulfilling Prophecy.  6. There Is Always Room.  7. Don't Get Your Hopes Up.  8. Speed, not Money. 
&gt; .. programming new editing commands [in Lisp] was so convenient that even the secretaries in his office started learning how to use it. They used a manual someone had written which showed how to extend Emacs, but didn't say it was a programming. So the secretaries, who believed they couldn't do programming, weren't scared off. They read the manual, discovered they could do useful things and they learned to program.
ditto Stonehenge
For the record, I had no idea how to pronounce it until I read this article.
Brilliant.  I have thought along these lines, but could never have articulated it so well.   Shall we off to the creation of the atheist biblical science fiction stories?
heh, looks like the debian swirl :)
PG  - thoroughly enjoyed the article, having read it twice now.  But I hate typos.  See item [5] "Commitment is a self-fulfilling prophecy": in the paragraph that begins "If an acquirer..." - there should be a "to" in this sentence: "So if you make it clear you're going &gt;to&lt; succeed no matter what..." Thanks and keep up the good work.
There is no solid definition of spamming in reddit like there is for email.  The email definition is irrelevant, and seems like you're being overly-literal to dodge the issue. What you're doing seems to fall under the commonly used definition of "spamming" in reddit.  Deal with it.
The author fails to consider a few very important idea: - Life is very small and the galaxy -- universe is VERY BIG... in not only 3 spacial directions, but also in time. Consider the volume of humanity multiplied the time it has began broadcasting electromagnetic radiation... and compare that value to the volume and lifetime of the universe. - Considering the staggeringly small ratio described above, we have only "searched" the universe maybe for the last 50 years? And with technology and techniques that can barely detect planets in our immediate stellar neighborhood? - Consider the ratio above AGAIN. We have barely BEGUN to exist as appreciablely advanced intelligence . Assuming that nearby intelligence is monitoring all of space at all times and can instantly recognize intelligence and react immediately with response at c that we can immediately detect and understand on receipt (all _so_ extremely unlikely) , the furthest away these aliens could be is 100~ light years / 2 / ~50 light years. That is an infinitesimally small radius... and it only grows at 0.5t... linear time... Shit, it is likely that spacial directions are growing at O(t). - The idea that smart, industrialize people are living their way to extinction does not consider the implications of a trivially long lifespan and reproductive life. Since we're considering psychological pressures on technology, is there any GREATER force on humanity than the fear of death? I think it is possible that people born today will have the opportunity to live thousands of years. But I also think that considering the exponential rate of technology, in 1000 years biological immortality will be trivially available. 1000 years is only ~50 human generations.
&gt; Ed Shuryak, a physicist at Stony Brook University in New York said: "It's very useful in that it will inspire thinking in that direction.  &gt;  &gt; "But it's going to be another thng to see if it produces any fruit." Um, yeah, thanks Ed.  That was enlightening.
The viruses one is great! I laughed so hard when I saw it on TV. Just in time for Apple to hear some of those complaints MS always gets. Proof that no mega-corporation is worthy of worship.
Simply put, it's the divine right of kings.
Sadly, funding seems to be running out for Brookhaven, and every other high energy physics lab in the US. By 2010 ( the date Fermilab is scheduled to close ) , no major high energy physics research will be done here anymore.
Many web2.0 apps are translated by their users, for example Meebo is even translated to esperanto. http://wiki.meebo.com/doku.php?id=translation_esperanto
SETI@home's stability has declined a bit since they came up with the modular BOINC software. I'd recommend sponsoring the BBC Climate Change BOINC for functionality and looks.
Yah, that's what I tell myself when I skip class almost daily haha
By the way, many people in this discussion don't consider learning new languages. I'm a foreign PhD student in France and I work with many other foreign students who are all learning French. This is not seen as a problem but as an oportunity. Learning languages is good for your brain and for openmindness, I speak 5 of them and it is a pleasure!
Joe Haldeman's book "The Forever Peace" touches upon this.  IIRC, some scientists in the book are attempting to build a very large particle accelerator, which the hero has learned will cause another big bang.
Just because strings are lists doesn't mean they have to be implemented as struct cons { void *car; void *cdr; };. You can specify that any function that can act on a list can act on a string, yet still implement them as byte arrays.
exactly, exactly (just kidding)
Speaking of which, any civilizations that we happen to glimpse through either radio or visible light telescope would be as old as they are far away in light-years.  Given how relatively young the universe was when Earth formed, I doubt that any such planets are close enough that we could see them at a stage beyond microbal life, if that.
I've always liked this one: http://www.engin.brown.edu/courses/en81/images/Jet_Trailing_Vortex.jpg These vortexes are the major cause of loss of energy of aircraft at low speeds (at high speeds simple friction with the skin of the aircraft is) and is the reason that aircraft designed for efficiency e.g. http://www.schaenissoaring.ch/club_teil/asfk2003/rw14.jpg have long narrow wings, or winglets on the end of the wing. Note though that you'd never use winglets if you had the option of  just making the wing longer instead -- this applies whether you're talking about Ben Lexen's Australia II which started it all and was racing under rules penalizing deep keels, or a 747-400 which has to fit into existing airport gates.
brandong's comment was what is commonly called a 'joke.'
He was not arguing that the relative size of the groups holding different opinions, but rather whether those views were correct.
Finally, someone said it!  That picture is awesome, in the original meaning of the word.
If I where to choose between the conservation of a wild live habitat full of beautiful creatures and the abilty to listen to a 1000 self indulgent musical mp3's I would not choose the later :-)
It's an interesting speech/essay to be sure, but also very old news.
It's funny. I had assumed this would be an article about how XML was making unnecessary to use traditional parsing tools these days.
This guy doesn't consider AI at all.  AI doesn't follow the typical rules of biological reproduction.  We're supposedly about 23 years from having the technology to create an artificial brain assuming Moore's law holds (Kurzweil).  Intelligent robots don't need to screw.
Personal experience dictates that many who have past all those exams often cannot put a sentence together or spell correctly and often have very limited life experiences because they spend all there time sitting and passing exams. How many childhoods have been lost in this obsession to pass exams. Obvious really. Passing an exam is not a sign of intelligence just an abilty to pass exams.
&gt; It's a lot harder to substitute for an interstate. And if highways really did choose favorite brands, you might buy a Pontiac instead of a Toyota to get the rush-hour lane, not because the Pontiac is actually a good car. This analogy is a good try, but somewhat flawed.  Just because the traditional model of internet service is through cables doesn't mean it will always be that way.  ISPs who try to limit bandwidth in annoying ways will find themselves losing customers to wireless/satellite ISP start-ups.  Letting the market solve this may seem slow, but in the long run the proliferation of new technologies will more than make up for it.  If government gets involved, it will kill the incentive for new and better technologies to compete with the old ISPs.
what would be your nominee for a bigger bunch of bush suckups that is nevertheless this side of FreeRepublic?
You know, it would be very interesting to watch a reprise of his performance in front of a crowd that agreed.  I didn't find a lot of the routine funny, but I bet it would have been amazing with a responsive crowd.
the "i'm a mac" guy is cute... any idea who he is?
"Basically, I think the aliens don't blow themselves up; they just get addicted to computer games." Ok, this is just silly.  A more likely explanation about why extraterrestrials haven't visited us: The universe is fucking huge.  Although the possibility of life existing on another planet is high, it would take an incredible amount of time &amp; technology for said aliens to travel across the vast distances between galaxies.  Then they would have to find our tiny speck of a planet at the edge of one galaxy among a billion...
Doesn't the fact that scientists are creating black holes in laboratories worry anyone else?
no fair, nature gets to run massively parallelized. &lt;/rant of frustrated genetic programming user&gt;
That prominence toward the upper right is enormous.  Was that the motivation for the photo?
Haven't these people seen "Event Horizon"? :P
But what about party robots? Homer: Me like beer.  Robot: I like beer.
The modding is so freakin partisan. This site is so very left wing. Gotta love it.
&gt; So the development of that operating system, the GNU operating system, is what led me [RMS] to write the GNU Emacs. Ok, now I see why I keep hearing `Emacs is an operating system'
I enjoyed naps in kindergarten.
But god forbid anyone should interpret that comment as unpatriotic.
Learn about cool things you can do with your iPod, including installing Linux on it and playing video games.
Slashdot users would be most interested in finding a use for those condoms in their wallets. Someone send them a linky alert of this trick.
Yes, i second that. For starters (like me) DrScheme is great. It has one of the biggest repository of libraries, a cool IDE and can interpret and compile scheme.
The last one was not one of the lessons; just the title of the concluding section.
&gt; There can only be so many successful companies whose constituents expect to get paid by unloading the whole thing onto someone else. Really?  What imposes a limit on the number of startups that could get acquired?
I'm still waiting for mine, but C# keeps me in rent and electricity (and doesn't leave me time for much else). :( For now, I'll just keeping reading PCL for a few minutes each night before sleeping.
college applications counseling
_"Someone doing a poor job of presenting reasoned arguments versus someone doing a good job, perhaps."_ Such threads tend to die out in my experience. The quality of discussion is proportional to the quality of resistance. And there are multiple people involved here. It's not like all the odd-numbered messages are by one person and all the even-numbered ones are by another. _"I don't think that there's any point in trying to get people to mod based on one criteria or another."_ Yeah, I'm not talking about policing etiquette here, but about how downmods can sometimes be an indication of interestingness.
Is it a bird?  Is it a 'plane?  No - it's a superhero party theme!  So, wear your underpants on the outside, and fly by for fantastic fun!
You can write java non-sequential (and I do for exactly the same reason):  public List getListPeople() {    List list = new ArrayList(); {     try {      Person p;     p = null; {       String name = "amy";       int age = 25;       p = new Person(name, age);      }      list.add(p);      p = null; {       String name = "bek";       int age = 26;       p = new Person(name, age);      }      list.add(p);      p = null; {       String name = "cas";       int age = 27;       p = new Person(name, age);      }      list.add(p);     }     catch (PersonAlreadyExistsException e) {      new AlgorithmException(e);      list = new ArrayList();     }    }    return list;   } That's a bit contrived. But hopefully I've conveyed the idea of using scoping. It's great for longer methods because you can construct a tree of dependencies easily in your mind. "OK - so I'm returning a list," you think. You find that. Then you find things contributing towards it until you've got what you want, which doesn't necessarily involve understanding everything that the method does. And where it does it's far easier to do so. The java syntax isn't perfect for it, and there are some circumstances where it's impractical, such as when you're using connections. But usually there's a way of setting up your style to support it, and when you do it makes for much more readable code. 
Wow, this is stupid in so many ways...
Old, but Gold!
I'm apalled by the fact that software like this does not come pre-bundled with all major operating systems. Would be a great gift to science.
I suspect that as we get closer and closer to doing something really drastic to the universe, we're either a) Going to see incredible benefits from amazing new technology, or b) Not going to be around to complain. It feels even more win-win when you've just had an incredibly crappy day.
&gt; maybe there's something that is relatively obvious at some point to research, that in the course of researching and experimenting, destroys the entire planet? Like a black hole created in a laboratory?
Aridni helps small investors to translate the "Cramerisms" of Mad Money's Jim Cramer.
So are people who aren't in their twenties supposed to vote the poll down? Won't that mean nobody sees the poll? It's all a bit confusing.  I think it would be better to have a *comment* that you vote up or down.
The worst is they could have pointed ad Merida which is very close (relatively speaking) and makes reasonable dough from the Roman stuff, though it's true in Merida they're in rather good condition. 
It seems to me that the article assumes everyone has access to AND is interested in computer games, digital music.. what have you. But most of the human race has neither access to nor interest in these pasttimes and most of the developing world procreates greatly, with no regard to "how important leveling-up in WoW really is!". Playstation 3 is gonna rock though!
OMG OH NO!!!! http://reddit.com/goto?id=59v2
The article has some fair points. That's reflected in the fact that R6RS will include many of the missing features mentioned.  &gt;1- You can’t really have it both ways, either the language was too minimalist and thus these various omissions are problems, or the language isn’t too minimalist and thus these omissions are not in fact problems. It depends on how you define the problem. If you mean Scheme is unusable because it's too minimal, then it's not convincing since C became popular despite being turing incomplete without it's standard library (i.e. w/o malloc). So C is too minimalist; yet the library makes up for it.
Bullshit! American Government Co. stole international worker's day .   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/May_Day  Freedom fries, anyone?
I don't think this is a black hole by definition. Actually the title is kind of misleading. Not until towards the end of the story you find "...because it absorbs jets of particles produced by the collision, so creating a black hole." Then they paste an illustration of a "Black hole in space" and people start getting worried of what the scientist are doing... You see, scientists have to hype and spin their research in order to get (more) fundings. Sad but true. Which sounds more interesting to the public and the guy holding the money bag, "we shot gold nuclei towards each other" or "we created a black hole in the laboratory" -- even though you have to bend the truth a little bit?
обсуждение статьи можно найти здесь:  http://blog.perevedem.ru/?p=9 Вообще в эссе очень ценный анализ причин из-за которых стартаперы выбирают какую-нибудь совершенно коммерчески не жизнеспособную идею.
Enough to scare my co-employer.
If you delete a link, it shouldn't count towards your karma anymore.
Yeah, I mean haven't they seen Event Horizon? That black hole proved troublesome for Laurence Fishburne *and* Sam Neill. Next thing we know we'll be sodomizing each other while tearing our eyes out! Damn you, science, that wasn't part of the deal! That wasn't PAAAAAARRT........
Those ads are just a touch smug for my liking. (And this, sacreligiously, written on a 2 day old MacBook Pro.)
Аналогичная мысль была в Предпринимательских поговорках http://www.perevedem.ru/article/proverbs.htm : Если вы прячете свои секреты от рынка, он спрячет свои от вас: зачастую предприниматели чересчур озабочены сохранением в секрете своих замечательных идей. На самом же деле нам всем следует больше беспокоиться о том, что рынок не заинтересуется нашей новинкой (кто-нибудь помнит Segway?). Цитируя Говарда Айкена (Howard Aiken): “Не стоит опасаться, что кто-то украдет вашу идею. Если она оригинальна, то вам придется заездить все уши тому, до кого вы хотите ее донести”.
Yes, because idiots are probably going to try to break in and destroy valuable equipment when nobody was in any danger in the first place.  None of the black holes created in the upper atmosphere have eaten us yet, so its not likely to happen when we start making them either.
а Google тут причем? или думаете он будет выдавать заказные результаты в выдаче? или наоборот не показывать "неправильных"? так у нас вроде не Китай, так жестко никто на них давить не будет.
THIS LIFE IS A TEST. IT IS ONLY A TEST. HAD THIS BEEN AN ACTUAL LIFE, YOU WOULD HAVE RECEIVED FURTHER INSTRUCTIONS AS TO WHAT TO DO AND WHERE TO GO. 
Currently, RMS' essay "My Lisp Experiences and the Development of GNU Emacs" is [posted](http://reddit.com/info/59fn/comments) on the [main reddit](http://reddit.com).  To be sure, it's an interesting read, but it's also, in webtime, ancient.  It would be cool if there was a reddit specifically for, oldies but goodies like this one. Of course, this would implicitly mean that the main reddit is for new content.  I think this is a good thing, what say you redditors?
No. They lose energy faster than they can collect it. Hawking radiation means that black holes are not completely black: the effect implies that the mass of a black hole slowly evaporates with time. Although these effects are negligible for astronomical black holes, they are significant for hypothetical very small black holes where quantum-mechanical effects dominate. Indeed, small black holes are predicted to undergo runaway evaporation and eventually vanish in a burst of radiation.
Are modern football boots to blame for so many metatarsal injuries?  "The football boot twists Rooney’s foot, breaking the metatarsal and leaves Rooney and England with a slim chance of success at the World Cup 2006."
This is my desktop wallpaper. :)
This person demonstrates the vast features that the AJAX Framework Rico, possesses. Not only does he show examples, he supplies you with code, on how to achieve these various effects. This is a must read for all those AJAX newbies.
&gt; So should we stop dealing in heuristics altogether and think about each question as if it could lead to genocide? No, I'm saying that this particular common heuristic has proven to be flawed due to its inherent cognitive bias and with terrible consequences.
For real, every maniac that comes along with a new wild claim should have their reputation for craziness ignored and get some media coverage. It's not like this guy should have to prove he's found an actual pyramid to improperly excavate. Shameless plug: I have this new theory that the world was created by intelligent giraffe-testicle-riding monkeys. Scientists better demonstrate how this is false, or else.
Ah, I start to realize the source of disagreement. It is my belief that [the only way we have to decide on correctness or incorrectness is by convincing each other](http://reddit.com/info/2vyt/comments#c2xjg). How do you know that the earth is round? Because we argued the question over the millenia, and this answer has been convincing to the vast majority for a while now. This is basically the definition of science. Science provides a [heuristic](http://reddit.com/info/05994/comments#c59w8) approximation for truth: to convince yourself of the truth of something, convince your peers of it. We still have no better heuristic than this to judge the truth of a proposition. Just to be precise, the heuristic is not a simple majority. When the belief on a question is 51-49 or 75-25, science considers the question undecided. When it's 99.9-0.1 we assume it to be 'true'. But I guess folks here disagree. I got modded down into oblivion in that other thread as well; it's nice to understand why :) Thanks Matt. \------------------------------------------------------
What utter bullshit. War is peace. Freedom is slavery. Ignorance is strength. And the right to go behind the curtains and touch a screen which registers only what the government wants it to record is the right to vote. All Hail Big Brother.
An introduction into Object Oriented programming for current PHP developers and like-minded procedural programmers
"Basically, I think the aliens don't blow themselves up; they just get addicted to computer games." Games my ass! How nice this world would be if Hitler, Stalin, _______ (just name them) spent their time playing Halo....
Wow, that's cool!
No, the definition of science is not to convince your peers. By that measure, religion is science, and so is politics. No, a better (which is to say, not bankrupt) definition of science is the search for independently verifiable or falsifiable hypotheses that make useful predictions about the world. The peer thing is coincidental-- since it's verifiable, you can verify it too, and we can build a community of people who try each other's stuff and verify that no one is making shit up.  This is why science is not applicable to this debate; we're debating about the media and public opinion, and we're debating mostly subjective points. There are no possible verifiable hypotheses here.  The point about the world being round and everybody being convinced of it is a valid one, however: there are two groups disagreeing, one of which is completely right and the other of which is completely wrong. It happened in that case that the issue *was* factually verifiable, and it's been verified many times since then. However, it extends more generally, because it shows that the truth is not somewhere in between, it's completely on one side. It's a counterexample to your and jesusphreak's claim about this debate-averaging concept.
Too bad it only works at a certain angle.  Looks like crap any other way.  I'm sure people don't know what the hell it is if they're not in the sweet spot.
Well, at least you got some help from Jim Simons and the guys at his hedge fund, Renaissance Technologies.  http://www.aip.org/fyi/2006/006.html
_"..the truth is not somewhere in between, it's completely on one side."_ The truth is always on its own side. When it's about a simple question like "Is the earth flat?" there are only two possible answers: yes and no. When the question is, "Does MSM have a liberal or conservative bias." or ["Is reason or the senses the final arbiter of truth?"](http://www.bartleby.com/60/144.html) (empiricism vs rationalism), it usually turns out that the truth isn't entirely in either of the two simplistic sides that mortal man conceived, but more complex. This is what I mean by "lies somewhere in between". Often the first step in answering a fundamental question is to give up one's preconceived notions of the form one expects the answer to take. \-------------------------------------------------------------
I think they should not have released the first two, Viruses and Rebooting.  I like them as entertainment, they're cute; but I'm uncomfortable with them as promotion.  Here's why. Rebooting shows something that rarely happens to XP users.  And because XP is now four and a half years old, a big segment of viewers will see the ad as dishonest because it's arrogantly telling them they have a problem they don't have. That can't be good for Apple's rep. Viruses invites disaster.  Its message is pretty true today—though less so than before Service Pack 2—Macs really are less vulnerable.  But they might become more vulnerable in the years to come, and if they do, the message becomes a lie, a broken promise.  I didn't want Apple to advertise on malware, because Apple cannot guarantee the Mac will be indefinitely free from malware.  To an honest company, an ad is a guarantee.
You might not be inadequate, but you are average... these blogs give you advice how to stand out from the crowd...  And btw, if you call yourself an adequate OOP programmer and are unable to understand every pattern from the gang of four, there's something wrong with you.
I couldn't tell.  How can you?
_"Science is the search for independently verifiable.. hypotheses."_ Isn't "independently verifiable" equivalent to "convincing others"? Yes, religion and politics are not science. I suppose the part I'm not stating completely/well is that suppressing alternatives, using force or rhetoric are not valid ways to convince others. 'Convince' here means by force of intellect and argument alone. I really don't think scientists would disagree with what I'm trying to say here, but I'm probably not saying it well. _"This is why science is not applicable to this debate; we're debating about the media and public opinion, and we're debating mostly subjective points."_ Yeah, I'm not claiming we use science to determine if the media has a liberal or conservative bias. I'm claiming scientific method as independent corroboration of my opinion of how we approximate truth in the real world. If you fail to convince most people of something, perhaps you don't have the truth of it yet. \------------------------------------------------------------
That's the whole point.
Thats odd, since time flies slower near the equator ;)
I'm almost certain these are photoshops. a.) Who would let someone paint over their white stucco villa with blue paint? b.) In 6 the colours are too consistent for real life. It looks like someone merely used a layer and applied it using the screen option. c.) In 7 there are two lines on a building that is miles away and blurred; but the line is still in focus. This picture would require permission to paint ugly lines on five different buildings. d.) Apart from these images, I've never heard of any exhibits going on regarding these works. Let's see some links from the creators. EDIT: I am entirely wrong in this post.
Bingo. This point could not be more appropriate, particulalry since the software industry sometimes seems hell-bent on reinventing the whole history of management in its own context. There is no one-size-fits-all solution; there is no one right way to manage, and so on. But that is not an excuse for the sort of chaos my own organistion exhibits from time to time. The problem is to find controlled and systematic ways of doing things in an environment where algorithms cannot be derived.
You fool, the whole point is that these symmetric lines superimposed on a 2D picture looks 3D to us because of our inherent 3D internalisation of the world.
Who cares? /me goes back to lisp hacking.
No, the point is that someone took the real idea that you speak of and then decided to Photoshop some more possibilities.
Fr: Merriam-Webster Omline......... plagiarize  One entry found for plagiarize.  Main Entry: pla·gia·rize  Pronunciation: 'plA-j&amp;-"rIz also -jE-&amp;-  Function: verb  Inflected Form(s): -rized; -riz·ing  Etymology: plagiary  transitive senses : to steal and pass off (the ideas or words of another) as one's own : use (another's production) without crediting the source  intransitive senses : to commit literary theft : present as new and original an idea or product derived from an existing source wikipedia IS NOT a dictionary
&gt; Isn't "independently verifiable" equivalent to "convincing  &gt; others"? No. I can convince you through argument or intellect or debate or socratic method or what have you that the world is flat, but if you just went and looked yourself (with the appropriate instruments) you would notice that it's actually round, no matter how great my arguments. Lots of people are convinced of lots of things every day without there being any way to verify things. Science is distinguished by the ability of everyone to verify its claims. You don't believe me? Go look at the evidence! Do *you* think the bowling ball dropped significantly before the apple?  This "convincing others" stuff is nonsense. A scientific paper is basically saying "So we tried XYZ, and ABC happened. Presumably, if you try XYZ, ABC will happen for you too. Hopefully, you will try XYZ yourself, and see that ABC in fact happens." The difference between real science and what you're saying is the connection to reality. To listen to you, one would think that all science is purely subjective, and is simply the collection of views of most of the people who have been conferred the honor of being called a "scientist," just as the Catholic Church hands down doctrine from a group of cardinals. No. This is not the case. In fact, science is the opposite-- ideally, *anyone* who comes along and reads the literature can sit down and *try* XYZ and in fact *get* ABC. Science finds truths about reality independent of its practitioners, and that's why it's produced so much more useful information and technology than has other ways of approaching the search for truth.
[I've been thinking about this response for a while..] Your example seems to say that the other side is playing dirty so we should too. Perhaps in the real world we have to make such compromises. But this is just a few people talking on reddit. Can't we just think about the truth here? That's what I come here for, not to yell louder than everyone else. \----------------------------------------------------------
This 'just-so' stuff made me think of this: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anthropic_Principle
Ah. My bad. Replace Nazis with Rebublicans and Jews with Gays and we are on the track again.
Blowback is inevitable when this info gets out -- even for those willing to entertain an amnesty/work program on this matter. Dobbs..." others, like Juan Jose Gutierrez, whom I've interviewed a number of times over the past several months, manages to be both director of Latino Movement USA and a representative of ANSWER. As Gutierrez told us on my show, "The time has come...where we need to stand up and make a statement. We need to do what the American people did when they pulled away from the British crown. And I am sure that back in those days many people were concerned that was radical action."
Macs have literally 99% fewer viruses than PCs. Why not use that as a selling point? Because it MIGHT not be true in the future?  Seems kinda silly. Anything might not be true in the future. The fastest car, the coolest clothes, and the cheapest retail stors of today may not be the same in 10 years. Nobody advertises that their advantages will be perpetual.
I'm not sure what in my arguments gives you the sense I'm saying science is for scientists or cardinals. If you can go see that the world is round there's no way I can convince you, is there? Taking you into outer space to see for yourself is a perfectly valid way to convince you that it's round. Both empiricism and rationalism have their place. \----------------------------------------------------------- I'm tired, I'm going to take a break. I'm not sure why the word 'convince' has a bad connotation to you (and probably others). Something for me to think about. Thanks.
Backlash is coming my friends... It's coming...
I'm glad to have had the opportunity to have looked up [coccyx](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coccyx), but pretty "duh" up to where I'm asked to "click on" the sponsor logo, so no I didn't.
A related topic: IQ and real world success  http://www.eskimo.com/~miyaguch/grady/realworld.html
This is Faker than Pamela Anderson's bustline!
Free cars mobile phone wallpapers for all screen sizes
I'd put the iLife in that category as well.  "PCs only come with calculator"? If we are measuring what comes standard with the OS, sure.  I suppose that could matter.  But the body of software for the Mac is much smaller than the PC (and aside from the hardware limitations of days gone by, that's the primary reason why Macs have a minimal market share). I suppose someone should satirize that with Ubuntu or really any other linux distro.  If you want bundled apps, that's the place to look.
I like this one better: http://www.parres.com/john/images/Si%20Se%20Puede%2001%20May%2006/target18.html
Very true. Even for signals to reach us they have to send things out everywhere, strong enough, and most importantly long enough. No single human empire has lasted any time *at all* when you talk the timespans necessary. And let's face it, we have only limited guesses about the probability large-scale politics elsewhere would be any less demented than it is here. I've mused repeatedly that politics is one of those things that just doesn't scale worth anything.
Part of why they have fewer viruses is that it's a niche OS used by a few percent of the market. I don't imagine BeOS had many viruses either. The stuff about crashing just isn't true; XP seldom crashes. I like Mac OS X OK, but these ads don't do anything special for me.
Yahoo!
